TITLE: 主权性积分态-原文+3译文对照
SOURCE: http://www.sovereignintegral.cn/uploadfile/202402/281584657aba28c.pdf
CHARS: 309831
STATUS: READ

1
The Sovereign Integral
A New Model of Existence
Sovereign Integral—一种新的存在模式
作者:詹姆 斯.马胡 /詹姆斯.玛呼James Mahu
翻译： Psiage Z.SI.GP 六道 火焰
图解中文化：LeaDan Lena.李
编辑：古灵精怪
The Sovereign Integral
A new model of existence
Written in 2021 by James Mahu.
All diagrams and artwork were also produced by James Mahu.
Jamesmahu.com
sovereignintegral.org
English Version: 1.0
AUTHOR’S INTRODUCTION/作者介绍/作者序
Consciousness is the most important subject that is the least understood. Take a moment and
think about this statement. We know more about the universe than a single consciousness. I
2
do not equate the brain and its neural circuitry as a surrogate of consciousness. They are
distinct entities, having distinct capacities and purposes. The brain, inside a protective skull,
analyzing and computing information of a single lifetime; and consciousness, which begins at
the outer perimeter of self-knowledge like an expanding frontier, is an infinite, unbounded
Sovereign, enmeshed in lifetimes and dimensions too numerous to enumerate.
意識是最不為人所瞭解，但又是最重要的主題。花點時間思考一下這個陳述。我們對宇宙的
瞭解比對單單一個意識的瞭解更多。我不把大腦及其神經回路等同於意識的替代品。它們是
不同的實體，有著不同的能力和目的。大腦，在一個保護性的頭骨內，分析和計算著單一的
一生（a single lifetime）之訊息；而意識，開始於自我認知的週邊，就像一個不斷擴大的邊
界，是一個無限的、無界的主權者（Sovereign），捲入在數量太多而無法列舉的每個生生世
世（lifetimes）和次元（dimensions）中。
意识是最重要的课题中最不被理解的。花点时间思考下这个情况。我们对宇宙的了解
也多过对于单个意识的了解。我并未将大脑及其神经回路等同为意识的替代者。在保
护性的颅骨内里，大脑分析和处理着单次生命期的信息；意识，则从自我-知识的周
界外开始，就如同不断扩张的边境，它是一种无有穷尽的、无有疆界的主权体，所卷
入的生命期和维度，数量庞大到无法列举。
意识是最重要的课题，也是最不容易被理解的。停下来想想这句话。我们对宇宙的了解也要
比单一的意识多。我不会将大脑和它的神经回路等同于意识的替代品。它们是不同的实体，
有着不同的能力和目的。大脑，在一个保护性的脑壳里，分析和计算一个人一生的信息;而
意识，从自我认识的外部边缘开始，就像一个不断扩展的边界，是一个无限的、无边界的主
权，沉浸在多到数不清的生命和维度中。
Consciousness is elusive to the measurements and detections of science, because it is
perfectly subjective. There is not one consciousness that shares a single identical experience
with another. Consciousness is unique to every life form. Every single one, giving
consciousness the dubious distinction of being the most difficult thing to map or make explicit,
due to the two halves of its reality: infinite complexity and perfect subjectivity.
意識對於科學的測量和檢測來說是難以捉摸的，因為它是完全主觀的。沒有一種意識與另一
種意識共用著一個完全相同的體驗。每一個生命形式的意識都是獨一無二的。每一個，都賦
予意識以最難繪製或明確化之含糊的差別，由於其實相的兩個一半：無限的複雜性和完全的
主觀性。
意识难以被科学测量和检测所捕捉到，因为它是完全主观的。没有一个意识与另一个
意识共享着完全同一的经验。对每一个生命形式而言，意识都是独一无二的。每一个
意识都是唯一的，这种情况给意识带来了一种让人存疑的特质：制作地图或是透彻理
解它，成了最为困难的事情。而这归因于它之实相的2个特性：无限繁复性和完全主
观性。
意识对科学的测量和探察来说是难以捉摸的，因为它是完全主观的。没有一种意识与另一种
意识共享一个相同的体验。意识对每一种生命形式来说都是独一无二的。每一个个体都给予
意识一个模糊的区别，即它是最难以描绘或明确的事物，因为它的现实有两部分:无限的复
杂性和完全的主观性。
Throughout history, cartographers tried to envision a map of the world. They used verbal
reports from travelers and explorers or they, themselves, were the traveler and explorer. They
transcribed these reports into maps that presented a vision of a territory. One could even call
3
it a theory of the planet’s geographical face. Tens of thousands of iterations were made
mapping the earth, adding details like islands, mountain ranges, rivers, three-dimensional
topography; making adjustments when new lands were discovered or conquered. Today we
have satellites, fractal geometry and powerful computers to make this fine-grain resolution
available to anyone on the Internet.
縱觀歷史，繪製地圖者都試圖要預想一張世界地圖。他們使用旅行者和探險家的口頭報告，
或者他們自己就是旅行者和探險家。他們將這些報告轉錄成呈現了一個領土的景象的地圖。
人們甚至可以稱其為一種關於地球地理面貌的理論。為了要繪製地球的地圖，進行了數萬次
反覆的修改，添加了島嶼、山脈、河流、三維地形（three-dimensional topography）等細節；
在發現或征服新土地時進行調整。今天我們則有衛星、碎形幾何（fractal geometry）和強大
的電腦讓網路上的任何人都可以使用這種細粒的解析度。
纵观历史，制图者们尝试构想一张世界地图。他们利用旅行者和探险家们提供的口头
报告，又或他们本身就是旅行者和探险家。他们将这些报告转录成地图，以展示对于
某个地区的构想。有人甚至称之为行星地貌学。数以万计的迭代被完成着，去绘制地
球地图，添加进细节，诸如岛屿、山脉、河流、三维地貌；新的地域被发现或征服时，
则做出调整。时至今日，我们拥有人造卫星、分形几何和强大的计算机，使这种细致
的解析度在互联网上对任何人都变得可得。
纵观历史，制图者们一直在试图构想一幅世界地图。他们使用旅行者和探险家的口头报告或
者他们自己就是旅行者和探险家。他们把这些报告誊写成地图，描绘出一片区域的远景。人
们甚至可以称之为行星地理脸部理论。在绘制地球地图时，我们进行了成千上万次的迭代，
添加了像岛屿、山脉。河流、三维地形等细节;当新土地被发现或征服时进行调整。今天，我
们有卫星、分形几何和强大的计算机，让互联网上的任何人都能获得这种细粒度的分辨率。
We need more cartographers to join the effort of mapping the face of consciousness,
particularly artists. Since the advent of modern-day science, religious scholars, psychologists,
neurologists, biologists, physicists have debated the nature of consciousness. Some artists
have tried to capture its invisible “face”ーthe entity behind our human faceーusing paint or
dance or photography or music or film or writing. Sometimes, perhaps by accident, they
capture its imprint in our very human world. When they do, there can be a recognition that
the artist and their work had sprung from a new sourceーa kind of inner reality that outlasts
misunderstanding, and with a quiet, but resolute passion, it seeks to be understood.
我們需要更多的製圖師加入到繪製意識面貌的工作中，尤其是藝術家。自從現代科學出現
以來，宗教學者、心理學家、神經學家、生物學家、物理學家一直在爭論意識的本質。有
些藝術家使用繪畫、舞蹈、攝影、音樂、電影或寫作的方式，試圖捕捉意識看不見的“面
孔”——我們人臉背後的存在。有時，也許是偶然，他們在我們人類的世界中捕捉到了它的
印記。當他們這樣做時，就會有一種體認出現：藝術家和他們的作品是從一個新的源頭冒
出來的，這個源頭是一種內在實相，它超越了爭執，並且以一種安靜但堅定的熱情，尋求
被理解。
我们需要更多制图者加入到绘制意识面貌图的活动中，尤其是艺术家们。自从当代
科学问世，宗教学者、心理学家、神经学家、生物学家、物理学家就一直争论着意
识的性质。一些艺术家尝试捕获意识—这个藏在我们人类面貌背后的实存体—的不
可见“容貌”，经由绘画、舞蹈、摄影、音乐、电影或者写作。有时候，或许是偶
然，他们捕获到意识留在我们人类世界的印记。一旦做到了这一点，就会出现一种
4
赞誉：这些艺术家及其作品是涌自于新的源泉—一种内在实相，这内在实相躲避过
误读，带着沉静却坚定的激情，寻求着被（人类）理解。
我们需要更多的制图者特别是艺术家加入到绘制意识的脸孔的努力中来。自现代科学出现以
来，宗教学家、心理学家、神经学家、生物学家、物理学家一直在争论意识的本质。一些艺
术家试图通过绘画、舞蹈、摄影、音乐、电影或写作来捕捉它那看不见的“脸”—我们人类面
孔背后的实体。有时，也许是偶然，它们在我们人类的世界里留下了印记。当他们这样做时，
就会意识到艺术家和他们的作品来自一个新的来源— 一种超越误解的内在现实，它以一种
安静而坚定的激情寻求被理解。
Understanding consciousness is decidedly undervalued in our culture. While our higher
education systems provide diverse, philosophic opinion, and our religious teachings purport
to know the nature of the human soul, consciousness remains defined by either an intellectual
abstraction or the rounded words of poetry. Interestingly, consciousness is not a real subject.
There is no branch of human endeavor that is charged with the study and analysis of
consciousness (again, I am not talking about the brain).
在我們的文化中，「對意識的理解」之重要性顯然被低估了。雖然我們的高等教育系統提供
多樣化的哲學觀點，而我們的宗教教義聲稱要瞭解人類靈魂的本質，但意識仍然是由「腦力
的分離」或「詩詞拐彎抹角兜圈子的字眼」來定義的。有趣的是，意識並不是一個真正的主
題。沒有人類探索領域的分支負責意識的研究和分析（同樣地，我不是在談論大腦）。
“理解意识”这件事，在我们的文化中明显被低估。尽管我们的高等教育系统提供了
各式的哲学观点，我们的宗教教义则声称了解人类灵魂的本质，但对于意识的界定，
依然是经由智性思维的抽象，或诗歌的绕圈文字。有趣的是，意识并非一门真正的学
科。没有人类志业的分支在负责研究和分析意识（重申一下，我不是在谈论大脑）。
在我们的文化中，对意识的理解显然被低估了。虽然我们的高等教育体系提供了多样化的哲
学观点，我们的宗教教学声称了解人类灵魂的本质，但意识仍然是被一种智力的抽象或诗歌
的完整文字定义的。有趣的是，意识并不是一个真正的课题。在人类致力的各个领域里，还
没有哪个部门负责对意识(再说一遍，我说的不是大脑。)的研究和分析。
While I have repeatedly, even at this early onset, stated that consciousness and the brain are
distinct; let me go one step further and make the distinction between consciousness and soul.
The sum total of agreed-upon definitions of soul would fill one sentence. Soul is generally
thought to be our spiritual, eternal self. God, Allah, Yahweh, Brahman, etc., is its creator. It
may, through an unknown process, be created in the likeness of God. The soul, after death of
the mortal coil, attains a heavenly state, if it abides by certain rules. The afterlifeーgood or
badーis conditioned by the behaviors as a human being on earth. This is the general
framework for the concept of soul.
雖然我一再強調，甚至是在這份文件一開始就聲稱意識和大腦是不同的；現在讓我更進一
步地來區分意識和靈魂。一致同意的靈魂定義的總和，可以用一個句子來填滿。靈魂通常被
認為是我們的精神的、永恆的自己。上帝、真主、耶和華、婆羅門等，是它的創造者。它可
以藉由一種未知的過程，按照上帝的形像被創造出來。靈魂，在人死亡而脫離了人世間的紛
擾後，會達到天堂的狀態，如果在世時遵守一定的規則的話。來世——好與壞——取決於作
為人類在地球上的行為。這是靈魂的概念的一般框架。
既然我在重申，而且甚至在本文开篇，就声明了意识和大脑有所区别，那么，就让我
们再走远些，来区分下意识和灵魂。灵魂的各式公认定义，可以归总为下面的话。灵
5
魂通常被认为是我们灵性的、永恒的自我。上帝、阿 拉、耶 和 华、婆罗门等等，则
是其创造者。灵魂，经由某种未知过程，被创造得肖似于上帝。如果遵守特定的规则，
它就能在必朽外壳死去后，获至一种天国状态。死后生命——好还是坏——则取决于
身为地球之人类存在的行为。这就是灵魂概念的一般框架。
虽然我已经反复强调，甚至在一开始就声称意识和大脑是不同的;让我更进一步来区分意识
和灵魂。大家都一致同意的灵魂定义的总和可以概括为一句话。那就是，灵魂通常被认为是
我们灵性的，永恒的自我。上帝、安拉、耶和华、婆罗门等是它的创造者。它可能通过一个
未知的过程，以上帝的形象被创造了出来。人死后的灵魂，如果遵守一定的规则，就会达到
天堂的状态。人死后的生活—好或坏—取决于人在地上的行为。这是灵魂概念的总体框架。
Consciousness, on the other hand, is not the exclusive domain of any particular religious or
spiritual organization. It is the one thing that is completely present and infinite, and therefore
consciousness is inclusive of all things. The shorthand version of consciousness, at least in my
explorations, is that it is a synthesis of a Sovereign identity (self) and an Integral identity
(whole). Thus, my term for consciousness is the Sovereign Integral.1
另一方面，意識並不是任何特定宗教或靈性組織的專屬領域。它是那個全面臨在並且無限的
東西，因此意識包含了所有事物。意識的速記版本，至少在我的探索裡，就是，它是一種個
體的身份（a Sovereign identity）（自己）和一種整體的身份（an Integral identity）（全體 whole）
之綜合體。因此，我對意識的術語就是the Sovereign Integral。
1
另一方面，意识则并非特定宗教或灵性组织的独占领域。意识是全然临在于当下的、
无限大的，因而它包含着一切事物。至少就我的探索而言，意识的简化版本是：意识
是一种主权体①身份（自性）与积分态①身份（整体）的合体态②。因此，我用以描
述意识的词汇就是主权性积分态(1)。
另一方面，意识并不是任何特定宗教或灵性组织的专属领域。它是唯一完全存在于当下且无
限的事物，因此意识包含了所有的事物。意识的简版，至少在我的探索中是这样的:它是主
权身份（更高自我或真我）和一个集成身份（完整）的综合。因此，我对意识的称呼是主权
整体（Sovereign Integral）。
1
The Sovereign Integral is a pure consciousness that is simultaneously a unique individual and a point of
connection to the Integral force that connects all life across spacetime and the realms of duality
Sovereign Integral 是一個純粹的意識，它同時是一個獨特的個體，也是與那個「連接了所有跨越時空和
二元領域的所有生命」的整體力量的連接點。
（原注1：主权性积分态是一种纯粹的意识，它同时既是独一无二的个体，又作为一个连接点，
连接着积分态力量，积分态力量则连接起了遍及空间时间和二元性各个领域的所有生命。）
主权整体是一种纯粹的意识，它同时是一个独特的个体，也是连接所有跨越时空和二元性领域的生命的整
体力量的连接点。
6
7
The term, Sovereign Integral, was first brought out in 1998 when I launched the WingMakers
website. It was an embedded definition in the philosophy papers of the initial release of
materials, a relatively minor mention in an array of content that included music, artwork,
philosophy, a novel and poetry, wrapped inside a mythological story. In this paper, the
Sovereign Integral is centerstage. It is the focus. It is presented not as a part of a mythology,
but as the most real thing that exists. I want to stress that The Sovereign Integral is a nonfiction
paper with radical subjectivity, as only consciousness can evoke.
Sovereign Integral 這個詞是在 1998 年我推出 WingMakers 網站時首次提出的。這是最初
發佈的資料的哲學檔中的一個嵌入的定義，在包括音樂、藝術作品、哲學、一部小說和詩歌
在內的一系列內容中相對較少提及，它被包裹在神話故事裡。在這份文件中，Sovereign
Integral 是舞臺的中心。它是焦點。它不是作為神話的一部分被呈現出來，而是作為最真實
存在的東西。我想強調的是，The Sovereign Integral 是一篇具有激進主觀性的紀實論文，因
為只有意識才能喚起這樣的感覺。
主权性积分态，这个词组首次发布于1998年造翼者网站上线时。它是首批资料中哲
学文本的一个嵌入定义，作为次要信息被稍微提及于音乐、美术、哲学、小说和诗歌
等一系列内容中，包裹于一个神话故事里。在本文中，主权性积分态则是主角，是焦
点。其出席不是作为神话的一部分，而是作为真实存在的事物。我想要强调，本文《主
权性积分态》是非虚构类文本，但又带有彻底的主观性，因为，只有意识能唤起（关
于主权性积分态的认知）。
“主权整体”这个词最早出现在1998年，当时我创办了翅膀制造者网站。这是一个在最初
发布的资料的哲学论文中嵌入的定义，在包含音乐、艺术、哲学、小说和诗歌在内的一系列
内容中略略提到过提及，被包裹在神话故事中。而在本文中，主权整体是中心舞台。它是焦
点。它不是神话的一部分，而是存在的最真实的东西。我想强调的是，主权整体是一篇带有
激进的主体性的非虚构文章，只有意识才能唤起这种主体性。
You can substitute the word “consciousness” with the term “Sovereign Integral.” I use them
interchangeably. It is simply a new face or facet of consciousness that this particular paper is
proposing as an answer to the question, “Why is consciousness so elusive, and what is it,
anyway?”
你可以將“意識”一詞替換為“Sovereign Integral”。我互換地使用它們。這篇特定論文提出的只
是意識的一個新面孔或面向，作為“為什麼意識如此難以捉摸，而它究竟是什麼？”這個問題
的答案。
你可以用“主权性积分态”替代“意识”这个词。我会交替用到它们。这个词仅仅是
这份特定文本所提出的一个意识的新面貌或面向，以回答如下问题：意识为何如此难
解，以及，它究竟是什么？
你可以用“主权整体”来代替“意识”这个词。我交替使用它们。它只是意识的一个新面孔
或面向，这篇特定的文章是作为一个问题的回答提出来的，这个问题就是：“为什么意识如
此难以捉摸，它到底是什么?”
Some might be tempted to say, “It isn’t elusive, people just don’t listen hard enough to the
whispers of their soul.” There is some truth to that perspective, but is there a specific kind of
listening that makes the Sovereign Integral more tangible and real? That is another purpose
of this paper, to draw the Sovereign Integral out onto a lighted stage, so it can be revealed, at
least at the “skeletal” level and from one vantagepoint: mine.
8
有些人可能會說：“它並非難以捉摸，只是人們沒有足夠認真地傾聽他們靈魂的低語。”這個
觀點有一定的道理，但是否有一種 特定方式的傾聽 能讓 Sovereign Integral 更加有形和真
實呢？這是本文的另一個目的，將 Sovereign Integral 拉到一個被照亮的舞臺上，因此它可
以被揭示，至少在“骨骼”的層面上和從一個有利的角度：我的角度。
一些人或许会被（外在灌输）诱导着这么说，“它并不难解，人们只是没有足够努力
地倾听灵魂的耳语。”这个观点部分是真实的，不过，是否也存在一些特定类型的倾
听，能使得主权性积分态更可触及和真实？本文的另一个目的正是：将主权性积分态
拉上灯火通明的舞台，这样它才能被揭示，至少被揭示出“骨骼”层，而且是源于一
个有利的观察位置：我自身的视角③。
有些人可能会说：“这并不是什么难以捉摸的事情，只是人们没有用心倾听他们灵魂的低语
而已。”这种观点有一定的道理，但是否有一种特定的聆听，使主权整体更加有形和真实?
这也是本文的另一个目的，将主权整体画在一个明亮的舞台上，这样它就可以被揭示出来，
至少在“骨架”的层面上，以及从一个—“我”的视角的角度。
This paper is a theorem on the structure and nature of consciousness. The Sovereign Integral
ーin terms of its description in the two-dimensional confines of paper or canvas ーcannot be
more than a theory. There is no proof or scientific explanation of the Sovereign Integral. It
does not distill down to mathematics. That is part of its compelling nature: it cannot be
defined. And here’s why: The Sovereign Integral is infinite in scope, and because it is sovereign,
it is infinitely unique. It is expanding in a completely unique trajectory of experience, and
therefore, its understanding, expression, perspective, orientation, knowledge, wisdom,
memory, all are unique. As it evolves its uniqueness, it redefines its very existence. In other
words, the Sovereign Integral is not static or absolute or set upon a destination that acts as its
end-goal.
這篇論文是關於意識的結構和性質的定理。Sovereign Integral——就其在紙或畫布的二次元
的範圍內之描述而言——只能是一種理論。沒有對於 Sovereign Integral的證據或科學解釋。
它並沒有歸結為數學。這是其引人注目的性質的一部分，它無法被定義。原因如下：Sovereign
Integral 的範圍是無限的，因為它是主權的（Sovereign），所以它是無限獨特的。它以一種
完全獨特的經驗軌跡在擴展，因此，它的理解、表達、視角、定位、知識、智慧、記憶，都
是獨一無二的。隨著它的獨特性不斷發展，它重新定義了它自己的存在。 換句話說，Sovereign
Integral不是靜態的或絕對的，也不是設定在一個作為其最終目標的目的地上的。
本文描绘了关于意识结构和性质的理论。要以2维的文本或画布来描绘主权性积分
态，仅仅就只能是一种理论。不会存在相关的证据或科学解释。主权性积分态也无法
被提纯为数学。这就是主权性积分态毋容置疑的属性之一。它无法被定义。原因是：
它在规模范围上是无限的，而且又因为它是主权性的，所以，它就是彻底的独一无二
的。它一直扩张以一条完全独有的经验轨迹，因此，它的理解、表达、视角、方向、
知识、智慧、记忆，所有一切都是独一无二的。当它演进着自己的独一无二性时，它
就定义出了自己独有的存在性。换句话说，主权性积分态并非静止的，也非绝对的，
亦未冲向某个扮演终极目标的目的地。
本文是关于意识的结构和性质的一个定理。主权整体—就它在纸或画布的二维范围内的描述
而言—只能是一种理论。没有关于主权整体的证据或科学解释。它没有被提炼成数学。这是
它引人注目的本质的一部分:它无法被定义。原因如下:主权整体的范围是无限的，而因为它
是主权的，所以它是无限地独特的。它在一个完全独特的经验轨迹上扩展，因此，它的理解、
表达、视角、方向、知识、智慧、记忆，全都是独一无二的。随着它的独特性的发展，它重
9
新定义了它的存在。换句话说，主权整体不是静态的、或绝对的，更不是设定在一个作为其
最终目标的目的地之上的。
Furthermore, the Sovereign Integral is not beholden to any organization or creed or ethnicity
or socioeconomic status. It is independent and therefore, Sovereign.
此外，Sovereign Integral不受任何組織或信條或種族或社會經濟地位的約束。它是獨立的，
因此是主權的（Sovereign）。
再者，主权性积分态不对任何组织、信条、民族或社会经济状况负有义务。它是独立
自主的，因而就是主权性的。
此外，主权整体不受任何组织、信仰、种族或社会经济地位的约束。它是独立的，因此是主
权的。
This is a very important distinction. The Sovereign Integral is a consciousness of infinite and
unique expansion. It occupies both the dual and the nondual realms, simultaneously. The
Sovereign is the individual Self, the core identity that is always present even when the body-
ego is not. It is the bridge between lifetimes and it is the lifetimes, as well. However, as it
occupies a human body, its identity is assumed by the body-ego, assisted by the ubiquitous
signposts of the Social Program.2
這是一個非常重要的區別。Sovereign Integral是一種無限和獨特擴張的意識。它同時佔據二
元的和非二元的領域。主權者（Sovereign）是個體的自性（individual Self），是那個始終存
在的核心身份，即使身體-自我（body-ego）不在了時。它是生生世世之間的橋樑，並且它也
是那些生生世世。然而，當它佔據一個人類身體時，它的身份被「得到了 社會程式設定（Social
Program）
2
之無所不在的指引所援助」的身體-自我 給侵佔擅用了。
这是一个重要的特性。主权性积分态是以独一无二的方式无限扩张着的意识。它同时
占据并运作于二元及非二元的领域。主权体即是个性化自性，即使当身体-伊格④不
存在了，这一核心身份也始终临在。它是跨接各个生命期的桥梁，也是各个生命期本
身。然而，当占据并运作一个人类身体时，主权体的身份被假定为身体-伊格，身体-
伊格则被无处不在的社会编程(2)的指示牌辅导着。
这是一个非常重要的区别。主权整体是一种无限和独特地扩展的意识。它同时存在于二元和
非二元性领域。主权是个体的自我，即使身体的自我不存在，核心身份也始终存在。它是很
多世之间的桥梁，也是很多世本身。然而，由于它占据了一个人类身体，它的身份是由身体
-自我所假定的，并且受到无所不在的社会程序（注2）的路标辅助。
2
In the realm of duality, where the collective mind of a species, in a particular spacetime, agrees on a
consensus reality; this is the shared half of the Social Program. The other half is the unique Social Program
that is experienced by the Sovereign. The Social Program contains both halves, and is actually the Integral
in duality, reduced in its function and capacities by the dimensions of existence that are dual in nature.
在二元性的领域里，一个物种的集体脑力，在特定的时空中，对一个合意的实相达成一致；这是「社会程
序设定」共享的 一半。另一半是 Sovereign 所经历到的独特的社会程序设定。社会程序设定 包含这两
半，而它实际上就是「处于二元性里的 Integral」，被那些本质上是「二元的」的「存在的次元」降低了
它的功能和能力。
原注2：在二元领域，一个物种的集体心智，在特定时空内，同意了一种共识实相；这是社会编
程的共享部分。另一半则是被主权体体验着的独有社会编程。社会编程包含了这两半，事实上，
社会编程就是存在于二元性中的积分态，只是其功能和能力，因为它所存在各维度的二元属性而
弱化了。
10
The Sovereign, and its unique connection to the Integral, are dismissed by the body, ego and
Social Program, as if it were a child that is being dismissed from the dinner table: “Carry-on,
by all means, but please do it somewhere else”. The ego emerges as an outgrowth of the
survival instinct, and later in life, as the protective shield for the harsher realities of the Social
Program. The ancestral DNA confers tendencies and talents to the body, which can also have
an effect on the ego. Now we have the body and ego, sitting at the “dinner table” enjoying
their dinners in peace and quiet, tuned-in to the Social Program. The Sovereign has been
dismissed. The Integral repelled.
主權者（Sovereign），以及它與整體（Integral）之獨特的聯繫，被身體、自我（ego）和「社
會程式設定」給摒棄了，就好像它是一個被從餐桌上排除的孩子：“儘管做，繼續沒關係，
但請在其他地方進行”。自我的浮現是一種生存本能的產物，並且在隨後的生命中，作為「社
會程式設定」的那些更嚴酷的實相的保護盾。祖先的DNA授予身體一些傾向和才能，這也
會對自我產生影響。現在我們有了身體和自我，坐在“餐桌”前，平靜而安靜地享用晚餐，調
准到「社會程式設定」。而主權者（Sovereign）已被免職。整體（Integral）則被排斥抵制了。
主权体，以及它与积分态独一无二的连接，被身体、伊格、社会编程所摒弃，就像孩
子被赶下了餐桌：“继续闹，随便闹，不过闪去一边闹”。伊格的浮现则是幸存本能
的产物，之后余生，它都扮演着保护盾，防卫着社会编程的尖锐实相。祖先DNA提供
了倾向和天赋给身体，身体也会对伊格产生影响。现在，身体和伊格，坐在“餐桌”
旁享用着晚餐，平和而安详，还收听着社会编程（的广播）。主权体被摒弃。积分态
被排斥。
主权，以及它与整体独一无二的连接，被身体、自我和社会程序所摒弃，就像一个孩子被赶
离餐桌一样：继续干下去，当然可以，但请到别的地方去干。自我作为一种生存本能的产物
出现，在后来的生活中，作为社会程序中更严酷的现实的保护罩。祖先的DNA赋予身体倾向
和才能，这也会对自我产生影响。现在我们有了身体和自我，坐在“餐桌”边，安静地享受
晚餐，收听社会程序。主权被摒弃了。整体被排斥了。
A little bit about the Integral. The Integral is most similar to the term “Spirit” in religious and
esoteric texts. It has a magnetic quality and acts as the core attractor of the Sovereign,
because without this, the Sovereign could easily become distracted and their expansion of
understanding falls subject to entropy. While these phases occur (free will intermixed with
the Social Program), it remains that the fundamental nature of the Sovereign is expansion to
the Integral.
關於整體（Integral）的一點點說明。整體（Integral）與宗教和秘傳文本中的“精神（或聖靈
或力量 Spirit）”一詞最相似。它具有磁性，是 Sovereign 的核心吸引子，因為沒有它，
Sovereign 很容易分心，它的理解擴展會受到熵（無序、混亂）的影響。當這些階段發生時
（自由意志與社會程式設定混合在一起），Sovereign的基本天性仍然是要擴展到 Integral（整
體）的。
稍微提下积分态。含义与积分态最相似的词就是宗教和神秘学文献中的“圣灵”。积
分态具有一种磁性吸引力的性质，扮演着主权体的核心吸引子⑤，因为没有这种吸引
力，主权体会轻易地变得注意力偏移，其理解力的扩张会大大降低，从而屈从于熵增
⑥。当这些阶段出现时（自由意志被混合于了社会编程），积分态会始终保证主权体
的根本天性是扩张向积分态。
11
稍稍讲一下整体。在宗教和深奥文本中，“整体”与术语“灵性”最为相似。它具有磁性，作为
主权的核心吸引者，没有它，主权很容易分心，它们的理解扩展受制于熵。当这些阶段发生
时(自由意志与社会程序混合在一起)，主权的基本性质仍然是向整体的扩展。
The hands of evolution are attached to the body of the Integral. The Integral is the intelligence
of all realms as a result of being the collecting point of experiential information. It is the
companion to everything, and it is therefore, the one thing and essence that enfolds all life.
The two entities at the table (body and ego), immersed in the Social Program, are, by
comparison, exclusionary. They are the tribal cliques that dominate the landscape of human,
social culture. It is precisely through this tribalism that the Integral is thwarted by the body-
ego-social programーthe triad that obstructs the Sovereign Integral consciousness, and
therefore, muddles comprehension of its presence and purpose.
進化之手是附著在 Integral 的主體上的。Integral 是所有領域的智慧，這種智慧是因為它作
為「（所有）經驗的訊息之集合點」的結果。它是萬物的同伴，因此，它是包住所有生命的
那個東西，那個本質。桌子前的兩個實體（身體和自我），沉浸在「社會程式設定」裡，相
比之下，是排他性的。它們是主導人類社會文化景觀的一些部落小集團。正是透過這種部落
主義，Integral（整體）被 身體-自我-社會程式設定 的「三位一體」給阻撓了，這「三位一
體」會阻礙 Sovereign Integral意識，因此，混淆了對於 Sovereign Integral 意識的臨在和目
的之理解。
进化之手是附属于积分态这个身体的。积分态是通晓所有领域的智能，这是由于它是
体验性信息的聚集地，因而，它就是每一个事物的陪伴者，因此，它就是一体之物，
其最重要的性质就是包裹着所有的生命。坐在餐桌上的2个实存体（身体和伊格），
沉溺于社会编程，变得排斥其余。它们结成部落主义小团体，统治着人类风貌、社会
文化。正是通过这种部落主义联盟，身体-伊格-社会编程阻隔了积分态，这个三位一
体遮蔽掉主权性积分态意识，进而，混淆掉了对于主权性积分态的临在与目的的真正
理解。
进化之手附着在整体的身体上。整体是所有领域的智慧，作为经验信息收集点的结果。它是
万物的伴侣，因此，它是包涵一切生命的唯一事物和本质。相比之下，桌子上的两个实体(身
体和自我)，沉浸在社会程序中，是排他的。它们是主宰人类社会文化景观的部落小集团。
正是通过这种部落主义，整体被身体-自我-社会程序所阻挠—这三位一体阻碍了主权整体意
识，因而混淆了对其存在和目的的理解。
I maintain that this is purposeful. It is the means through which the Sovereign can remain in
separation from the Integral, and, in a sense, lose itself in the body-ego. This allows humanity
to be human. There is joy in the enchanted flesh, and human experiences cannot be contrived
as though they were products of factories. They require oblique light, and separation from
both the Sovereign and the Integral.
我堅稱這是有意義的。它是讓 Sovereign 可以保持與 Integral 分離的方式，並且在某種意義
上，在 身體-自我 中迷失它自己。這讓人類成為人類。著魔的肉體中有著愉悅，人類的體驗
不能像工廠的產品一樣被創造出來。它們需要間接的光並且與 Sovereign 和 Integral 分離。
我的主张是，这种情况的发生自有其目的。正是通过这种方式，主权体才能保持分裂
于积分态，从而在某种意义上，在身体-伊格中迷失掉自己。这容许了人类（整体）去
成为人类（个体们）。令人着魔的肉体里存在乐趣，而人类的体验无法像工厂产品般
12
被人为制造出来。体验的产生需要斜射的模糊的光，还需要同时分裂出主权体，也分
裂出积分态。
我认为这是有目的的。这是一种手段，通过它，主权可以保持与整体的分离，并且，在某种
意义上，在身体自我中迷失自己。这允许人类成为人类。在被施了魔法的肉体中有快乐，人
类的经验无法被人为地制造出来，仿佛它们是工厂的产品。它们需要斜射的光线，并从主权
和整体中分离出来。
This paper is not designed to improve anything or replace anything. It is not even designed at
all. You see, I wrote it, diagrammed it, and painted it, for myself. Once it was collected and I
could see the value in it, I decided that I would share it. That is the sum total. There is no
publisher, no editor, no organization, no artists and no designers. No other voices (other than
the translators) entered this work.
本文並非被設計要去改進什麼或替代什麼。它甚至根本沒有設計。你看，我為自己寫了它，
為它繪製圖解，以及畫了畫。一旦它被積聚起來而我可以看到它的價值，我就決定要把它分
享出去了。這就是全部了。沒有出版商、編輯、組織、藝術家和設計師。沒有其他發表意見
的人（譯者除外）進入了這項工作。
本文并不计划证明或取代任何事情。甚至压根都不存在什么计划。你看，我为着我自
己而创作出了文字、图解、绘画。当这些聚拢在一起，我才看到其中的价值，然后我
决定分享出它。这就是全部。没有发行商、编辑、或组织，没有艺术家们、没有设计
者们。没有其他任何声音进入这个作品（除了翻译者）。
这篇文章的目的不是为了改进或取代任何东西。它根本就不是设计出来的。你看，我写它，
绘制它，画它，是为了我自己。一旦它汇聚成集并且我能看到其中的价值时，我就决定分享
它。就是这样。没有出版商，编辑，组织，艺术家，也没有设计师。没有其他声音(除了译
者)进入这部作品。
With that qualification in mind, I submit that The Sovereign Integral paper accurately
represents my explorations as a cartographer of the face of consciousness. It may be radically
different from your own, and for that, I acknowledge no claim to it being more valuable or
better than anything else. It is possible that these maps of consciousness and existence only
apply to me. That is, afterall, the nature of the Sovereign Integral. Subjectivity is the default
state in a free will, infinite multiverse where individual consciousness is interwoven with all
others.
考慮到這一條件，我認為 The Sovereign Integral 論文準確地代表了我作為意識的相貌的製
圖師之探索。它可能與你自己的完全不同，為此，我承認沒有人聲稱它比其他任何東西更有
價值或更好。這些意識和存在的地圖可能只適用於我。畢竟，這就是 Sovereign Integral 的
本質。主觀性是在一個自由意志的、無限的複合宇宙中－－在其中個人意識與所有其他意識
交織在一起－－的既定狀態。
心智内带着上述限定条件，我交付了《主权性积分态》文本，来准确描绘出，身为一
个意识面貌制图者，我个人的探索。它或许完全不同于你的，对此，我要声明，我并
未宣称它比其他的更有价值或更好。很有可能，这些关于意识及存在性的地图仅仅适
用于我。毕竟，这就是主权性积分态的天性。在这个无限的、自由意志的复合宇宙里，
主观性是默认状态，毕竟在这里，每一个个性化意识都交织于其余所有的个性化意识。
考虑到这一点，我认为主权整体这篇文章准确地代表了我作为一名意识之脸的绘图师所进行
的探索。它可能与你自己的探索截然不同，因此，我不承认它比其他任何东西更有价值或更
13
好。这些意识和存在的地图可能只适合我。毕竟，这就是主权整体的本质。主观性是自由意
志、无限多重宇宙的默认状态，其中个人意识与其他所有人的意识交织在一起。
I want to acknowledge that this project rests on the shoulders of a great many Sovereigns who
informed these maps. Their work and contribution became my bridges. I do not make any
claim that these maps represent a path to realization or enlightenment. They are, at most, an
on-ramp or starting point for holding and examining the Sovereign Integral consciousness in
your imagination.
我要表示感謝，這件事是由許多助成了這些地圖的 Sovereigns 一起承擔的。他們的工作和
貢獻成了我的橋樑。我並沒有聲稱這些地圖代表了領悟或開悟的道路。它們至多是在你的想
像中持有和探討 Sovereign Integral 意識的入口或起點。
我想声明：这个项目建基于数量巨大的主权体们的肩膀之上，正是它们通信来了这些
地图。他们的工作和贡献成为了我的桥梁。我并未宣称这些地图代表着体认或启蒙之
路。顶多，它们只是入口匝道或出发点，以便你在自己的想象中来握住和检视主权性
积分态意识。
我想要承认这个项目是由许多创造了这些地图的主权完成的。他们的工作和贡献成了我的桥
梁，我并不声称这些地图代表了一条通往觉悟或启蒙的道路。它们至多是你想象中持有和检
查主权整体意识的一个入口或起点。
This paper exists partly as my hope that others will want to examine the Sovereign Integral
and allow it enough space and time in their lives so they can imagine it. The other part is
because the mythology of consciousness is the most interesting of all mythologies. The reality-
makers that we all are, observe and learn. We watch our lower expressions in duality wrestle,
tame, or transform their consciousness to include the nondual worlds and form an integration
based on a larger, more dimensional love.3
這篇論文存在的部分原因是，我希望其他人會想要探討 Sovereign Integral，並在他們的生活
中給它足夠的空間和時間，以便他們可以歡迎它的到來。另一部分是因為，意識的神話是所
有神話中最有趣的。我們都是實相的創造者，我們觀察和學習。我們看著我們的那些更低的
表達在二元性中扭打、駕馭或轉變它們的意識以包含那些非二元的世界，並形成一種「建基
於更大的、更多次元的愛
3
」之整體合一的狀態。
本文的存在，部分是因为，我希望其他人也来检视主权性积分态，并在自己的生命中
留出足够空间和时间，这样他们才能想象出它。另一半原因则是，意识的神话是所有
神话中最为有趣的。我们全都身为实相-制造者，而观察着、学习着。要么观看着自己
在二元性里的较低表达，扭斗啊，顺从啊；要么转化我们的意识，来包纳入非二元的
诸世界，来基于更广大、多维的爱(3)去形成一种积分整合。
这篇文章的存在部分是因为我希望其他人会想要审视主权整体，并在他们的生命中允许它有
足够的空间和时间，以便他们能够想象它。另一部分是因为意识的神话是所有神话中最有趣
3
This form of love is defined as the overlap of the Sovereign, the Integral, and Sovereign Integral. It is love
as an integrative force that fully appreciates free will. It is discussed in more detail in Section 2.
这种形式的爱 被定义为 Sovereign、Integral 和 Sovereign Integral 的重叠。它是爱 作为一种「完
全理解与赞赏自由意志」的一体化力量。 第 2 节将有更详细的讨论。
原注3：这种形式的爱被定义为主权体、积分态和主权性积分态三者的交叠处。身为积分整合的
力量，这种爱却又彻底地赞赏/欢迎自由意志。第二节会详细讨论。
这种爱的形式被定义为主权、整体和主权整体的重叠。爱是一种综合性的力量，它完全欣赏自由意志。它
将在第2节中进行更详细的讨论。
14
的。我们都是现实的创造者，观察和学习。我们看到我们在二元性角力中的低表达、驯服或
转换它们的意识，以包含非二元世界，并形成一个基于一种更大的，更多维的爱的整体（注
3）。
There is a fundamental truth, and often people get anxious or frustrated with this truth, but
it must be accepted: The consciousness of the Sovereign Integral is not accessible to the five
senses. It can only be accessed through the imaginative faculty, and this faculty is not in the
brain or pineal gland or the body or the ego or even the heart. It is a sensory receiver of the
higher mind, that part of the mind that cares about redefinitions and expansion into the
Integral. It is not interested in human achievement, psychic or spiritual phenomenon. The
higher mind, the Noble Mind, imagines the Sovereign Integral and invites its consciousness
into the human domain with a specific intention: expansion to the Integral state.
有一個基本真相，人們常常對這個真相感到焦慮或沮喪，但它必須被接受：五種感官無法接
取到 Sovereign Integral 的意識。它只能藉由「想像力的機能」被接通，而這種機能不在大
腦或松果體或身體或自我（ego），或甚至心臟裡。它是更高腦力（或更高心智）的知覺接
收器，是腦力中關心重新定義和擴展成 the Integral 的那部分。它對人類成就、通靈的或超
自然的現象不感興趣。更高腦力，崇高的腦力（the Noble Mind），以「要擴展到 Integral（整
體）的狀態」之特定的意圖來想像 the Sovereign Integral 並邀請它的意識進入人類領域。
存在一个基本真理，人们则时常因它而焦虑或沮丧，但是，这个真理必须被接受：主
权性积分态的意识是5种感官无法接入的。它只能通过想象这一官能⑦来接取，而这
种官能并不存在于大脑、松果体、身体、伊格、甚至心脏里。这种官能是更高心智的
感官接收器，心智的这个部位所关注的则是：重新定义并扩张进积分态。它完全不关
注人类成就、心灵或灵性现象。更高心智，或者称之为恢弘心智，带着扩张向积分状
态的明确意图，想象着主权性积分态，并邀请它的意识进入人类的领域。
有一个基本的真理，人们经常会对这个真理感到焦虑或沮丧，但它必须被接受：主权整体意
识无法被五种感官所感知。它只能通过想象力来获得，而这种想象力并不在大脑、松果体、
身体、自我甚至心里面。它是更高头脑的感官接收者，头脑关心重新定义和扩展到“整体”的
那部分。它对人类的成就、超能力或灵性现象不感兴趣。更高头脑，崇高的头脑，想象主权
整体并邀请它的意识带着—扩展到整体状态的特定意图—进入人类领域。
As mentioned earlier in this introduction, consciousness is the most important subject that is
the least understood, and therefore, that continuum is the widest dichotomy of human
knowledge in both the individual and collective sense. This is precisely why this subject is
critical to understand, because it, perhaps more than any other factor, can create behavior
that is Integral-minded, yet grounded in the appreciation for the uniqueness of the Sovereign.
正如這篇序言前面提到的，意識是最重要的主題，但卻是最不為人理解的，因此，從個人和
集體的角度來看，這種逐漸演變成目前這樣的情況（譯注：很重要但沒人懂），是人類知識
最廣泛的分裂。這正是理解這個主題至關重要的原因，因為它可能比任何其他因素更能創造
出「具有整體思想（Integral-minded），但其基礎是對 Sovereign 的獨特性之理解與讚賞」
的行為。
如本序稍早谈到，意识是最重要的课题中最不被理解的，因而，无论个体还是集体理
解层面，“意识”这个课题都成了人类知识领域里两端相距最远的连续统一体⑧。理
解该课题如此关键，一个或许远超过任何其他要素的原因是：它能够创造出特定的行
为，既专注于积分性，又扎根在对于独一无二主权性的赞赏中。
15
正如前面在介绍中提到的，意识是最重要的也是最不容易被理解的主题，因此，从个人和集
体的角度来看，意识的连续统一体是人类知识最广泛的二分法。这就是为什么这个主题是理
解的关键所在，因为它也许比其他任何因素更能创造出具有整体意识的行为，但却以欣赏主
权的独特性为基础。
Your identity can shift, and given this natural ability we have as humans to explore identities,
we need to be nimble, always with the outlook of deepening our understanding of our
Sovereign, while expanding our reach to the Integral. We need to be aware of our resonance
points with art, culture, consciousness, social norms, education and the shared reality of being
human in this time and place.
你的身份可以轉變，而鑒於我們有這種「作為人類而能夠去探索（各種）身份」的自然能
力，我們需要靈活，在把我們的所及範圍擴大到 Integral 的時候，始終帶著能加深我們對
我們的 Sovereign 的理解之展望。我們需要注意到「我們與藝術、文化、整體意識、社會
規範、教育，以及 在這個時間和地點成為人類 所共用的實相」之共鳴點。
你的身份感能够转变，因为我们被赋予了这样的天赋能力：身为不同的人类去探索
各种身份。我们必须保持灵活，始终带着扩展的视野，纵向上深入我们对于自身主
权体的理解，横向上扩张我们向积分态的触及范围。当面对艺术、文化、意识、社
会规则、教育、以及身为一个存在于这个时间和地点的人类所共享的实相时，我们
需要意识到我们与之的共鸣点。
你的身份可以改变，鉴于我们作为人类探索身份的这种自然能力，我们需要灵活，总是以
加深我们对我们的主权的理解，同时扩大我们对整体的抵达为前景。我们需要意识到我们
与艺术、文化、意识、社会规范、教育的共鸣点，以及在这个时代和地点作为人类的共同
现实。
There is a phrase, “Just tell the truth.” However, in the case of metaphysics and consciousness,
there is only theoryーrelative truths. These relative truths are really just opinionsーvarying
opinions, sometimes, quite opposite opinions. The point is, one cannot tell the Truth of how
we exist, why we exist and what we truly are or how we came to be. There is no set of words
(in any language) that can adequately describe or explain the intricate and fractal nature of
consciousness as it slips between dimensions, lifetimes, and infinitely varied experiences.
有句話叫“實話實說”。然而，在形而上學和意識的例子裡，只有理論——相對真理 的存在。
這些相對真理實際上只是意見——不同的意見，有時甚至是完全相反的意見。重點在於，人
們無法說出「我們是如何存在的」，「我們為什麼會存在」，以及「我們真正所是的」或「我
們如何得以存在」的真相。沒有一套詞語（以任何語言）可以充分描述或解釋意識，當它在
那些次元、在每個生生世世和無限變化的體驗之間滑動時，它的錯綜複雜和碎形性質（fractal
nature）。
有句话叫，“只讲真理”。可是，在形而上学和意识领域，却只存在理论——相对的
真理。这些相对真理真的只是些观点——各异的观点，有时候，是截然相反的观点。
要点是，任何人都无法讲述下属真理：我们是如何存在的，我们为何存在，我们真正
是什么，我们是如何形成的。也没有一套词组（无论哪种语言）能够充分描述或解释：
当游走于各个维度、各生命期、以及那无限多样的体验中时，意识那错综复杂且分形
化⑨的性质。
有句话叫“说出真相”。然而，在形而上学和意识的情况里，只有理论—相对的真理。这些
相对的真理其实就是观点—不同的观点，有时是截然相反的观点。关键是，一个人无法说出
16
我们是如何存在的真相，我们为什么存在，我们到底是什么，我们是如何成为的。当意识在
维度、生命和无限变化的经验之间穿梭时，没有任何一套话语(任何语言)能够充分描述或解
释它复杂而分形的本质。
If this could be explained, this paper would be about that. The very best that any of us can
do is to explore maps of consciousness and be sensitive to our resonance points. Is there a
feeling of expansion or constriction? This resonance is a feeling more than an intellectually
reasoned-out experience.
如果這可以被解釋的話，那麼這篇論文就是關於那個解釋的。我們每個人所能做的最好的
事情就是去探索那些意識的地圖，並且對我們的共鳴點感覺敏銳。有擴張或緊縮的感覺
嗎？這種共鳴比較是一種感覺，而不僅是一種腦力推理的經驗。
如果这件事能被解释，本文应该就是讲述它的。我们最顶尖的人能够做的也仅仅只
是，探索意识的地图，并敏感于我们的共鸣点。是感觉到一种扩张还是收缩？这种
共鸣是一种感觉，而不太是智性推论的体验。
如果这可以解释，这篇文章将是关于这一点的。我们每个人能做的最好的事情就是探索意
识的地图，并对我们的共鸣点保持敏感。有扩展或约束的感觉吗?这种共鸣是一种感觉，而
不是理性推理出来的体验。
This material may feel slightly “cool” to the touch. This is due to its focus on the mind of
consciousness, rather than the heart of consciousness. It is more directed to the higher mind
of consciousness, which is particularly open to concepts that are unbounded, unmoored,
dynamic, evolving, enigmatic, self-directed, and yet, reasonable. Perhaps even logical.
這個資料接觸起來可能會感覺有點“涼（cool）”。這是因為它專注於意識的腦力 （the mind
of consciousness），而不是意識的心（the heart of consciousness）。它被更多地指向意識的
更高腦力，而更高腦力對於那些「不受限制、不受束縛、動態、不斷發展、神秘、自我導向
但又合理」的觀念特別開放。（覺得涼）也許甚至是必然的。
这份资料或许接触时会感觉稍微有些“冰冷”。这归因于它的焦点是放在意识的心智
部分，而不太是意识的心脏部分。它更多被导向了意识的更高心智，而更高心智对于
下述概念尤为敞开：无有限制、无有定着、动态变化、进化演变、神秘莫测、自我引
导，同时却又合乎情理，甚至符合逻辑。
这个资料接触起来可能有点“冷”。这是因为它专注于意识的头脑而不是意识的心的。它更倾
向于意识的更高头脑，这更高头脑对无限的概念尤其开放，因为它是无拘无束的，充满活力
的，进化的，神秘的，自我导向的，但又是合情合理的。也许，甚至是合乎逻辑的。
Let’s take a look at how consciousness is popularly defined.
讓我們來看看意識是如何被普遍定義的。
让我们看一看意识的通俗定义。
让我们看看意识是如何被广泛地定义的。
Mirriam-Webster Dictionary (Full Definition)
韦伯斯特词典Merriam-Webster 词典（完整定義/全部释义/完整释义）
Consciousness:意识:
1： a) the quality or state of being aware especially of something within oneself;
知覺到特別是自己內在的某種東西之品質或狀態
17
知觉的质量或状态，尤指知觉自身内在事物时的
意识到特别是意识到自己内在的某种东西的性质或状态
b) the state or fact of being conscious of an external object, state, or fact
知覺到一種外在的物體、狀態或事實之狀態或事實
意识到外在对象、状态或事实时的状态或事实
意识到外部物体、状态或事实的状态或事实
c) awareness, especially concern for some social or political cause
意識，尤其是對某些社會或政治原因的關注
认知，尤指对社会或政治事件的关注
意识到，尤其是有关某些社会或政治事业方面的
2：带有感知、情感、意志、思想等特征的状态
以感觉、情感、意志和思想为特征的状态
3：the totality of conscious states of an individual
一個個體的 有意識的狀態 的總體
个体意识状态的总和
一个个体意识状态的总和
4：the normal state of conscious life regained consciousness
有意識的生活之正常狀態 恢復了意識
有意识生命苏醒为常态时的意识状态
有意识的生命恢复意识的正常状态
5：the upper level of mental life of which the person is aware as contrasted with
unconscious processes
與無意識的過程相比，人所知道的精神生活的上層
相对于无意识过程而言，个体所知觉到的高级心理活动
与无意识过程相比，人所意识到的较高层次的精神生活
It is the third definition of consciousness that is most relevant to us. However, I do, as you will
see, redefine what “totality” means. Consciousness is an infinite canvas, so vast that a single
paper like The Sovereign Integral can only paint a single pixel. I had to carefully choose which
pixel to paint.
第三個意識的定義是與我們最相關的。然而，正如你將看到的，我確實重新定義了“總體”的
含義。意識是一張無限的畫布，如此之大，以至於像 The Sovereign Integral 這樣一份單一文
檔只能繪製一個單一的圖元。我必須仔細選擇要繪製哪一個圖元。
意识的第三个释义与我们最为相关。但是，你将看到，我会重新定义“总和”意味着
什么。意识是一幅无限的油画，如此浩瀚，以至《主权性积分态》这张纸只能画出它
的一个单像素。所以我就不得不精心地选择，到底该画下哪一个像素。
意识的第三个定义与我们最为相关。然而，正如你将看到的，我确实重新定义了“整体”的含
义。意识是一幅无限的画布，如此之大，以至于一篇像主权整体这样的文章只能画出一个像
素。我必须仔细选择要画的像素。
The Sovereign Integral consciousness is all-inclusive. You could be an atheist or a devout
religious scholar and still see how these maps of consciousness could “bolt-on” to your
present belief in consciousness or the human soul. As I mentioned before, this paper is not
meant to replace anything. You may still be an atheist or a devout religious scholar after
18
reading this paper, there is no need to change your social network, life’s work, or a single
relationship. This paper is not about any of that.
Sovereign Integral 意識是無所不包的。你可能是一個無神論者或一個虔誠的宗教學者，但
仍然會看到這些意識的地圖是如何“附加”到你目前對意識或人類靈魂的信念中的。正如我
之前提到的，這篇論文並不意味著要取代任何東西。讀完這篇論文後你可能仍然是無神論
者或虔誠的宗教學者，沒有必要去改變你的社交網路、生活工作或任何一種人際關係。這
篇論文與這些都無關。
主权性积分态意识是包罗一切事物的。你可以是无神论者或虔诚的宗 教学者，依然
能发现这些意识地图能如何地“贴附”上你对于意识或人类灵魂的个人信念。如前
所述，本文并不意欲取代任何东西。读完本文，你依然可以是无神论者或虔诚宗 教
学者，不需要改变你的社会关系网、生命工作或任何关系。本文无关于这些。
主权整体意识是包罗万象的。你可能是一个无神论者或虔诚的宗教学者，但仍然会看到这
些意识的地图是如何与你目前对意识或人类灵魂的信仰相“结合”的。正如我之前提到的，
这篇文章并不是要取代任何东西。读了这篇文章后，你可能仍然是一个无神论者或虔诚的
宗教学者，没有必要改变你的社交网络、一生的工作或单一的关系。这篇文章不是关于任
何这些的。
The Sovereign Integral is like an Imaginary Being.4 It is not a human being. It is not even an
enlightened being. It is infinite and interdimensional in both dual and nondual realms, which,
as impossible as that may sound, we, nonetheless, can imagine it as us.
Sovereign Integral 就像一個「想像中的存在（Imaginary Being）」
4
。它不是一個人。它甚至
不是一個開悟的存在體。它在二元和非二元的領域都是無限的和交互於次元間的，儘管這聽
起來不可能，然而我們還是可以把它想像為我們自己。
主权性积分态就像一个想象性存在(4)。主权性积分态并非一个人类存在。它甚至不是
一个所谓启蒙的存在。它是无限的且交互维度⑩的，同时存于二元性和非二元领域，
尽管听上去不太可能，但我们确实能够将它想象成我们。
主权整体就像一个想象的存在。”它不是一个人。它甚至不是一个开悟的存在体。它是无限
的，在二元和非二元性的领域都是多维的，这听起来似乎不可能，尽管如此，我们还是可以
把它想象成是我们。
The philosophy that originates from the Sovereign Integral is best described as expansion.
Anything that is stale, crystallized, pinned down like a specimen and can be described one day
the same as the next, is not from the Sovereign Integral. Consciousness is like weather: it is
always changing. Anything that describes a destination or endpoint or culmination of effort or
achievement of purpose, is not from the Sovereign Integral. It expands in infinitude.
源自 Sovereign Integral 的理論架構最好的描述就是 擴展。任何陳舊的、變得明朗具體的、
像標本一樣被釘住，而且在第一天和接下來的一天被描述得都一樣的東西，就不是來自
Sovereign Integral。意識就像天氣：它總是在變化。任何描述一個目的地 或 終點 或 努力
的頂點 或 目標的實現 的，都不是來自 Sovereign Integral。它無限擴展。
源自于主权性积分态的哲学，最好的描述即是扩张。任何陈旧、结晶、或是如标本般
被固定的事物，任何今日之描述和明天一样的事物，都不是源自主权性积分态。意识
4
原注4：定义见139段/被定义在 段落 140 里......
19
就像天气，始终在变化。任何事物，只要描绘了目的地、终结点、努力的顶点或意图
的实现，都不是源自主权性积分态。主权性积分态无限地扩张着。
起源于主权整体的哲学最好的描述是扩展。任何陈腐的、成型的、像标本一样固定下来的东
西，以及能够在第二天描述成和第一天一样的东西，都不是来自主权整体。意识就像天气:
它总是在变化。任何描述目的地或终点或努力的顶点或目的的成就的东西，都不是来自主权
整体。它是无限扩展的。
Thus, with such an Imaginary Being as the Sovereign Integral, how does it live and breathe in
our worldーthe shared reality of humans that we all live in? If science can never pin it down,
if religious and spiritual texts are too vague, how do we stand a chance to ever bring this entity
into our human sphere, in a meaningful way?
因此，像 Sovereign Integral 這樣一個「想像中的存在」，它如何在我們的世界——那個我
們都生活在裡面的，人類共用的實相－－裡生活和呼吸呢？如果科學永遠無法確定它，如
果宗教和性靈文本過於模糊，我們如何有機會以一種有意義的方式把這個實體帶入我們的
人類領域呢？
那么，主权性积分态这样的想象性存在，又是如何生活和呼吸于我们世界——我们
全生活其间的这个人类共享实相呢？如果科学从未探明它，如果宗 教和灵性文献全
过于含糊，我们究竟又如何以任何有意义的方式，将这实存体带入我们人类的领
域？
因此，有了这样一个想象的存在作为主权整体，它是如何生活和呼吸在我们的世界—我们
全都活在其中的人类的共同现实里的？如果科学永远无法将其确定下来，如果宗教和灵性
文本过于模糊，我们如何有机会以一种有意义的方式将这个实体带进我们的人类领域呢?
That is precisely what this paper is about. It is my belief that it is the function of artists to
bring the Sovereign Integral consciousness into human culture so that its imprint, its
energetics and its perspective can be more deeply felt as an inspirational factor in all of our
lives.
這正是本文要討論的內容。我相信藝術家的職責是將Sovereign Integral意識帶入人類文
化，以便它的印記、它的能量學和它的視角 可以更深刻地被感受到，而在我們所有的生活
中，作為一種鼓舞人心的要素。
这正是本文要谈到的。我的信念是，艺术家的作用即是，将主权性积分态意识带入
人类文明，这样，它的印记、它的能量，它的视角才能被更深地感知成一种存在于
我们全体生命中的启发要素。
这正是本文所要讨论的。我相信，这是艺术家的职责，把主权整体意识带进人类文化，以
便它的印记，它的能量和它的视角可以作为一个鼓舞人心的因素，在我们所有人的生命中
被更深刻地感受到。
20
你被发明出来不是为了去应对黑暗⑪//你不是为了黑暗而被创造出来的
译注1：主权体和积分态的更多信息见《Soerverign Integral的翻译说明》
译注2：正题、反题、合题。图解中括号里的这三个词，是由黑格尔提出的辩证法三要素。
黑格尔认为发展过程都可分为三个有机联系着的阶段：一、发展的起点，即正题；二、对立面的显
现，即反题；三、正反二者的统一，即合题。合题把正反两个阶段的某些特点或积极因素在新的或
更高的基础上统一起来，而非简单并列两者，所以是 合，而非 和。 为了不陷入绕口的哲学术语，
且方便后续行文，将反题翻译成对立面，将合题，翻译为合体态。
译注3：指作者自己。
21
译注4：ego译为伊格，self译为自我或自性，mind译为心智，heart译为心脏。伊格出自
是佛洛依德的人格三角结构。分别是伊格，本我ID，超我。对应：自我约束的理性妥协、生物本
能和道德理想。本文中的伊格-身体，可以近似视为伊格-本我，而超我则既可以是社会编程，也可
以是本文中特定的想象性存在，视个人选择而定。
self在本文中可理解为伊格-身体。部分地方则代表着超越了伊格-身体的更大的个体意识，
这时翻译成自性。
造翼者资料中，mind是一个场的概念，这个场可以被神经系统接取。故按照心理学的用语习
惯译为心智。在本文124段，玛呼这样定义到，“心智是连接心脏智能的接口界面。大脑拥有与物
质心脏间的相对原始的接口界面，而心智则交互连接着能量心脏，即心脏的非物质能量。”心智分
为心智和更高心智，可以理解为是2个不同维度的场。心智的功能是界定和构想。
在造翼者资料里，heart是非常重要的概念，不是传统灵性资料里的比喻，借指心灵或意识，
而是一种对器官的实指，具有特定且重要的官能。故翻译成心脏。包含了物质心脏和能量心脏。心
脏的功能则是接收和扩展。
译注5：吸引子，微积分及混沌学概念。一个系统会最终朝某个稳态发展，这个稳态就叫做
吸引子。这和分形一样，是贯穿全文的一个核心概念。更多的信息见《分形与吸引子》中 相关的
文字和视频。
译注6熵：热力学概念。指系统“内在的混乱程度”。一般认为随着时间推移，熵必然增加，
也就是说熵增是一个自发从有序向无序发展的过程。
译注7：faculty翻译为官能，重点放在“官”。因为如文中所述，想象是更高心智的感觉接
受器，即接受感觉的器官。这很可能就是造翼者资料里提到的第七感。在本文139段，玛呼这样写
到“更高心智能将关于这种意识状态的短暂一瞥和官能感觉/第七感visceral sense传递给向身
体-伊格。”
译注8：连续统一体。将一个课题视为一个渐变的圆柱。一端代表问题的提出，另一端代表
答案的得出。这个圆柱就是作为一个课题的连续统一体。
译注9：分形是研究无限复杂的不规则系统内部各层级的自相似性。客观事物具有自相似的
层次结构，局部与整体在形态、功能、信息、时间、空间等方面具有统计意义上的相似性，称为自
相似性。数学意义上分形的生成是基于一个不断迭代的方程式，即一种基于递归的反馈系统。分形
的一个有趣的特征是：在分形集合所在的维度，它是无限的，在更高一个维度，它却是有限的。更
多信息见《分形与吸引子》
译注10：交互维度。interdimensional翻译为交互维度，意即各维度之间是可以双向沟通和
影响的。
译注11：这句话出自《多尔曼预言》，是第一诞生者在梦里化身母亲对玛雅说的。意思是，
不把解决黑暗作为意图，而将自我绽放作为意图，太阳升起不是为了去化解黑暗，而是为绽放自
己，黑暗消失仅仅是这种自我绽放的副产品而已。
22
Section1第一节
The Sovereign：A General Model
The Sovereign：一个大致上的模型
主权体：一般模型
主权: 一个大致上的模式
In this Section we will start with the Sovereign, then, in the following Section we will take a
closer look at the Integral.
在本节中，我们将从 Sovereign 开始，然后在下一节中，我们将仔细研究Integral。
本节，我们开始讨论主权体，下一节，我们会更近距离地检视积分态。
在这一节中，我们将从主权开始，然后在下一节中，我们将更仔细地查看整体。
1 Consciousness is a synthesis of two completely antithetical identities (Sovereign and
Integral); and while it is intrinsically and infinitely unique, it does possess common
characteristics that apply to all entities incarnated in the realms of duality. This is one: We are
a unique mix of Sovereign and Integral, but in the realms of duality, these qualities undergo
distortions brought on by the body-ego-social program, what I call the “veils of duality.”
1 意识是两个完全对立的身份（Sovereign 和 Integral）之综合体；虽然它本质上是无限独特
的，但它确实具有适用于所有具体化在二元性的领域里的实体的一些共同的特征。这就是其
中的一个：我们是 Sovereign 和 Integral 的一种独特的结合，但在二元性的领域里，这些质
量会经历 身体-自我-社会程序设定 带来的扭曲，我称之为“二元性的面纱（复数）”。
1意识是两个完全相反身份（主权体和积分态）的合体态；尽管每一个意识在本质上
都是彻底独一无二的，但也存在着一般性，适用于所有化身进二元性领域的实存体。
其中之一即是：我们是主权体和积分态的一种独一无二的混合，但在二元性的领域，
这2个特性遭受了强加的失真畸变，实施者就是身体-伊格-社会编程，我称之为“二
元面纱”。
1 意识是两个完全对立的身份(主权和整体)的合成；虽然它在本质上是无限独特的，但它确
实拥有适用于所有在二元世界中的化身实体的共同特征。这就是，我们是主权和整体的独特
混合体，但在二元性的领域里，这些品质受到了我称之为“二元性的面纱”的身体-自我-社会
程序的扭曲。
2 The Sovereign, as it has been used in literature, is a term used to describe a King or Monarch.
Here’s what the dictionary says:
2 The Sovereign，就如它在文学作品中使用的一样，是用来描述国王或君主的术语。字典里
是这么说的：
2主权体，用在文学作品中时，是用以描述国王或君主。下面是字典里的说法：
2 在文学作品中，“主权”这个词是用来形容国王或君主的。字典上是这么写的:
Mirriam-Webster Dictionary (Definition)； Merriam-Webster 词典（定义）韦伯斯特词典
Sovereign: 主权:
1 . a) superlative in quality质量上的最高级；性质的最高级；品质最优秀的;
b) of the most exalted kind最尊贵的那种；最尊贵特征的
c) having generalized curative powers 具有广义的治疗能力；具有广泛疗愈力量的；
具有广泛的治理能力
23
d) of an unqualified nature属于一种无限制的自然本质；一种无限制条件的、绝
对的性质；不受限制的性质;
e）having undisputed ascendancy拥有无可争议的优势或支配地位；拥有无可辩驳
的终极支配权；具有无可争议的优势;
2 . a) possessed of supreme power拥有至高无上的权力
b) unlimited in extent范围无限；范围规模程度上的无限量；范围不受限制;
c) enjoying autonomy: independent sovereign sta tes享有自治权：独立的主权国家
（或状态）；享受自治，具有独立主权的国家;
3 . a）relating to, characteristic of, or befitting a supreme ruler
关于最高统治者的，具有最高统治者特征的，或适合最高统治者；描述与至
高统治者相关的关系、特征或适用性
3 As you see from this definition, sovereign and power are closely allied concepts. The words
I highlighted in blue are related to my definition, but as you will see, my definition of the
Sovereign may feel a little surreal to your body-ego-social programーthat part of you that you
identify with, as You. My only suggestion is to have one self-discipline while you read this
Section (if not the entire paper): guide your mind to remain open and explorative.
3 正如你从这个定义中看到的，Sovereign和权力是密切相关的概念。我用蓝色醒目显示的
词与我的定义有关，但正如你会看到的，我对Sovereign的定义对于你的 身体-自我-社会
程序设定——你认同为你的那一部分——来说，感觉可能会有点超现实。我唯一的建议是在
阅读本节（如果不是整篇论文）时保持一种自律：引导您的脑力保持开放和具有探索性。
3正如释义里所见，sovereign和权力/力量是关联紧密的概念。高亮为蓝色的文字
则与我的定义相关，不过你会看到，我关于主权的定义，或许会让你的身体-伊格-
社会编程——你认同为是自己的这部分——感觉有些超现实。我唯一的建议是，
（即使不是针对全文，至少）在阅读本节时，保持你的自我节制：引导你的心智来
保持开放和探索。
3 正如你从这个定义看到的，主权和权力是关系密切的概念。我用蓝色标注的词与我的定
义有关，但正如你将看到的，我对主权的定义可能会让你的身体-自我-社会程序—你所认
同为你的那部分—感到有点超现实。我唯一的建议是，在你阅读这部分(如果不是整篇文
章)时有意识地引导你的头脑保持开放和探索精神。
4 To understand the Sovereign, we need to first understand what is meant by the higher self.
4 要理解Sovereign，我们首先需要理解更高自我 是什么意思。
4为了理解主权体，我们需要首先理解更高自己是指什么。
4要理解主权，我们首先需要理解更高自我的含义。
5 In nearly every definition of the higher self that I have studied, it is a singular entity, paired
with a specific body and represents the spiritualized center of the personality of the individual
it serves. It is a relatively new form of thinking about the soul or inner spirit of an individual.
It suggests that the higher self shares its wisdom for the purpose of guiding the individual to
a spiritual realization of one kind or another. The higher self is, in every way, a counselor in
the matters of the spiritual life of an individual. It posits that one’s salvation is a personal
process, not necessarily dependent on an outside influence. In general, the higher self is a
more aware version of the body-ego, and more of a spiritual guide for an individual.
24
5 在我研究过的几乎所有对更高的自己（the higher self）的定义中，它都是一个单一的实体，
与一个特定的身体配对，代表它所效劳的个人人格的灵性化中心。这是一种相对较新的，用
来思考个人灵魂或内在精神的形式。它间接表明了更高的自己分享它的智慧是为了引导个人
到达一种或另一种的性灵上的领悟。更高的自己在各方面都是个人性灵生活上的顾问。它断
定说一个人的得救是一种个人的过程，不一定取决于外在的影响。一般来说，更高的自己是
身体-自我 的更清醒版本，更象是个人的灵性向导。
5在我研究过的几乎所有定义中，更高自己都是非凡的实存体，一对一地配对于一个
特定身体，代表着它所服务的该个体的灵性化人格中心。这是一种帮我们思考个体的
灵魂或内在之灵的新形式。这些定义认为，更高自己会分享自己的智慧，目的是引导
个体走向这种或那种灵性体认。更高自己，在每个方面，都是个体灵性生活里各项事
务的顾问。这些定义断言，一个人的救赎是个人化的过程，不必依赖外在影响力。总
之，更高自己是身体-伊格的一个更为觉知的版本，主要是个体的灵性指导者。
5 在我研究过的几乎每一个关于高我（更高的自己）的定义中，它都是一个单独的实体，与
一个特定的身体配对，代表着它所服务的个体人格的灵性中心。这是一种相对较新的思考个
人灵魂或内在灵性的方式。它表明高我分享它的智慧，目的是引导个体实现某种或另一种灵
性境界。在任何方面，高我都是个人灵性生活事务的顾问。它假设一个人的救赎是个人的过
程，并不一定依赖于外界的影响。一般来说，高我是身体-自我的一个更有意识的版本，也
是个人的灵性向导。
6 The higher self is not the same as the human soul. Similarly, the Sovereign is not the same
as the higher self.
6 更高的自己 不同于 人类的灵魂。同样的，Sovereign 与 更高的自己 不同。
6更高自己不同于人类灵魂。同理，主权体也不同于更高自己。
6 高我和人类灵魂是不一样的。同样，主权者与高我并不相同。
7 In the case of the Sovereign, in the nondual realm, it is the collected identity of each
dimension of consciousness (level), and each state of existence (lifetime). The Sovereign is
aware of the nondual Integral and is consciously seeking to unite with its state of
consciousness in order to experience the Sovereign Integral consciousness.
7 就 Sovereign 而言，在非二元领域，它是每一个意识的次元（层次）和每一个存在状态（每
个生生世世）的集合身份。Sovereign 可以知觉到非二元的 Integral，并有意识地寻求与
Integral 的意识状态结合，以体验 Sovereign Integral 意识。
7就主权体而言，在非二元领域，它是一个分形集⑫身份，集合起了自身所辖的所有
意识维度（层级）和所有存在性状态（生命期）。主权体知觉到了非二元的积分态，
并始终有意识地寻求联合上积分态的意识状态，从而体验主权性积分态意识。
7 在主权者的情况下，在非二元性领域中，它是每个意识维度(层次)和每个存在状态(生命)
汇集而成的身份。主权意识到非二元性整体，并有意识地寻求与它的意识状态相结合，以体
验主权整体意识。
8 In the realm of duality, where the body-ego of all humanity defines our shared reality, what
I refer to in this paper as the collective Social Program, the Sovereign inhabits the mind,
emotions and body-ego, not unlike an astronaut inhabits a space suit.
25
8 在二元性的领域里，全人类的 身体-自我 定义了我们共享的实相，我在本文中称之为
「集体的社会程序设定」，Sovereign 栖据在脑力、情感和 身体-自我 中，与航天员栖据在
太空衣里没两样。
8在二元性领域，全体人类的身体-伊格界定着我们的共享实相，在本文中，共享实相
又被称为集体社会编程，主权体栖息进心智、情感、身体-伊格中，跟宇航员栖身太空
服并无不同。
8 在二元性的领域里，所有人类的身体-自我定义了我们共同的现实，我在这篇文章中称之
为集体的社会程序，主权者栖居在头脑、情感和身体-自我里，就像宇航员穿着宇航服一样。
图2
9 You could say that the unfractured Sovereign lives in the nondual realm, while the fractured
Sovereign lives in duality. The fractured and unfractured are one, individualized, infinite
identity, however, the veils of duality and the body-ego obscure the Sovereign and the Integral,
to the point where it becomes doubtful that they even exist or if they are believed to exist,
their definitions are narrowed in scope and function.
9 你可以说，「未被碎开的 Sovereign」（the unfractured Sovereign）存在于非二元领域，而
「被碎断开了的 Sovereign」（the fractured Sovereign）则存在于二元领域。「被碎断开的」
26
和「未被碎开的」是同一个、个体化了的、无限的身份，然而，二元性的面纱和 身体-自我
掩蔽了 Sovereign 以及 Integral，到了它们的存在甚至变得可疑的地步，或者，如果它们被
相信是存在的，它们的定义在范围和功能上也被缩小了。
9你可以说，无缝连续的主权体存在于非二元领域，有缝离散的主权体存在于二元性
领域。有缝离散与无缝连续是一体的、个性化的、无限的本体，但是，二元面纱和身
体-伊格，将主权体和积分态遮蔽到到如此程度，以至于身体-伊格变得疑惑，这2者
是否存在，而就算相信其存在，它们在范围规模和功能上的界定被大大缩小了。
9 你可以说，未分裂的主权者生活在非二元性世界里，而分裂的主权者生活在二元性世界。
分裂和未分裂是合一的、个体化、无限的身份，然而，二元性的面纱和身体-自我掩盖主权
和整体到了这种程度，使得甚至连它们的存在都是可疑的，或即使人们相信它们是存在的，
它们的定义在范围和功能上也是狭窄的。
10 The important thing to understand is that the Sovereign inhabits lifetimes across species,
gender, time and space; and it operates across dimensions in each of those lifetimes. This is
the process through which each Sovereign is infinitely unique and individualized. The
consciousness that defines the total individual is the Sovereign. The goal of an individual can
be to align the dimensional Selves of a particular lifetime and express the core Sovereign
through all dimensions of that life, allowing the Sovereignー the core Sovereignーto fuse with
the body-ego, and to an extent, reduce the drag, inertia and gravity of the Social Program.
10 需要了解的重点是，Sovereign 跨越物种、性别、时间和空间 栖据在那些生生世世中；
并且它跨越次元地在那些生生世世的每一个里运作。藉由这种过程，每个 Sovereign 都是无
限独特和个体化了的。是 Sovereign 的意识在定义全部的个体。一个个体的目标可以是藉由
「该次生命的所有范围」来把「特定一生的次元性自性」对齐「核心 Sovereign」，并且表
达出「核心 Sovereign」，以允许 Sovereign——核心 Sovereign——与 身体-自我 接合，并
在一定程度上减少「社会程序设定」的阻力、惰性和引力。
10重要的是理解，主权体栖息的各个生命期，横跨了种族、性别、时间和空间；在每
次生命期内，它的运作又纵贯了多重维度。正是因为这样的运作方式，每个主权体就
是完全独一无二和个性化的。界定着这样的总体个性的意识即是主权体。个体的目标
即：将所在生命期内各维度的自己彼此校准，并将核心主权体表达进该生命期的所有
维度，容许主权体——核心主权体——来熔合上身体-伊格，直至足够减弱社会编程
的拖拽、惯性和引力。
10 重要的是要明白，主权者一生都居住在不同的物种、性别、时间和空间中;它在每个生
命周期中都是跨维度的。在这个过程中，每一个主权者都是无限独特和个体化的。定义整个
个体的意识是主权。个体的目标可以对齐特定一世的维度自我，并通过该生命的所有维度表
达核心主权，允许主权—核心主权—与身体-自我融合,并在一定程度上，减少社会程序的阻
力、惯性和重力。
11 Fractals, oddly enough, are important to understand in order to envision the Sovereign. A
fractal is a recurring pattern, mathematically generated, that repeats at infinitely higher and
lower scales. In other words, fractals appear the same at different levels of scale, but scale
itself confers a special meaning to a particular level. The concept of Sovereign, for example, is
not merely cloned at different levels, it changes in complexity, meaning, vibration, expression,
and life force on each level, and this is because each level evokes a different Sovereign through
the Social Program, which itself, varies from level to level of consciousness.
27
11 *奇怪的是，为了预想 Sovereign，理解 碎形 很重要。碎形是一种循环模式，以数学方式
生成，以无限高和无限低的尺度重复。换句话说，碎形在不同尺度的层次上看起来是一样的，
但尺度本身赋予特定层次一种特殊的含义。例如，Sovereign 的概念不仅仅是在不同层次上
被复制，它在每个层次上的复杂性、意义、振动、表达和生命力都发生了变化，这是因为每
个层次都透过「社会程序设定」唤起了不同的 Sovereign，而「社会程序设定」本身，就是
因意识的层次不同而变化的。
11说来奇怪，分形学对于理解进而想象主权体非常之重要。分形是一种数学引发的重
复模式，该模式在更高和更低尺度都无限重复。换句话说，分形在不同层级的尺度下
都显得相同，但不同的尺度本身则为特定层级赋予了特殊意义。举例而言，主权体的
概念，并不仅仅是被克隆于不同层级这么简单，在每个层级，它的复杂度、意义、振
动、表达、生命力量都在发生变化，这是因为每个层级都通过社会编程唤起了一个不
同的主权体，而社会编程本身，在各意识层级是彼此不同的。
11奇怪的是，理解分形对于想象主权很重要。分形是一种循环的模式，用数学方法生成，在
无限高和无限低的尺度上重复。换句话说，在不同的尺度上，分形是相同的，但尺度本身赋
予了特定的尺度以特殊的意义。例如，主权的概念不仅仅是在不同层次上的克隆，它在每个
层次上都改变了它的复杂性、意义、振动、表达和生命力，这就是因为每一层都通过社会程
序唤起了一个不同的主权，而社会程序本身在不同层次的意识中是不同的。
*译注：：碎形（或分形 fractals）https://zh.wikipedia.org/wiki/%E5%88%86%E5%BD%A2
12 Fractal geometry, however, is contained between one and three dimensional space. But
what if a fractalーin conceptーcould traverse all known dimensions of consciousness? Dual
and nondual realms? In other words, there is no dimension that can contain it. This is what is
being proposed in this paper. The Sovereign and the Integral are fractal in nature. They are
the fluency between lifetimes (Sovereign) and dimensions (Integral). At whatever scale,
frequency, density or vibration that existence can be, there is both the Sovereign and the
Integral. They are the only intersection of opposites that is fractal.
12 然而，碎形几何被包含在一次元的空间和三次元的空间之间。但是，如果一个碎形－－
在概念上－－可以穿越所有已知的意识的次元呢？（穿越所有）二元与非二元的领域呢？换
句话说，没有任何次元可以容纳它。这就是本文件提出的内容。Sovereign 和 Integral 本质
上是碎形的。它们是生生世世（Sovereign）和这些生生世世的所有次元（Integral）之间的流
畅度。无论那个存在的规模、频率、密度或振动如何，Sovereign 和 Integral 都存在。它们
是对立的碎形之唯一的交集。
12尽管分形几何学只包含1到3维空间。可是如果，仅就概念而非数学理论而言，分
形能够穿行于所有已知的意识维度呢？可以穿行于二元性和非二元领域呢？换句话
说，没有任一维度能够容纳下它（的全部）。这就是本文提出的观点。主权体和积分
态，具有分形化的天然属性。它们流畅地蔓延于各个生命期（实存体）和各个维度（各
层级）。在实存体所在的无论什么尺度、频率、密度或振动，其中都同时存在着主权
体和积分态。实存体的任何层级都仅仅是这2个分形化对立面的交汇。
12 然而，分形几何包含在一维和三维空间之间。但如果一个分形概念能够穿越意识的所有
已知维度?二元和非二元领域呢？换句话说，没有维度可以包含它。这就是本文所提出的。
主权和整体在本质上是分形的。它们是生命(主权)与维度(整体)之间的流畅性。无论存在的
规模、频率、密度或振动是什么，主权和整体都存在。它们是分形中对立面的唯一交集。
28
13 (I did warn you that it would get abstract. I apologize, and in that same breath, I will cite
the cliche: Not everything will sink in the first time you read it.)
13 (我确实警告过你它会变得抽象。我道歉，但同时，我将引用那句老生常谈：不是读
一遍就能理解所有内容的。）
13（我得提醒你，这会很抽象。我很抱歉，与此同时，我要老挑重弹：并非每件事都
会在你初次读到时被完全理解。）
13 (我确实提醒过你它会变得很抽象。我道歉，与此同时，我还要引用一句陈词滥调:“不是
读一遍就能理解所有内容的。
29
图3
14 The diagram above is a visual representation of the Sovereign. (I acknowledge that my
depiction of fractal concepts that flow between dual and nondual realms, like the Sovereign
and Integral, is wrong at the first mark of the pen or tap of the keyboard.)
14 上图是 Sovereign 的视觉描绘。（我承认我对在二元和非二元领域之间流动的碎形概念
的描述，象是 Sovereign 和 Integral，在下笔的第一划或键盘上的第一个敲击，就是错误的。）
14上面的图解是对主权体的视觉化描绘。（声明一下，上段我对分形概念的描述“流
畅地蔓延于二元和非二元领域”，就像“蔓延于主权体和积分态之间”一样，都是最
初的笔误和打字错误。⑬）
14上面的图表是主权的可视化表现。(我承认，我对在二元性和非二元性领域之间流动的分
形概念—比如主权和整体的描述，在我第一次拿起笔或敲击键盘时的描述是错误的。)
15 The Sovereign, in this diagram, is the collector of experience across Levels and Lifetimes. It
is not the Sovereign’s only role or function, but it is a central one. Meaningful experience that
is useful in deepening the Sovereign’s understanding of love, intelligence, interconnection and
expansion, becomes the valuable and vital substance of its existence.
15 在此图中，Sovereign 是跨越层次和生生世世的经验收集者。这不是 Sovereign的唯一角
色或职能，但它是一个核心角色与功能。有助于加深 Sovereign 对爱、智慧、相互连结和扩
张的理解之有意义的经验，变成了其存在的宝贵而重要的质地（或资产）。
15主权体，在该图解中，是横跨所辖各层级、各生命期之体验的收集者。这并非主权
体的唯一角色或功能，但却最主要的一个。富有意义的体验有利于深化主权体⑭对于
爱、智能、交互和扩张的理解，这些体验会变成主权体存在性的珍贵且必不可少的构
成成分。
15在这张图表里，主权是跨层次经验的收集者。它不是主权的唯一角色或职能，但它是中
心的一个角色或职能。有意义的经验有助于加深主权对爱、智慧、相互联系和扩展的理解，
成为其存在的有价值和重要的东西。
30
16 The Sovereign is a singular, yet composite entity that inhabits unnumbered bodies, egos,
times, places, social programs and dimensions. It is not isolated in one lifetime, gender, planet,
or even species. The Sovereign is the core identity of an individual regardless of the life form
it inhabits and the experiences therein. A particular lifetimeー whether as an ant or human,
plant or dolphin, chimpanzee or catーis the experience of a Sovereign in a three-dimensional
species-based reality. The Sovereign experiences these various lifetimes within a specific
species (body-ego5 ), a specific social program of that species and during a specific time and
place.
16 Sovereign 是一个单一但复合的实体，栖据于无数的身体、自我、时间、地点、社会程
序设定 和 次元中。它不是被孤立在一次生命、性别、行星甚至物种中的。无论其栖据的生
命形式和在其中的经历如何，Sovereign 都是个体的核心身份。特定的一生——无论是作为
蚂蚁还是人类、植物还是海豚、黑猩猩还是猫——都是一个 Sovereign 在一个 三次元的、
以物种为基础的实相里的体验。Sovereign 在一个特定的物种（身体-自我
5
）、该物种的一
个特定的社会程序设定，以及特定的时期和地点里面，来经历这些不同的生生世世。
16主权体是独一无二的复合实存体，栖息在数不清的身体、伊格、时间、地点、社会
编程和维度里。它并不孤存于单个生命期、性别、行星、甚至物种内。无论栖息在何
种生命形态及其体验中，主权体都是个体的核心本体。特定的生命期——无论是蚂蚁、
人类、植物、海豚、黑猩猩还是猫——都是主权体在三维物种实相内的体验。主权体
在特定的时间和地点、特定物种（身体-伊格(5)）、以及该物种的特定社会编程中，体
验着各异生命期。
16 主权是一个单一而又复合的实体，它居住在无数的身体、自我、时间、地点、社会程序
和维度中。它在一次生命，性别，星球，甚至物种中都不是孤立的。主权是一个个体的核心
身份，无论它居住的生命形式和它在其中的经验如何。一个特定的一生，无论是作为蚂蚁还
是人类，植物还是海豚，黑猩猩还是猫，都是一个以物种为基础的三维现实中的主权的经历。
主权在特定的时间和地点，在一个特定的物种的（身体-自我（注5）），该物种的一个特定
的社会程序里和特定的时空里经历这些不同的生命。
17 The Sovereign is the prism, the Integral is the light, the lifetimes are the colors, and the
levels or dimensions in which the lifetimes play out, are the stage. The Sovereign is agnostic
as to the body-ego-social program. They are all of value. Each contributes to the broadening
and deepening of its understanding of the Integral, guiding its synthesis to the Sovereign
Integral consciousness.
17 Sovereign 是稜镜，Integral 是光，生生世世是颜色，而这些生生世世在里面演出的那些
层次或次元则是舞台。Sovereign 对于 身体-自我-社会程序设定 是持不可知论的（is
agnostic）。它们都是有价值的。每个都有助于拓宽和加深它对 Integral的理解，有助于引导
它的综合体到 Sovereign Integral 意识。
17主权体是棱镜，积分态是光，各生命期是色彩，各生命期演出其上的各层级或各维
度是舞台。看待身体-伊格-社会编程时，主权体则抱持不可知论⑮。在它看来，所有
这些都是弥足珍贵的。每一个在做出贡献，拓展和深化着主权体对于积分态的理解，
引导着主权体与积分态的合体态走向主权性积分态意识。
5
动物、昆虫和植物都有一个 Sovereign，即它们的 身体-自我。这是 Sovereign的碎形本质的一部分。
动物、昆虫、植物都拥有一个主权体，即它们的身体-伊格。这是主权体分形性质的一部分。
动物、昆虫和植物都有一个主权，那就是它们的身体-自我。这是主权分形本质的一部分。
31
17 主权是棱镜，整体是光，生命是颜色，而生命所表现出来的层次或维度是舞台。主权对
于身体-自我的社会程序是不可知论的。它们全都是有价值的。每一个都有助于拓宽和深化
其对整体的理解，引导其合成到主权整体意识。
18 So it is, with the feather of hope that we first learn to fly. In all great, personal
transformations, there is an inception pointーa time and place where the headwaters bubble
to the surface. It starts with a trickle of water that turns into a stream that turns into a creek
that turns into a river that turns into a larger river that empties into an ocean. This is the way
of life under the lens of time, and while the Sovereign Integral is not of time, the Sovereign
and the Integral dwell in duality, and are therefore subject to time.
18 正是如此，带着希望的羽翼，我们首先学会了飞翔。在所有伟大的个人转变中，都有一
个起始点——一个时间和地点，（河流的）源头在这个时间和地点浮出表面。它始于零星的
水滴，然后变成水流，然后成为一条小溪，然后变成一条河流，然后变成一条更大的河流，
然后注入大海。这就是在时间的镜头下的生命历程，虽然 Sovereign Integral 不属于时间，
但 Sovereign 和 Integral 居住在二元性中，因此会受制于时间。
18确实如此，藉由希望之羽，我们第一次学会了飞翔。在所有伟大的个人转变中，都
存在着一个起始点——一个时间和地点，从这里源水咕噜出了地面。它始于水滴，转
变成小溪，接着小河，然后大河，再转变成大江，最后倾空汇入海洋。这就是时间镜
头之下，生命的道路，尽管主权性积分态不属于时间，主权体和积分态却栖身在二元
性，因而服从于时间。
18 正是这样，带着希望的羽毛，我们首先学会飞翔。在所有伟大的个人转变中，都有一个
起始点—一个时间和地点。源头从这里浮出水面，从涓涓细流开始，然后变成一条小溪。变
成一条河，变成了一条更大的河流流入大海。这是时间镜头下的生命方式，虽然主权整体不
是时间，但是主权和整体居住在二元性中，因此而受制于时间。
19 The body-ego is the temporal Sovereign of human reality, just as the mind is the temporal
Sovereign in the mental realm. Each level, a new Sovereign identity exists. The Sovereign is
an interdimensional fractal6 of individualized consciousness. That is, it moves across
dimensions or levels, and while these different expressions of a Sovereign may appear
similar in nature, at each new level of consciousness, a difference emerges from the unique
experiences of the Sovereign’s existence within that particular level and lifetime.
19 身体-自我 是人类实相暂时的 Sovereign，正如心智（脑力）是脑力的领域里暂时的
Sovereign 一样。每个层次，都有一个新的 Sovereign 身份存在着。Sovereign 是「个体化
了的意识」的一种 跨次元的碎形
6
。也就是说，它跨越那些次元或层次而移动，虽然一个
Sovereign 的这些不同的表达在本质上可能看起来相似，但在每一个新的意识层次上，在那
特定的层次和一生内，一种差异会从「Sovereign 的存在之那些独特的经验」里浮现出来。
19身体-伊格是人类实相中的时间化主权体，就像心智是心理领域内的时间化主权
体。每个层级，都存在着一个新的主权体身份。主权体是个别化意识的一种交互维
度分形(6)。这就是说，主权体的移行于各维度或各层级，尽管它的这些不同体验在
6
Interdimensional Fractal Concept (IFC) 定义见162段/被定义在 段落 163 里......
32
性质上显得相似，但在每一个新的意识层级，源于主权体存在性在该特定层级和生
命期内的独一无二体验，一种差异性浮现出来。
19 身体-自我是人类现实暂时的主权，正如头脑是智力领域暂时的主权一样。每一层次都
有一个新的主权身份存在。主权是个体意识的跨维度分形（注6）。也就是说,它在维度或
层次之间移动，虽然主权者的这些不同的表达本质看起来是相似的，但是在每一个新的意
识层次上，在那个特定的层次和生命中，主权存在的独特体验会产生差异。
20 One of the more notable aspects of this definition is that the Sovereign inhabits other
species; it is not confined to the human species. This denotes that all life is sovereign. A
Sovereign could be in the body-ego-social program of an ant, tuna, hawk, giraffe, gorilla,
dragonfly, starfish, apple tree, octopus, in addition to inhabiting a human body-ego and
adjusting to its social program. And that is only earth.
20 该定义中更值得注意的一个方面是，Sovereign 栖据于其他物种；它不仅限于人类。这表
示所有的生命都是至高无上的（译注：sovereign 作为形容词）。除了栖据在一个人类的 身
体-自我 中并适应它的「社会程序设定」之外，一个Sovereign 还可以在蚂蚁、金枪鱼、鹰、
长颈鹿、大猩猩、蜻蜓、海星、苹果树、章鱼的 身体-自我-社会程序设定里面。而那是只有
地球。
20这个定义的一个更为引人瞩目的面向是，主权体会栖息于其他物种；它不局限于人
类物种。这意味着所有生命都是主权性的。一个主权体能够存在于蚂蚁、金枪鱼、老
鹰、长颈鹿、大猩猩、蜻蜓、海星、苹果树、章鱼的身体-伊格-社会编程里，直至栖
息于人类身体-伊格里，并调节适应于人类社会编程。这还仅仅说到了地球上的情形。
20 这个定义的一个更值得注意的方面是，主权栖息在其他物种里，它并不局限于人类物种，
这意味着所有生命都是主权的。一个主权者除了居住在人类的身体-自我和适应它的社会程
序外，还可以居住在蚂蚁、金枪鱼、鹰、长颈鹿、大猩猩、蜻蜓、海星、苹果树、章鱼的身
体-自我-社会程序中，而这还只是地球的情况。
21 The Sovereign represents the interdependence and interconnection with other life forms
and Nature in general. It is, as an interdimensional consciousness, pursuing evolution and
expansion in every reality-dimension of its existence, whether the Sovereign is experiencing
the reality of a moth or a human being. Each species has its own species-specific reality, which
includes the social program for that species and spacetime. The body-ego, in a species-specific
reality, is the species’ interface with the Social Program. Yes, even a yellow-fin tuna or a silver
oak tree has a Social Program that they are immersed within. The Sovereign fills, powers,
learns from, inspires, and expands into the body-ego, interacting with the shared reality of its
species, and following cues from its Social Program.
21 一般来说 Sovereign 代表了与其他生命形式和大自然的相互依存和相互连结。它，作为
一种跨次元的意识，在其存在的每一个 实相-次元 中追求进化和扩张，无论 Sovereign 是
正在体验一只飞蛾或一个人类的实相。每个物种都有它自己的物种-特定的 实相，这「物种
-特定的 实相」就含有为了那个「物种和时空」而存在的社会程序设定。在一个「物种-特定
的 实相」中，身体-自我 是物种与社会程序设定的界面。是的，即使是一只黄鳍金枪鱼或一
棵银橡树也有它们沉浸其中的社会程序设定。Sovereign 填入、供以动力、从中学习、启发
并发展成 身体-自我，与「它的物种共享的实相」互动，并且遵循其社会程序设定的提示。
21这样的主权体就意味着，与其他生命形态进而整个大自然的相互依赖和相互连接。
作为一个交互维度的意识，无论是在体验飞蛾的实相还是人类存在的，主权体都在它
33
所存在于的每个实相-维度里，追求着进化和扩张。每个物种都有自身的物种-特异性
实相，包含了对于该物种及时空的社会编程。在物种-特异性实相中，身体-伊格是该
物种与社会编程间的接口界面。是的，甚至黄鳍金枪鱼或银杉树都有各自沉浸其内的
社会编程。主权体灌注、驱动、学习、启发、扩张于身体-伊格中，去相互作用于该物
种的共享实相，跟进着该物种社会编程的提示信号。
21 主权代表与其他生命形式和自然的相互依存和相互连接。它作为一个多维意识，在它存
在的每一个现实维度中追求进化和扩展，无论主权正在经历一只飞蛾还是一个人的现实。每
个物种都有它自己物种特定的现实，这个现实包括了该物种和时空的社会程序，在一个物种
特定的现实中，身体-自我是物种与社会程序的接口。是的，即使是一条黄鳍金枪鱼或一棵
银橡树也有它们自己的社会程序。主权者注入，力量，学习，激励并扩展到身体自我，与它
的物种共享的现实互动，并且跟随其社会程序的线索。
22 Perhaps, at least to me, this is the most interesting quality of the Sovereign: it is not fixed
in time and space; it is interdimensional. The soul, the higher self, the inner spirit, the atman,
the eternal self, the sons and daughters of Godーthey were all fixed in time and space, that is,
they were attached to a specific human until death. It was our spiritual alter-ego that went on
after death as a spirit-being, usually, to a better place.
22 或许，至少对我来说，这是 Sovereign 最有趣的品质：它并没有被固定在时间和空间里；
它是跨次元（交互于次元间）的。灵魂、更高的自己、内在的灵性、阿特曼、永恒的自己、
上帝的儿女——它们都是固定在时间和空间中的，也就是说，它们直到死亡都依附在一个特
定的人类身上。是我们的没有肉体的「改变了的自我」（our spiritual alter-ego）在死后作为
一个「精神存在体（a spirit-being）」继续存在下去，通常，会去一个更好的地方。
22而至少对我而言，主权体最有趣的特性或许是：它并未被固定在时间和空间内；它
是交互维度的。灵魂、更高自己、内在之灵、阿特曼⑯、永恒自性、上帝儿女——这
些全都被固定在时间和空间内，也就是说，它们至死都被固定于某个特定人类身上。
它们不过是我们灵性化的另一个伊格，死后继续作为灵性-存在，通常是去向某个更
好的地方。
22 也许，至少对我来说，这是主权最有趣的品质：它不是被固定在时间和空间里的;而是跨
维度的。灵魂、高我、内在精神、阿特曼、永恒的自己、上帝的儿女—它们全都是固定在时
间和空间里的，也就是说，他们依附于一个特定的人直到死亡。它是我们精神上的另一个自
我，在死后作为一个灵魂存在体继续存在，通常，去一个更好的地方。
23 However, the Sovereign is not fixed to a particular human being in a particular time and
place. The true Sovereign, not the body-ego, inhabits spacetime, not merely a specific body-
ego. It does not exist in either a single lifetime or a succession of lifetimes, culminating in bliss,
nirvana, heaven, or becoming an angelic teacher. The Sovereign, wearing multiple body-egos
in multiple realities, learns the wisdom of a place and time in order to express and appreciate
the Sovereign Integral consciousness.
23 然而，Sovereign 并不固定在特定的时间和地点的一个特定的人类身上。真正的
Sovereign，而不是 身体-自我，栖据在时空中，但并不仅仅是在一个特定的 身体-自我 里。
它并不只是存在于一世或连续的几世里，最终达到极乐、涅槃、天堂或成为一个天上的老师。
Sovereign，在许多实相里穿着许多的 身体-自我，学习一个地方和时间的智慧，以表达和赞
赏 Sovereign Integral 意识。
34
23然而，主权体并未被固定于一个特定时间、地点里的一个特定人类存在。真正的主
权体，而非那个身体-伊格，是栖息于时空中，而不单单一个特定身体-伊格内的。它
既不是存在于单个生命期，也不是存在于顺序更迭的生命期，去一步步登顶向极乐、
涅槃、天堂、或是成为天使老师。主权体，存在于多重的实相中，身穿着多重的身体
-伊格，学习着不同地点和时间的智慧，以便去表达和赞赏主权性积分态意识。
23 然而，主权并不固定在一个特定时间和地点的一个特定的人类身上。真正的主权者，而
不是身体-自我，居住在时空里而不仅仅呆在一个特定的身体-自我里。它既不存在于单一的
一生里，也不存在于一系列的一生里，达到极乐世界，涅槃，天堂，或成为天使般的老师。
主权，在多重现实中穿着多重身体-自我，学习一个地点和时间的智慧来表达和欣赏主权整
体意识。
24 The Sovereign stays with a particular body-ego for the scope of a lifetime, and then,
somewhat like a revolving door, transitions into a new body-ego-social program. For most,
this transition after death feels like an inertia of their human life just completed. They remain
largely the same in terms of their belief system learned in their just completed human life.
This belief system powers their experience, because the belief system creates intention, and
this intention does not end when the “cord is cut.”
24 Sovereign 在一次生命的范围里都与一个特定的 身体-自我 保持在一起，然后再，有点
象是一个旋转门，过渡进入到一个新的 身体-自我-社会程序设定里。对于大多数人来说，这
种死后的过渡感觉象是他们刚刚完结的人类生活的一种惯性。他们在刚刚完结的人类生活中
所学到的信念系统基本上维持不变。这个信念系统为他们（接下来）的经验提供动力，因为
信念系统创造了意图，而当“绳子被切断”时，这个意图并没有结束。
24主权体跟一个特定身体-伊格待上一个生命期的时间域，然后，有点像是旋转门⑰，
它转场进一个新的身体-伊格-社会编程。对大多数人而言，这种死后的转场，感觉就
像刚完成的那次人类生命的惯性作用。他们的信念系统保有极大相似性，因为信念是
学习自刚刚结束的那次人类生命。这个信念系统驱动着他们的体验，因为信念系统创
造出意图，而意图不会因为“绳索被割断”而终止。
24 在一生的范围内，主权者都和一个特定的身体-自我在一起，然后，有点像旋转门，过渡
到一个新的身体自我-社会程序。对大多数人来说，这种死后的过渡感觉就像是他们刚刚完
成的人类生命的一种惯性。就他们在他们刚刚结束的人类生命里学到的信念系统而言，它们
基本保持不变。这个信念系统为他们的经验提供动力，因为信念系统创造意图，而这个意图
不会在“绳索被割断”时结束。
25 For example, if I am a devout believer in Christianity, my intention is to get into heaven; be
on the right side of Jesus; and reflect the values of Christianity to the best of my human ability.
I am admittedly simplifying this set of intentions, but for the sake of brevity, the belief system
casts the intentions for the individual as a significant part of their Social Program. And after
death, the Sovereign (body-ego version) consolidates their learning and then selects a new
body-ego-social program from an impossibly diverse matrix of realities.
25 例如，如果我是一个虔诚的基督教徒，我的意图是进入天堂；站在耶稣的右边；并尽我
的人类能力所及地反映基督教的价值观。诚然，我简化了这套意图，但我是为了要简洁。信
念系统投射出个人的那些意图，来作为他们的社会程序设定的一个重要的组成部分。然后在
死后，Sovereign（身体-自我 版本）强化他们的学习所得，然后再从一个异乎寻常地多样化
的实相矩阵中选择一个新的 身体-自我-社会程序设定。
35
25举例而言，假如我是基督教的虔诚信徒，我的意图是进入天堂，站在耶稣的右侧，
尽我所能去反映基督教价值观。这里我无疑简化了这套意图，简言之，信念系统投射
出意图，以便个体成为所属社会编程的有效部分。死后，（身体-伊格版本的）主权体
巩固着他们学到的，然后从多样到难以置信的的实相矩阵中，选择了一个新的身体-
伊格-社会编程。
25 例如，如果我是一个虔诚的基督教信徒，我的目的是进入天堂；站在正确的耶稣的一边;
并尽我人类的能力反映基督教的价值观。诚然，我简化了这一套意图，但为了简洁起见，信
念系统为个体投射意图作为他们的社会程序的重要组成部分。在死后，主权(身体-自我的版
本)巩固了他们的学习，然后从一个难以置信地多样化的现实矩阵中选择了一个新的身体-自
我-社会程序。
26 This gives intrinsic value to all life, because all life hosts a Sovereign. This is, in part, why
the Sovereign Integral is inclusive of all things. It enfolds all things. It inhabits all things. It is all
things. It answers the call as to why human culture needs to embody this fundamental premise
of equality, and why our collective Social Program, over time, will include this perspective.
Equality, in this definition, is wholeness. It is not the equality of “we are the same”. The true
Sovereign is the core identity of all life in whatever form it takes, and in whatever spacetime
it expresses itself.
26 这赋予了所有生命 内在的价值，因为所有的生命里面都有一个 Sovereign。这就是为什
么 Sovereign Integral 包含了所有事物的部分原因。它包含了一切。它栖据在所有的事物里。
它是所有的一切。它回应了「为什么人类文化需要体现平等的基本前提，以及为什么随着时
间的推移，我们的集体社会程序设定将包括这一观点」的呼吁。平等，在这个定义中，是整
体性的感觉（wholeness）。它不是“我们都是一样的”的平等。真正的 Sovereign 是所有生命
的核心身份，无论它采取任何形式，在任何时空中表达它自己。
26这个选择的过程，赋予了所有生命与生俱来的内在价值，因为所有生命都寄居着一
个主权体。这就是部分的原因，为什么我们会说，主权性积分态是包罗一切事物的。
它包裹着一切事物。它栖息于一切事物中。它就是一切事物。主权性积分态的存在性
本身就是下述呼求的答案：为什么人类文明需要包含平等这个根本前提；为什么我们
的集体社会编程，随着时间推移，将会纳入这种视角。在这层意义上，平等就是整体。
这并非“我们都一样”之类的平等。真正的主权体就是所有生命的核心本体，无论生
命采取了何种形态，表达于哪个时空⑱。
26 这赋予所有生命内在的价值，因为所有生命里面都住宿了一个主权者。这就是主权整体
包含所有事物的部分原因。它包含了一切。它栖居在万物之中。它是所有的一切。它回答了
为什么人类文化需要体现这一平等的基本前提，以及为什么我们的集体社会程序，随着时间
的推移，将包含这一观点的呼吁。平等，在这个定义中，就是整体。这不是“我们是一样的”
的平等。真正的主权是所有生命的核心身份，无论它以什么形式出现，也无论它在什么时空
中表达自己。
27 On planet Earth, approximately 110 billion human beings have been born since human
beings came into existence. Now, consider Nature. How many plants have lived on earth?
How many insects? How many fish? How many mammals? You get my point, life on earth, as
part of what we call Nature, is near-infinite in number. The Sovereign consciousness has
been shaped through human life forms and Nature, if it were not, how could the Integral
exist?
36
27 在地球上，自人类诞生以来，已经有大约 1100 亿人被生出来。那么，再想一下大自
然。地球上曾经生活过多少植物？有多少昆虫？几条鱼？有多少哺乳动物？你明白我的意
思了吧，地球上的生命，作为我们所谓的大自然的一部分，数量近乎无限。Sovereign 意识
已经藉由「人类生命形式」和 大自然 而被形塑了，如果没有，Integral 怎么可能存在？
27在行星地球，自从人类存在以来，已有近一千一百亿人类存在诞生。现在，再想
想大自然。多少生命曾生活于地球？多少昆虫？多少鱼类？多少哺乳动物？你理解
我的意思吧，地球上的生命，作为我们所谓大自然的一部分，其数量是近乎无限
的。主权体意识一直被人类生命形态和大自然塑造着，如果不是这样，积分态又如
何可能存在？
27 自人类诞生以来，地球上大约有1100亿人出生过。现在,考虑一下大自然。地球上曾经
生活过多少植物?多少昆虫?多少条鱼?哺乳动物呢?你明白我的意思了吧，地球上的生命，
作为我们所谓的大自然的一部分，在数量上几乎是无限的。主权意识已经通过人类生命的
形式和大自然而被塑造了，如果不是这样，整体怎么可能存在?
28 The Sovereign is the student of duality. It is as much the confused human as the
enlightened soul. For what purpose does the Sovereign journey into a life form? To learn? To
experience? To understand? To embody the Integral perspective? The Sovereign is always in
the state of expansion to the Integral, even when the body-ego seems bent on tribalism and
competition.
28 Sovereign 是二元性的学习者。它既是 困惑的人类 也是 开悟的灵魂。Sovereign 进入
一个生命形式的目的是什么？学习？去体验？去理解？体现Integral 的观点？Sovereign 总
是在向 Integral 扩张的状态中，即使 身体-自我 似乎偏向于部落主义和竞争。
28主权体是二元性学习者。主权体身为人类就有多困惑混沌，身为灵魂有多明晰灿
烂。可是它旅行进一个生命形态又是为了什么目的？学习？体验？理解？具体体现出
积分性的视角？主权体始终处于扩张向积分态的状态，即使身体-伊格看上去执着于
部落主义和竞争时。
28 主权是二元性的学生。它既是迷茫的人，同时也是觉醒的灵魂。主权进入一个生命形式
的目的是什么?学习?体验?理解?体现“整体”的观点?主权总是处于向整体扩张的状态，即使
当身体-自我似乎倾向于部落主义和竞争的时候。
37
图解4
29 A critical element in the definition of the Sovereign is the level of intelligence that we place
on the unfractured Sovereignーthe collected identity. The soul was created in the image of
38
humans. That is to say, that the soul is essentially a good version of us that just happens to
live eternally, and just happens to share occupancy with our body-ego on planet earth. If the
soul is the creation of humankind, it is reasonable to hypothesize that its intelligence is
bounded by human intelligence. While there is no IQ test for the soul, generally, those who
believe in the soul, would say it is very smart. Certainly smarter than a human being, but how
much smarter? How much more aware?
29 在 Sovereign 的定义中的一个关键要素是，我们怎么看待「未被碎开的Sovereign」——
聚集的身份（collected identity）－－的智能水平。灵魂是被以人类的形象创造出来的。也就
是说，灵魂本质上是一个我们的「好的版本」，只是碰巧永远活着，并且碰恰在地球上与我
们的 身体-自我 一起入住（在身体里）。如果灵魂是人类的创造物，那么假设说它的智能
受到人类智能的限制是合理的。虽然没有灵魂的智商测验，但一般相信灵魂的人会说它很聪
明。当然比人类更聪明，但聪明多少呢？更能觉察多少呢？
29定义主权体的一个关键要素是，我们将无缝连续主权体——收集者本体——定位
于什么智能层级。（所谓的）灵魂是以人类形象创造出来的。这就是说，这个灵魂基
本上就是我们的优质版本，恰巧永远存在，恰巧合居于行星地球的身体-伊格里。既
然灵魂是人类的产物，就可以合理地假定：它的智能是以人类智能为界的。尽管没有
灵魂IQ测试，但一般而言，信仰灵魂的人们会说，它是非常聪明的。无疑比人类存
在聪明，但聪明多少呢？又更为知觉多少呢？
29 主权的定义中的一个关键因素，是我们判断一个未分形的主权—聚集的身份—的智慧层
次。灵魂是按照人类的形象创造的。也就是说，灵魂本质上是我们的一个好的版本，只是碰
巧永恒地活着，而且碰巧在地球上与我们的身体-自我共享空间。如果灵魂是人类的创造物，
那么假设它的智力受到人类智力的限制就是有道理的。虽然灵魂没有智商测试，但一般来说，
那些相信灵魂存在的人会说它很聪明。肯定比人类聪明，但聪明多少？更有意识多少呢？
30 The Sovereign, as the student of duality, is marginalized by the body-ego-social program.
This expresses itself in the tribalistic ownership of concepts like spiritual enlightenment or
truth or social value or the best path to heaven. The Sovereign is diluted to such an extent
that it has become a human soul tethered to one body, one species, at one time, with one
goal: live in eternal bliss. The Sovereign’s intelligence is of a different order. Its intelligence is
the expression of the nondual within the worlds of duality. It is the intelligence of merging the
Sovereign with the Integral for the purpose of generating beauty, wisdom and love.
30 Sovereign，作为二元性的学习者，被 身体-自我-社会程序设定 边缘化了。这件事表现在
族群所拥有的，对灵性启蒙、真理、社会价值或「通往天堂的最佳道路」等概念上。Sovereign
被稀释到如此的程度，以致于它变成了一个人的灵魂，一度被束缚在一个身体，一个物种，
只有一个目标：生活在永恒的极乐中。Sovereign 的智能是不同的。它的智能是要在「二元
的世界」里表达出「非二元」。那是要把 Sovereign 和 Integral 合并的智能，目的是要产生
美感、智慧 与 爱。
30主权体，身为二元性学习者，却被身体-伊格-社会编程边缘化了。这就表现在对特
定概念的部落主义所有权上，诸如灵性启蒙、真理、社会价值、天堂之路。主权体的
概念被稀释到如此程度，以至成了这样一个人类灵魂，被栓系于一个身体、一个物种、
一个时间、带着一个目标：生活于永恒的极乐中。主权体的智能属于完全不同的层次。
它的智能是二元性诸世界内的非二元性表达。这是一种融合性的智能，会将主权体融
合于积分态，从而去引发美、智慧和爱。
39
30 主权，作为二元性的学生，被身体-自我-社会程序所边缘化。这表现在部落对灵性启蒙、
真理、社会价值或通往天堂的最佳路径等概念拥有的解释权上。主权被稀释到如此程度，以
至于它已经成为拴在一个身体上，一个物种上，一段时间里，带着一个目标:生活在永恒的
极乐中—的一个灵魂。主权的智慧是不同的。它的智慧是二元世界中非二元性的表达。它是
为了产生美、智慧与爱而将主权与整体相融合的智慧。
图5
31 There may be some of you, who, in looking around at human culture, wonder how it would
be possible for an interdimensional entity with the intelligence of a Sovereign, as defined in
this Section, to be so corrupted, so utterly distorted and seemingly disempowered. Why would
such an intelligent being allow its own diminishment? The simple answer is that the “veils of
duality” enable separation from the core, nondual Sovereign. This is precisely what the
Sovereign desiresーfreedom from the nondual in order to explore duality without memory of
its Integral nature. It can then, as a consequence, experience the full spectru
31 你们中可能有一些人，在环顾人类文化时，会感到怀疑，一个具有 Sovereign智能的跨
次元存有，如本节所定义的，怎么可能如此堕落，如此完全扭曲和看似被剥夺了权力。为什
么这样一个有智能的存在体会容许自己被削弱？简单的答案是，“二元性的面纱”使得（被碎
断开了的 Sovereign）与核心的、非二元的Sovereign 分离了。但这正是 Sovereign 所希望的
——摆脱非二元性，以便在不记得它的整体的天性（its Integral nature）的情况下，来探索二
元性。因此，结果是，它可以全方位地体验 爱-恨、善-恶、赢-输、优-劣 和千变万化的二
元性变奏。m of love-hate, good-evil, win-lose, superior-inferior and a thousand variations of
duality.
31一些人在人类文明中四下游历时，或许会生出疑惑，本节所定义的这个拥有主权体
智能的交互维度实存体，怎么可能如此堕落，如此彻底的失真畸变、看上去如此失去
力量。为什么这样一个智能存在体会容许自己的贬缩？简单地说，答案就是：“二元
面纱”导致了与非二元的核心主权体的分裂。这却恰恰是主权体所渴望的——脱离非
二元性，从而在探索二元性时，不带有关于积分态本质的记忆。作为结果，它能够体
验到全频谱的爱-恨、善-恶、赢-输、高-低、以及数以千计的二元性变奏。
40
31 也许你们中的有些人，在审视人类文化的时候，想知道一个拥有主权智慧的跨维度实体
怎么可能如此堕落，如此完全地扭曲，而且似乎被剥夺了力量。为什么如此有智慧的生物会
允许自己被削弱呢?简单的回答是，“二元性的面纱”使之与核心、非二元主权分离。这正是
主权所渴望的—从非二元世界中解脱出来，以探索二元世界而没有关于它整体本质的记忆。
因此，它可以体验爱和恨、善与恶、赢与输、优与劣以及上千种不同的二元性。
32 The fractal matrix of the Sovereign (i.e., Levels and Lifetimes across species and spacetime)
is the defining imprint of the Sovereign. We can only imagine the intelligence of such an entity,
particularly as it centers its intention on the Integral consciousness. The Sovereign is not the
phenomenon. It is the consciousnessーthe experiencer. The phenomenon is the Integral. The
phenomenon of cosmic visions or even the random Déjà vu or drug-induced hallucination are
not necessarily desirable and certainly not required experiences. They attract recurrence,
because they resonate with the body-ego and carry less abstraction than consciousness itself.
The body-ego can become somewhat addicted to phenomenalistic experienceーseeking it as
a means to satisfy the glamor-seeking of the ego or to establish a sense of proof for the mind.
32 Sovereign 的碎形矩阵（即跨越物种和时空的那些层次和生生世世）是Sovereign 之特征
的决定性印记。像这样一个存有的智能，特别是当它的意图集中在 Integral 意识上时，我们
只能用想象的。Sovereign 不是现象。它是意识-体验者。现象是 Integral。宇宙幻景，甚至
是随机的「似曾相识」或「药物引起的幻觉」之现象，不一定是值得拥有的，当然也不会是
必需的经验。它们会引起反复发生，因为它们与 身体-自我 产生共鸣，并且比意识本身不
抽象。身体-自我 可能会变得有点沉迷于现象的经验——寻求它作为一种满足自我寻求魅力
的手段，或者为心智（脑力）建立起一种证明感。
32主权体的分形化矩阵（亦即：横跨物种和时空的各个层级和各生命期）是主权体最
具决定性的印记。对于这样的实存体，尤其当其还将意图聚焦于积分态意识时，我们
理解它之智能的唯一方式就是去想象它。主权体并非现象性⑲的。它是意识——是体
验者。现象是（二元性中的）积分性 。不过，宇宙视象、随机既视感、药物幻觉，这
类现象则未必合意，确实无需去体验。它们会诱使人们去重现，因为它们共振于身体
-伊格，并传递来较低的抽象幻象而非意识本身。身体-伊格可能会变得多少上瘾于现
象化体验——寻求将其作为手段，去满足伊格的魔力-追求，或是给予心智一种证据
感。
32 主权的分形矩阵(即跨物种和时空的层次和生命周期)是主权的定义印记。我们只能想象
这样一个实体的智慧，尤其是当它的意图集中在整体意识上时，主权不是现象。它是意识—
体验者。现象就是整体。宇宙视野或甚至是随机的似曾相识或药物引起的幻觉等的想象，不
一定是可取的，当然也不是必需的经验。它们引起反复出现，因为它们与身体-自我产生共
鸣，而且比意识本身携带更少的抽象。身体-自我可能会变得有点沉迷于现象经验—寻找它
来满足自我的魅力追求或为头脑建立一种证明的感觉。
33 The Sovereign perceives life as an expansion of identity that deepens understanding
initially through the curiosity of phenomenon, however, this curiosity gives way to the mental
models of pure consciousness. The expansion of identity can be nuanced so finely as to be
perceived as no change, and again, it is because this is an internal shift of consciousness, not
phenomenon. Not the stories of phenomenon, but the subtle changes in one’s consciousness
and perspective that nourish the Integral. Each of us, as Sovereigns, are feeding the Integral
consciousness within us, and also outside of us through our personal Social Program.
41
33 Sovereign 将生命视为一种「身份的扩展」，最初是透过「对现象的好奇」来加深理解，
然而，这种好奇心让位于纯粹意识的一些脑力模式。身份的扩展可以细微到让人觉得没有变
化，而再一次地，那是因为这是意识的 内在 转变，而不是现象。不是现象的故事，而是滋
养着 Integral 的，在一个人的意识和观点上的微妙变化。作为 Sovereigns，我们每个人都在
藉由我们的「个人社会程序设定」来喂养在我们里面同时也在外面的 Integral 意识。
33主权体将生命视为一种可以深化自身理解的本体扩张，最初是经由对于现象的好
奇，但是，好奇最终会让位于纯粹意识心理模型。本体的扩张可能表现得如此细微，
以至被认为从未改变，重申一次，这是因为本体扩张是一种内在的意识转变，而非现
象学的。它无关于现象的故事，只关乎个体意识和视角发生了细微的改变，来滋养积
分态。我们每个人，身为主权体，一直在喂食我们内在的积分态意识，同时又通过我
们的个人社会编程，喂食着我们外在的积分态意识⑳。
33 主权者将生命视为一种身份的扩展，最初是通过对现象的好奇心加深理解，然而，这种
好奇心让位于纯粹意识的心理模式。身份的扩展可以微妙到让人认为没有变化，再次，这是
因为这是一种内在意识的转变，而不是一种现象。不是现象的故事，而是在一个人的意识和
视角中滋养整体的细微变化。我们每个人，作为主权，都在通过我们个人的社会程序喂养我
们内部和外部的整体意识。
34 Consciousness is the one thing that we always are. Our body-ego will dissolve back into
nothingness, but the Sovereign that is us, is always existent, always experiencing. It is our
presence in this world that carries on. It is that eternal flame of curiosity that we are each a
part of. It is as much our origin, as it is our destiny.
34 意识是我们始终都是的那个东西。我们的 身体-自我 将消溶回到空无，但我们所是的
Sovereign，永远是存在的，永远在体验。它是继续存在下去的「我们在这个世界上的临在」。
它是那个我们每个人都是其一部分的，好奇心的永恒火焰。它既是我们的起源，也是我们的
命运。
34意识就是我们始终所是之物。我们的身体-伊格会溶解成无物，但我们之所是的主
权体，会始终存在，一直体验。它是我们在这个世界内的持续临在性。它是永恒的好
奇火焰，我们全都是它的一部分。它既是我们的起源，亦是我们的天命。
34 意识是我们一直存在的东西。我们的身体-自我会消失，但是主权的我们，永远存在，永
远体验。是我们在这个世界上延续的存在。它是永不熄灭的好奇心之火焰，我们都是其中的
一部分，它是我们的起源，也是我们的命运。
35 Yet, the attention it attracts from the body-ego, in most of us, is trifling at best when
compared to the time and attention we pay to our body-ego. The attraction of the Sovereign
to the body-ego can only be felt and imagined by the body-ego. This is why the practice of the
heart virtues7 is important, because through them, we can access the Noble Mind and utilize
the imaginative faculty therein, allowing us to imagine the subtle finery of the Sovereign
consciousness, and inviting it into our body-ego as an equal.
35 然而，它从 身体-自我 那里吸引到的注意力，对我们大多数人来说，与我们花在 身体
-自我 上的时间和注意力相比，充其量也是微不足道的。Sovereign 对身体-自我 的吸引力
只能由 身体-自我 来感受和想象。这就是为什么心之美德
7
的实践很重要，因为藉由它们，
7
Heart virtues, as presented in the WingMakers materials, consist of six primary behaviors: appreciation,
compassion, forgiveness, humility, understanding and valor. When they are expressed, these behaviors are
bestowed to the Sovereign, not to the body-ego. The expression of the heart virtues is both to oneself and
42
我们可以接取到「崇高的脑力（心智）」并利用在里面的「想象力机能」，让我们想象 Sovereign
意识微妙的华丽服饰，并邀请它以一个对等的身份（as an equal）来进入我们的 身体-自我。
35然而，对大多数人而言，相较于我们给予身体-伊格的时间和注意力，主权体从身
体-伊格那里吸引来的注意力却是微不足道的。主权体对于身体-伊格的吸引，只能被
身体-伊格感觉到或想象到。所以才会说，心脏美德(7)实践如此之重要，因为经由它
们，我们才能够接入恢弘心智，去利用其中的想象官能，从而容许我们来想象主权体
意识的精微外饰，并邀请它进入我们的身体-伊格来作为平等参与者。
35 然而，对我们大多数人来说，它从身体-自我吸引来的注意力，与我们花在身体-自我上
的时间和注意力相比，充其量是微不足道的。主权对身体-自我的吸引力只能由身体-自我来
感知和想象。这就是为什么练习心之美德是重要的，因为通过它们，我们可以接触到崇高的
头脑并利用那里的想象力，让我们能够想象主权意识微妙的华服，并邀请它平等地进入我们
的身体-自我。
any life form that shares our spacetime (the infinite moment).
心之美德，如造翼者资料中所展示的，包括了六种主要行为：赞赏与感激、慈悲、宽恕、谦卑、理解和勇
气。 当它们被表达出来时，这些行为是献给 Sovereign 的，而不是 身体-自我。心之美德的表达是对自
己 以及 共享我们的时空（无限的当下）的任何生命形式 的。
原注7：出现在造翼者资料中的心脏美德，构成以6种主要的行为：赞赏、慈悲、宽恕、谦逊、
理解、勇气。当被表达时，这些行为被授予给了主权体，而非身体-伊格。心脏美德的表达同时
既指向个体自身，也指向共享我们时空的（无穷尽的当下时刻的）任意生命形态。
在wm的资料中，心之美德包括六个主要行为:赞赏、慈悲、宽恕、谦卑、理解和勇气。当它们被表达出来
时，这些行为被赋予主权，而不是身体-自我。心之美德的表达既是对自己的，也是对任何与我们共享时
空(无限时刻)的生命形式的。
43
图解 6
36 The diagram above represents the process of unfoldment as it pertains to the dual realms
and the Sovereign’s experienceーthrough the body-egoーof innumerable lifetimes, levels and
species. The Sovereign is the activation point of the body-ego in each specific lifetime,
however, the body-ego has free will to reject its invitations of expansion and reality-testing.
The Sovereign is the activational current that sparks the interest of the body-ego in the
Sovereign perspective and from the insights therein, the body-ego can then reinterpret its
personal and collective Social Program. Similarly, the Integral is what activates the Sovereign
to expand into an alignment with its energy and culture. It is the Sovereign Integral that
activates the Integral to amplify its attraction to the Sovereign, in effect, to encourage it to
build a culture of the Sovereign Integral within the species, one Sovereign at a time, knowing
that these maps and modelsーat whatever resolution they appearーattract the activated
Sovereign.
44
36 上图代表了开展的过程，当它涉及了那些二元的领域和 Sovereign 的经验——透过无数
次的生生世世、层次和物种的 身体-自我——时。Sovereign 是每一次特定生命中的 身体-自
我 的活化点，然而，身体-自我 有拒绝对它的扩展和实相测试（reality-testing）之邀请的自
由意志。Sovereign 是触发 身体-自我 对于Sovereign 观点的兴趣的活化之流，而且根据在
Sovereign 观点中的洞察力，身体-自我 可以重新解释其个人的和集体的社会程序设定。类
似地，Integral 活化了Sovereign 去扩张成与 Integral 的能量和文化对齐。而正是 Sovereign
Integral 活化了Integral 以放大它对 Sovereign 的吸引力，实际上是要鼓励 Sovereign 在物
种内建立起一种 Sovereign Integral 的文化，一次活化一个 Sovereign，（Sovereign Integral）
知道说，这些地图和模型——不管它们以任何的分辨率出现——都会吸引被活化了的
Sovereign。
36上面的图解描绘了一个渐次展开的过程。（首先）涉及到二元性领域，主权体经由
身体-伊格体验着无数的生命期、层级和物种。每一个特定生命期，主权体都是身体-
伊格的激活点，但是，身体-伊格也拥有自由意志去拒绝主权体的如下邀请：现实-检
验㉑和扩张。主权体是激活的涌流，激发着身体-伊格去关注主权体视角，而基于主
权体视角带来的洞见，身体-伊格才能重新诠释个人的及集体的社会编程。类似的，
积分态则激活着主权体的扩张，以校准于积分态的能量和文化。主权性积分态则激活
着积分态去扩大它对于主权体的吸引力；就效果而言，就是鼓舞积分态，引导着主权
体们分别各自地行动，从而该物种内构建起主权性积分态的文化，主权性积分态明白，
这些地图和模式——无论呈现的分辨率高低——都会吸引已激活的主权体。
36 上面的图表代表了展开的过程，因为它与二元性领域和主权的经验—通过身体-自我—无
数的生命周期、层次和物种获得有关。主权是身体-自我在每个特定的生命周期中的激活点，
然而，身体-自我有拒绝它的扩展和现实测试的邀请的自由意志。在主权的视角下，主权是
激发身体-自我兴趣的激活电流，从其中的洞见中，身体-自我可以重新解释其个人和集体的
社会程序。类似地，整体激活了主权扩展到与其能量和文化对齐。正是主权整体激活了整体
来放大它对主权的吸引力，实际上是鼓励它在物种内建立一个主权整体的文化，一次一个主
权，知道这些地图和模型—无论它们的清晰度如何—会吸引激活了的主权。
37 There needs to be a relative balance between the Sovereign and the Integral, otherwise
there could be Sovereigns who are ready, but the Integral is too undeveloped in the culture
that the Sovereigns must wait, attaching themselves to familial beliefs or delaying the
expansion of their belief system. Similarly, the Integral could be strongly magnetic yet, there
are very few Sovereigns who are activated and willing to experience and express the Integral.
They lack readiness because they are indifferent to the attraction of the Integral, in that they
desire to live exclusively in the body-ego.
37 Sovereign 和 Integral 之间需要有一种相对的平衡，否则可能会有准备好了的Sovereigns，
但是 Integral 在文化中还太不发达，（因此）Sovereign 们必须等待，把它们自己依附在家
族遗传的信念上，或延迟了它们的信念系统的扩张。同样地，Integral 可能具有很强的磁性，
但很少有 Sovereigns 被活化并且愿意去体验和表达Integral。Sovereign 们缺乏准备是因为
它们对 Integral 的吸引力漠不关心，因为它们渴望完全生活在 身体-自我 中。
37主权体和积分态之间需要一种相对平衡，否则就会出现下述的情况。在一个文明
中，主权体们已准备就绪，积分态却发展迟缓，以至主权体们必须等待，要么依附于
家族信念，要么延迟自身信念系统的扩张。类似的，积分态可能已具有强大的磁性引
45
力，但只有非常少的主权体被激活并愿意来体验和表达积分态；就绪状态的缺失，源
于它们无感于积分态的吸引，这又是因为它们渴望仅只生活于身体-伊格里。
37 主权和整体之间需要有相对的平衡，否则可能主权准备好了，但整体在文化中太不发达
了，主权必须等待，将自己依附于家族信念或延迟其信念体系的扩展。类似地，整体可能具
有很强的磁性，但是很少有主权被激活并愿意体验和表达整体。他们缺乏准备，因为他们对
整体的吸引力漠不关心，渴望完全生活在身体-自我中。
38 This balance is fundamental to the activation of the unfoldment process, which then stirs
the inception point for the Sovereign Integral consciousness to manifest in the realms of
duality. We begin to imagine the Imaginary Being, whose presence in our life emerges through
our Sovereign, and can be experienced and expressed through the body-ego and our Social
Program.
38 这种平衡对于开展过程的启动是基本的，开展的过程 然后再激起了 Sovereign Integral
意识在二元性领域里显化的 起始点。我们开始想象「想象中的存在」，而「想象中的存在」
在我们生活中的临在会藉由我们的 Sovereign 显露出来，并且可以透过 身体-自我 和我们
的「社会程序设定」来被体验和表达。
38要激活上述展开过程，这种平衡是根本性的，它激发出了初始点，源于此，主权性
积分态意识才得以显现于二元性各领域。(始于这里，)我们开始想象这个想象性存在，
它的临在性经由我们的主权体浮现进我们的生命中，并能通过身体-伊格和社会编程
来体验和表达。
38 这种平衡对于激活展开过程是至关重要的，它随后搅动主权整体意识的起始点，让它
在二元性的领域中显化。我们开始想象想象的存在，它通过我们的主权出现在我们的生活中，
并且可以通过身体-自我和我们的社会程序来体验和表达。
39 The body-ego, once activated by the Sovereignーparticularly as technology accelerates and
compresses timeーneeds patience; tolerance to challenge; replenishment of commitment;
and time to contemplate; these qualities support our persistence to deepen and expand our
understanding of the Sovereign Integral consciousness. These are, admittedly, highly abstract
ideas, and it is easy to feel that they are irrelevant to our world. However, the threads of
understanding that I am attempting to weave in this paper are fundamental. They seem
abstract, but they are pointing to the essence of existence.
39 身体-自我，一旦被 Sovereign 活化——特别是随着科技的加速和时间的压缩——就需要
有耐心；忍受挑战；对「所承担的义务」添加活力；以及 有时间去思考；这些质量支持我
们去持续深化和扩展我们对 Sovereign Integral 意识的理解。诚然，这些都是高度抽象的想
法，而且很容易让人觉得它们与我们的世界无关。然而，我试图编织在本文中的理解线索是
基本的。它们看似抽象，却指向存在的本质。
39一旦被主权体激活，尤其又是科技加速和时间压缩的现在，身体-伊格就需要保持
耐心、忍受挑战、补给热情、定期沉思；这些品质将支撑着我们，来持续地深化和扩
张我们对于主权性积分态意识的理解。无可否认，这是些高度抽象的概念，容易让人
感觉不相干于我们的世界。不过，我正尝试编织进本文中的这些理解主线确是最基本
的。尽管看上去抽象，但它们指出了存在的最重要属性。
39 身体-自我，一旦被主权激活—尤其是在技术加速和时间压缩的情况下—需要耐心;对挑战
的容忍;对承诺的补给;还有花时间深思：这些品质支持我们坚持加深和扩展我们对主权整体
46
意识的理解。诚然，这些都是高度抽象的概念，很容易让人觉得它们与我们的世界无关。然
而，我试图在本文中编织的理解线索是基本的。它们看似抽象，却指向存在的本质。
We will now explore the Integral and its purpose.
现在我们将要来探索 Integral 以及 其目的。
接下来我们将探索积分态及其目的
现在我们将探讨整体及其目的。
起始的宿主，拉开了帷幕
初始点的主人，揭开了帷幕
开端的主人，拉开帷幕
47
译注12：分形集身份，原文直译为合集身份，是指所有二元性分形化身的合集
译注13：这句大概是讲述，将文字按照图解来修订的意见，要修改的文字应该是
“它们流畅地蔓延于各个生命期（） 和各个维度（） 。”这句中括号里的文字
译注14：这句话对比于《序言》中的这句“积分态是是所有领域的智能，这是因
为它是体验性信息的聚集处，因而，它。它是每一个事物的陪伴者，因此，它就是包
裹着所有生命的一体性本质。”区别就在于积分态收集全部生命的体验信息，而主权
体收集自己下辖的所有体验信息
译注15：不可知论者。不可知论反对先验真理论，强调必须依赖实证经验才能获
得客观有效性的知识，必须关注当下现实的存在状态才能获得知识。
译注16：阿特曼印度语境下的灵魂
译注17：关于本段，可以参见《兹安亚》7室及10室画。
译注18：因为中英文的行文逻辑的差异，这句话需要拆分为2句才好理解。真
正的主权体是所辖所有生命形态的核心，而所有主权体本身彼此平等，所以所有生命
形态也是平等的。
译注19：现象与本体。这依然是出自康德哲学。本体指，在我们的意识之外独立
存在的客体。现象指本体作用于人的感官所引起的感觉表象。康德认为，作为我们的
感官对象而存在于我们之外的物是已有的，只是这些物本身可能是什么样子，我们一
点也不知道，我们只知道它们的现象
译注20：玛呼将所有社会编程认为是积分态的二元性表达，可以视为是外在的
积分态。他在42段这么写到“社会编码就是二元性各领域内的积分态，以此类推，
身体-伊格(9)是二元性内的主权体。”
译注21：现实-检验。心理学术语。即区分心理内界与外界的能力。精神疾病常有现
实检验的障碍, 但若是没有精神疾病, 其现实判定是完整的。
Section 2第二节
The Integral: A General Model
The Integral：一个大致上的模型
积分态：一般模型
整体：一个大致的模式
This Section will focus on the Integral, then, in the following Section we will focus on the
emerging definition of the Sovereign Integral consciousness.
本节将聚焦于the Integral，然后，在下一节中，我们将聚焦于Sovereign Integral意识之新兴
的定义。
本节聚焦在积分态，下节我们将聚焦于主权性积分态意识的初步定义。
这一节将专注于整体，然后，在下一节中，我们将专注于正在出现的主权整体意识的定义。
40 As mentioned in Section 1, consciousness is a synthesis of two completely antithetical
identities (Sovereign and Integral). While we now, at least theoretically, understand the
general structure of the Sovereign, it is time to turn our attention to the Integral. If a Sovereign
was a moth, then the Integral would be a flame. The Integral is the primary attractor that
inspires the Sovereign's desire to experience and express the Sovereign Integral consciousness.
48
It is the underlying catalyst of a time-based transformation, drawing individual, infinite
uniqueness into the synthesis of unity and individuality. 8
40 如第 1 节所述，意识是两个完全对立的身份（Sovereign 和 Integral）之综合。虽然我们
现在，至少在理论上，了解了Sovereign的一般结构，是时候把我们的注意力转向Integral
了。如果 Sovereign是飞蛾，那么Integral 就是火焰。Integral是激励Sovereign渴望去体验
和表达Sovereign Integral意识的主要吸引子。它是一种「以时间为基础的转变」之潜在的催
化剂，将个体的、无限的 独特性加入到「合一」和「独立存在」的综合体里。
8
40如上节所言，意识是两个完全对立身份（主权体和积分态）的合体态。现在，至少
理论上，我们理解了主权体的一般结构，是时候将注意力转向积分态了。如果说主权
体是飞蛾，积分态就是火焰。积分态作为原发性的主要吸引子，激发着主权体们去渴
望体验和表达主权性积分态意识。对于时间内的转变而言，它是根本性/潜在的催化
剂，将无限却又个别化的独一无二性牵引向联合性与个体性的合体态(8)。
40 如第一节所述，意识是两个完全对立的身份(主权与整体)的合成。当我们现在，至少在
理论上，理解了主权的一般性结构时，是时候将我们的注意力转向整体了。如果主权是飞蛾，
那么整体就是火焰。整体是主要的吸引者，激发了主权者体验和表达主权整体意识的欲望。
它是基于时间的潜在催化剂，把个体、无限的唯一性转化为统一与个性的综合（注8）。
41 Before we embark on a definition, let us review the dictionary’s choice of words:
41 在我们着手一个定义之前，让我们回顾一下字典的词汇选择：
41着手定义之前，让我们先重温下词典的选词：
41 在我们开始给单词下定义之前，让我们先回顾一下字典中对单词的选择:
Merriam-Webster 词典（定义）韦伯斯特词典
Integral：整体：
1：a）very important and necessary非常重要和必需；十分重要和必需的；非常重要
和必要的;
b）essential to completeness对于完备来讲是必不可少的；对于完整性/完满性而
言必不可少的；对完整性至关重要;
c）formed as a unit with another part与另一部分形成一个单元；呈现为一个连接
其他部分的部件；与其他部分形成单元;
d）composed of constituent parts由 组成部分 所组成；由各个组成部分所构成
的；由构成部分组成的;
e）lacking nothing essential没有缺乏必要的东西；必需物一无所缺；不缺少任何
必要的东西;
42 The Integral, in this definition, is more closely aligned with item 1b: essential to
completeness. However, to understand the Integral, one must understand the Social Program,
because the Social Program is the Integral in the realms of duality, in much the same way as
the body-ego9 is the Sovereign in duality. In being human, we are all more expert in the Social
Program than we are in the core, higher-dimensional Integral.
8
在造翼者的理论架构中，这种转变和在其中的途径被称为：我是我们是（I am We are）。
在造翼者哲学中，这种转变和在其中的路径被称为:我是我们是。
原注8：造翼者哲学中，这种转变及其路径，被称为：我是我们是
49
42 在这个定义中，Integral 更接近于第 1b 项：对于完备来讲是必不可少的。然而，要了
解 Integral，就必须了解「社会程序设定」，因为「社会程序设定」就是 二元领域中的 Integral，
就像 身体-自我
9
是二元领域中的 Sovereign 一样。作为人类，我们在「社会程序设定」方
面都比我们在核心的、更高次元的 Integral方面更专业。
42在上述释义中，积分态紧密联系于1b条目：对于完整性/完满性而言必不可少的。
然而，为了理解积分态，我们必须先理解社会编程，因为，社会编程就是存在于二元
性各领域内的积分态，以此类推，身体-伊格(9)则是存在于二元性内的主权体。相比
于存在于更高维的核心积分态，我们更熟稔社会编程（这种积分态的二元表达）。
42在这个定义中，整体与第1b项:对完整性至关重要更为一致。然而，要理解整体，我们
必须理解社会程序，因为社会程序是二元性领域的整体，就像身体-自我是二元性领域的主
权一样。作为人类，我们在社会程序中都比我们在核心的、高维的整体中更精通。
43 The Social Program is subjective. That is, each individual experiences their Social Program
based on their Sovereign’s unique understanding of itself and the Integral. The Social Program
for human beings is shaped by institutional and natural causes.
43 社会程序设定是主观的。也就是说，每个个体都根据它们的 Sovereign 对自身和 Integral
的独特理解来体验他们的社会程序设定。人类的社会程序设定会被制度性的和自然的原因所
形塑。
43社会编程是主观化的。这就是说，每个个体在体验社会编程时，都是基于他们主权
体对于主权体自身及积分态的独一无二理解。对人类存在而言，社会编程是由体制化
和秉性因素塑造的。
43社会程序是主观的。也就是说，每个个体的社会程序都是基于他们的主权对其自身和整
体的独特理解。人类的社会程序是由制度和自然的原因形成的。
Integral 的制度性的要素是/积分态的体制化要素是/整体的制度元素是：
⚫ 教育
⚫ 政府
⚫ 宗教
⚫ 文化
Integral 的自然的要素（与身体相关的）是/积分态（与身体相关的）的秉性要素是
/“整体”的自然元素(与身体相关)是：
⚫ DNA
⚫ Collective memory集体记忆
⚫ Instinctual intelligence直觉智慧/本能智能
⚫ Nature自然/大自然
Integral 的自然的要素（与 自我 ego 相关的）是/积分态（与伊格相关的）的秉性
要素是/整体的自然元素(与自我相关)是：
⚫ 家庭
⚫ Friends, mentors and social groups朋友、辅导者和社群/朋友、导师和社
会团体
9
一个善意的提醒，身体-自我并非仅仅是人类或三维的存在。
一个友善的提醒，身体-自我 并不完全是人类 或是 一种三次元的存在（a three-dimensional
existence）。
原注9：温馨提示，身体-伊格不仅只是人类或三维存在
50
44 Collectively, these elements influence the individual Social Program of a particular species
distilled down to a Sovereign. For example, while a mouse’s Social Program does not possess
institutional elements, it is nonetheless rich in the natural elements, as categorized above. The
diagram on the next page represents the different focal points of the Social Program
depending on the complexity of the species
44 集体地，这些要素会影响一个特定物种的个体社会程序设定，然后会影响到一个
Sovereign。例如，老鼠的社会程序设定虽然不具备制度要素，但它却富含自然要素，如上所
分类。下一页的图解代表了，取决于物种的复杂性之社会程序设定的不同焦点。
44合在一起，这些要素影响着特定物种内的个人社会编程，进而将其“蒸馏”为一个
主权体。举例而言，按照上面的分类，一只老鼠的社会编程，并不拥有体制化要素，
却有着丰富的秉性要素。下面的图解描绘了，社会编程焦点的不同，完全取决于物种
的复杂度。
44 总的来说，这些因素影响着一个特定物种的个人社会程序，这些社会程序最终被提炼为
一种主权。例如，虽然一只老鼠的社会程序不具备制度元素，但它却富含自然元素，如上面
的归类。下面的图表代表了社会程序的不同焦点，这取决于物种的复杂性。
51
图7
45 The human Social Program is the only one that is institutionalized, and to the extent that
less complex species have an institutional element in their Social Program, it is derived from
humans. In other words, the human institutional elements impact on, and become the
exclusive “institutional” element for, other species on earth.
45 人类社会程序设定是唯一一个被制度化了的，以至于，较不复杂的物种在其社会程序设
定中也具有一种制度性的要素，它是源自人类的。换句话说，人类的制度性要素影响了，并
且成为了，地球上其他物种的专属的“制度性的”要素。
45人类的社会编程是唯一拥有体制化要素的，某种程度上，较低复杂度的物种内的社
会编程所具有的体制化要素，也衍生于人类。换句话说，人类的体制化要素对地球其
他物种而言是高阶的“体制化”要素，并对它们有着巨大的影响。
45人类的社会程序是唯一被制度化的，在某种程度上，较不复杂的物种的社会程序中有一
个制度化的因素，它起源于人类。换句话说，人类的制度因素影响着地球上的其他物种，并
成为唯一的“制度”因素。
46 Each species has its own Social Program that informs its body-ego (i.e., dual Sovereign), and
as is the case with human beings, the Social Program is unique for each individual expression
of a species. The range of that uniqueness correlates to the complexity of the species, in other
words, the higher the complexity of the body-ego, the more variation in the Social Program.
46 每个物种都有自己的社会程序设定，它通知（或助成）其 身体-自我（即二元的 Sovereign），
就像人类的情况一样，「物种的每一个个体表达」之社会程序设定都是独一无二的。这种独
特性的范围与物种的复杂性相关，换句话说，身体-自我 的复杂性越高，社会程序设定的变
异就越大。
52
46每个物种都拥有属于自己的社会编程，去通讯身体-伊格（亦即：二元化主权体），
人类也是如此。而物种内的每一个个体对于社会编程的表达方式都是独一无二的。其
独特性的变化幅度则取决于物种的复杂度，换句话说，身体-伊格复杂度越高（的物
种），社会编程变奏幅度越大。
46 每个物种都有它自己的社会程序，通知它的身体-自我(即二元性的主权），并且和人类
一样，社会程序对于一个物种的每个个体表达都是独一无二的。唯一性的范围与物种的复杂
性有关，换句话说，身体-自我的复杂性越高，社会程序的多样性就越大。
47 If viewed through the continuum of time, the Social Program evolves, in some cases,
radically. For example, the human Social Program, in the course of two-hundred years, has
evolved from horse and buggy and the telegraph; to space travel and internet-tethered cell
phones. This technological surge, as we can imagine, has played a significant role in the
evolution of the Social Programーnot only for humans, but almost every other species on
earth. Religion and government, however, have evolved at a comparatively slower pace, while
culture is somewhere in between.
47 如果从时间的连续性来看，社会程序设定在某些情况下会发生根本性的变化。例如，人
类社会程序设定，在两百年的过程里，从马和马车和电报；到太空旅行和连接网络的手机。
正如我们可以想象的那样，这种科技浪潮在社会程序设定的演变中发挥了重要作用——不仅
是对人类，而且对地球上几乎所有其他的物种都是如此。然而，宗教和政府的发展速度相对
较慢，而文化则介于两者之间。
47纵观时间连续统一体，就会发现，社会编程在进化，某种情况下，则是彻底的改变。
举例而言，人类社会编程，在这200年的进程中，从鞍马、马车、电报，进化到空间
旅行和互联网蜂窝电话。这种技术的激增，就如我们能想象的一样，已经不仅在人类
的，也在几乎所有地球物种的社会编程进化中，扮演起了意义深远的角色。不过，宗 教
和政 府的进化步调则相对较慢，而文化则介于这2者之间。
47 如果从时间的连续统一体来看，社会程序进化了，在某些情况下，是根本性的。例如，
人类的社会程序，在200年的进程里，已经从马、马车和电报，进化到了太空旅行和与互联
网相连的手机。正如我们所能想象的那样，这种技术的涌现，在社会程序的进化中发挥了重
要作用—不仅对人类，而且对地球上几乎所有其他物种都是如此。然而，宗教和政府进化的
步伐却相对较慢。而文化则介于两者之间。
48 It is important to understand, and it is the reason I reiterate once again, that the Social
Program, in the realm of duality, is the literal manifestation of the Integral. Therefore, human
reality is not an illusion or simulation, it is simply a dilution of the Integral consciousness made
possible by the proper functioning of duality. Human beings are generally not delusional. It is
the unique interrelationship of the body-ego-social program that appears delusional, but the
Sovereign and the Integral are truly in control of the dual dimensions of consciousness. They
are co-architects of the game of life whose playing field, in our case, is centered in the third-
dimensional reality of earth, in the twenty-first century.
48 重要的是要理解到，这也是我再次重申的原因，社会程序设定，在二元性的领域里，是
Integral 确确实实的显化（the literal manifestation of the Integral）。因此，人类实相不是一种
幻觉或模拟，它只是 Integral 意识的一种稀释，而这种稀释是「藉由二元性的适当运作」才
成为可能的。人类一般来讲并不是幻觉的。是「身体-自我-社会程序设定 之独特的相互关系」
才显得是幻觉的，但是 Sovereign 和Integral 确实控制着意识的那些二元性的次元。它们是
53
生命游戏的共同建筑师，在我们的情况里，它们的游戏场以地球的三次元的实相，21世纪，
为中心。
48重要的是理解：社会编程，千真万确就是积分态在二元性领域的的显现。这也是我
反复提起这件事的原因。因此，人类实相绝非一种幻象或模拟，它仅仅是对积分态意
识的一种稀释，而正是二元性的正常运转实现了这一点。人类存在总体而言并非幻象。
只是身体-伊格-社会编程的独特的交互关系显得像是幻象，但是，主权体和积分态真
地在掌控着意识的各个二元性维度。它们才是生命游戏的共同-缔造者，生命游戏是
它们的游戏场，而就我们的情况而言，这个游戏场，是聚焦在第3维度的21世纪地
球实相的。
48重要的是去理解，这也是我再次重申的原因，社会程序在二元性的领域里就是整体的表
现。因此，人类的现实不是幻觉或模拟，它仅仅是二元性的正常运行所带来的整体意识的稀
释。人类一般不会产生妄想症。这是身体-自我-社会程序的独特的相互关系，看起来像是幻
觉，但是主权和整体确实控制着意识的二元性维度。他们是生命游戏的共同建筑师，在我们
的例子中，生命游戏的场地是以21世纪地球的三维现实为中心的。
49 This is an important distinction between the Sovereign Integral consciousness and the
religious, spiritual and metaphysical perspectives. Sovereigns expand in the only direction
possible: to the Integral. They experience life from countless different perspectives, but always
ーand this is really the only illusion worth notingーone lifetime at a time, which allows the
embodied Sovereign to focus on one body-ego-social program triad.
49 这是 Sovereign Integral 意识 与 宗教、性灵 和 形而上学 的那些观点之间的重要区别。
Sovereign 在唯一可能的方向上扩张：扩张到 Integral。它们从无数不同的观点来体验生命，
但总是——而这确实是唯一值得注意的幻觉——一次一生，这使得具体化了的 Sovereign 可
以 专注 于一个 身体-自我-社会程序设定 的三位一体。
49主权性积分态意识与宗 教、灵性、形而上学视角之间的一个重要差别就在于，主
权体们只会扩展向唯一的可能方向：积分态。主权体们通过无法计数的不同视角体验
着生命。“一次一个生命期”这个说法，是真正值得提出的唯一幻觉，不过，这样的认
知容许化身的主权体去聚焦于一个身体-伊格-社会编程三位一体。
49 这是主权整体意识与宗教、灵性和形而上学观点之间的一个重要区别。主权向唯一可能
的方向—整体扩展。他们体验着无数不同的生命，但总是—这真的是唯一值得注意的幻觉—
一次一个生命周期，这让化身的主权可以专注于一个身体-自我-社会程序的三位一体。
50 The Social Program is the controlling force of a free will universe that prevents a species
from spiraling into chaos and unretrievable imbalance. Behind the institutional and natural
forces that compose the “body” of the Social Program, the Integral consciousness is unfailingly
attracting the planetary-level consciousness through each Sovereign on all levels of
consciousness. The individual body is biology. The individual ego is the social identity and the
locus of empirical experience. These personas live within both the Sovereign and the Social
Program. We adopt the mental models of the Social Program and they adopt us.
50 「社会程序设定」是「自由意志宇宙」的控制的力量，它防止一个物种陷入混乱和无法
挽回的失衡。在构成社会程序设定的“主体”之那些制度性的和自然的力量之背后，Integral 意
识藉由所有「意识的层次」上的每一个 Sovereign，不断地在吸引行星层次的意识。个体的
身体 是生物的生命现象。个体的自我（ego）是社会身份和实际经验的所在地。这些角色同
54
时存在于 Sovereign 和「社会程序设定」中。我们采用社会程序设定的那些脑力模式，而我
们归化于它们了（and they adopt us）。
50社会编程是自由意志宇宙的支配性力量，防止着一个物种螺旋下降进混沌无序和
无可挽回的失衡中。体制和秉性的力量构成了社会编程的“身体”，在其身后，积分态
意识，一直在永无止境地通过所有意识层级的每一个主权体，来吸引着行星-层的意
识。个体的身体是生物性的。个体的伊格是社会身份，也是经验性体验的所在地。这
2个角色同时存在于主权体和社会编程内。我们接纳了社会编程的心理模式，它们也
接纳了我们。
50社会程序是一个自由意志的宇宙的控制力量，它防止一个物种陷入混乱和无法挽回的不
平衡中。制度和自然力量的背后构成了社会程序的“主体”，即整体意识通过意识所有层次
上的每一个主权不断地吸引行星层面的意识。个体的身体是生物性的。个体的自我是社会身
份，是实证经验的场所。这些人格角色同时存在于主权和社会程序中。我们采用社会程序的
思维模式，它们也采用我们。
51 As stated earlier, the Social Program evolves in the realms of duality. The dual realms
possess both the known and the unknown. Within the nondual realms there exists the
Unknowable.10 It is possible that the Social Program is only relevant to the dual realms, but
the nondual world is, as just stated, Unknowable, and therefore it is possible that the Social
Program extends to all dimensions of existence.
51 如前所述，「社会程序设定」在二元性的领域里演进。二元的领域同时拥有已知和未知
（the unknown）。在非二元的领域中，存在着不可知的（the Unknowable）
10
。有可能社会程
序设定只与二元的领域有关，然而非二元的世界，正如刚才所说的，是不可知的，因此，社
会程序设定有可能扩展到存在的所有次元。
51如前所述，社会编程在二元性各领域进化着。二元性领域既存在着已知也存在未
知。而非二元各领域里则存在着不可知(10)。有可能，社会编程仅仅与二元性领域有关，
但是既然如上所言，非二元世界是不可知的，那么，也有一种可能，社会编程延伸进
了所有存在维度。
51如前所述，社会程序在二元性的领域中进化。二元性的领域同时拥有已知和未知。在非
二元性领域中存在着不可知（注10）。社会程序可能只与二元性领域相关，但非二元性世界，
如前所述，是不可知的，因此社会程序有可能扩展到存在的所有维度。
52 This lack of finalityーof a certain destinationーis simply an outgrowth of the Sovereign and
Integral’s existence in duality. But these uncertainties, due mostly to the infinitude of the
Sovereign and Integral, as strange and inexplicable as they may feel now, are natural in the
dual realms. We are, afterall, students of duality, but as Sovereign Integrals, we are birthed
into the nondual realms, which to our body-ego make each of us, at our core, Unknowable to
our lifetimes in duality. These realities, understandably, are unnerving for some, if not all of us.
52 这种缺乏终结性——某个目的地——只是 Sovereign 和 Integral 在二元性里的存在之产
物。但这些不确定性，最主要是由于 Sovereign 和 Integral 的无限性，就如它们现在可能让
人觉得的那么奇怪和无法说明，在二元的领域是很自然的。毕竟，我们是二元性的学习者，
但是作为 Sovereign Integrals，我们被出生在非二元的领域，这对于我们的 身体-自我 来说，
10
原注10：定义见183段
55
就让我们每一个人，我们存在的核心，对于我们在二元性里的那些生生世世来讲都是不可知
的。这些现实，可以理解地，会让一些人（如果不是所有人）感到不安。
52缺失了结局——一个确定的终点，这单纯只是主权体和积分态存在于二元性内的
副产品。但这些不确定性，很大程度归因于主权体和积分态的无限性。尽管感觉上如
此奇怪和费解，但不确定性在二元性领域正是天然属性。虽然我们是二元性学习者，
但作为主权性积分态们，我们诞生于非二元领域，在我们的身体-伊格看来，我们每
个人的这个核心，对于我们二元性各生命期而言都是不可知的。这样的事实，理所当
然地，是令人不安的，即使不是对我们全体，至少也是对一些人。
52这种对某个目的地缺乏明确性，仅仅是主权与整体在二元性中存在的结果。但是，这些
不确定性，大部分是由于主权和整体的无限，尽管它们现在可能被认为是奇怪和无法解释的，
但在二元性领域中是自然的。毕竟，我们是二元性的学生，但作为主权整体，我们出生在非
二元性领域，其对我们的身体-自我来说，我们每一个人，在我们的核心，对我们二元性的
一生来说不可知的。可以理解，这些现实即使不是让所有人感到不安，也会让一些人感到不
安。
53 I would hold true, that if you do not feel these aspects of the Sovereign Integral to be
unsettling, you are probably not understanding the fullness of the conceptual model that is
being proposed. The Social Program has been very clear for thousands of years (which
conditions the DNA and ancestral tendencies), that human beings are the apex life form on
earth, our solar system and probably the known universe. Human beings live one life or
multiple lives in succession, which ends in either non-existence, purgatory, heaven or hell,
karma-free or eternal bliss. Human beings were locked in a competition to survive and thrive.
These were the choices. There was no choice called the Sovereign Integral.
53 我会认为，如果你不觉得 Sovereign Integral 的这些方面令人不安，您可能就不了解正在
被提出的概念模型之完整性。几千年来，社会程序设定已经很明确了（这制约了 DNA 和遗
传的倾向），人类是地球上、我们的太阳系以及可能是已知的宇宙里之最高的生命形式。人
类活着一个或多个相继的生命，这些生命以 不存在、炼狱、天堂或地狱、超脱业力（karma-
free）或永恒的幸福来结束。人类被锁在一种要生存和繁荣的竞争中了。这些是选择。但这
里面没有一个被称为Sovereign Integral 的选择。
53实话实说，如果没有感觉到主权性积分态的这些让人不安的面向，你可能并未完全
理解正被我提出的这个概念模式。数千年来，社会编程一直在宣告（也一直限制着DNA
和祖先倾向）：人类是地球、我们太阳系、可能也是已知宇宙中的巅峰生命形态；人类
生活于一次生命或者连续多重生命中，要么终止于“不存在”，要么终止于炼狱、天
堂、地狱、业力解除或永恒极乐；人类被锁定在幸存竞赛和成长竞赛里。这些就是选
项，从来不存在称之为主权性积分态的选项。
53 我肯定，如果你不觉得主权整体的这些方面令人不安的话，你可能就不理解正在被提出
的概念模型的完整性。几千年来，社会程序一直非常明确(它设定了DNA和祖先的倾向)，就
是人类是地球、我们的太阳系甚至可能是已知宇宙的顶端生命形式。人类过着一次或多次连
续性生命，最终要么不存在，要么炼狱，天堂或地狱，无业力或永恒的福佑。人类陷入了生
存和繁荣的竞争中。这些是选项。没有所谓主权整体的选择。
54 There is an Integral of the Sovereign (different lifetimes/levels/species experienced in
duality) and then there is a collective Integral of all Sovereigns. These Integrals are never
complete, as is the nature of fractals, so in that sense, they are not standard concepts that are
56
fixed in definition-concrete. We are all members of the Sovereign Integral Network.11 And
when I use the term “we,” it is the most inclusive definition that one can imagine.
54 有一个 Sovereign 的 Integral 存在着（就是在二元性里被经验到的不同的生生世世/层
次/物种），然后有一个所有 Sovereigns 的集体 Integral 存在着。这些 Integrals 永远不会完
整，就像碎形的本质一样，所以从这个意义上来说，它们不是那些被固定在具体定义中的标
准概念。我们都是 Sovereign Integral 网络
11
的成员。当我使用“我们”这个词时，它是人们
能想象得到的最具包容性的定义。
54对于体验着二元性中不同的生命期/层级/物种的主权体而言，存在着一种单个主
权体视角的积分态，所有单个主权体视角的积分态，集合在一起则是一种全员性积分
态。这些积分态永远是未完成态的，因为未完成态就是分形的天然属性，所以在这个
意义上，积分态们不存在固定于确切-定义上的标准概念。我们全都是主权性积分态
网络(11)的一员。当我用到“我们”这个词，它有着我们能想象的最具包纳性的定义。
55 This concept sparks a range of new behaviors, but perhaps its most notable behavior is a
deepening kinship with all life. The framework of the Sovereign Integral is inclusive of
everythingーpolitics, money, power, ethnicity, injustice, religious competition, etc. It absorbs
differences and unifies them in the same instant of realization. This is its power in the worlds
of duality.
55 这个概念引发了一系列新的行为，但也许它最显著的行为是与所有生命的亲缘关系加深。
Sovereign Integral 的框架包含了一切——政治、金钱、权力、种族、不公正、宗教竞争等。
它在实现的同一个瞬间吸收差异并统一它们。这就是它在二元性世界中的力量。
55这个概念会激发一系列的新行为，或许最显著的行为则是，与所有生命的一种深化
的亲密关系。主权性积分态这个框架包罗着每一个事物——政 治、金钱、权力、种
族、不公、宗教竞赛，等等。主权积分态吸收着所有这些不同，统合进“同一当下”
这样一个体认中。这就是它在二元性世界的力量。
55这个概念引发了一系列新的行为，但可能最值得注意的行为，是一种与一切生命深化的
亲缘关系。主权整体的框架包括一切—政治、金钱、权力、种族、不公正、宗教竞争等。它
吸收差异，并在意识到的同一瞬间统一它们。这就是它在二元性世界中的力量。
56 My final comment about the Integral is related to love (eventually, everything is).
Everyone knows the Integral. This is the Integral’s great perfection: We know it as our
unique, human reality, because that is what the Integral is to each Sovereign. It is the
Sovereign’s reality in each dimension of consciousness, and while their human experience is
similar to that of their neighbors, they are, as a Sovereign, perfectly unique in the expression
and experience of the Integral.
56 我对 Integral 的最后评论与爱有关（最终，一切都是与爱有关）。每一个人都懂得
Integral。这是 Integral 伟大的完美之处：我们知道它是我们独特的人类实相，因为那就是
对每一个 Sovereign 来说，Integral 是什么。它就是在意识的每一个次元里的，Sovereign
的实相，虽然它们的人类经历与它们的同胞相似，但是作为Sovereign，它们在 Integral 的
表达和体验方面是独一无二的。
11
定义见段落191。
57
56关于积分态，我最后的注释是关于爱的（终究而言，每个事物都是关于爱的）。
每个人都是知晓积分态的。积分态的大圆 满㉒就是：我们将积分态视为/作为“我
独一无二的人类实相” ㉓，因为对于每个主权体而言，积分态就是这个。积分态就
是一个主权体在所辖的每一个意识维度内的的实相，而尽管人类的体验相似于周围
的彼此，但作为主权体，他们在积分态的表达和体验上是完全独一无二的。
56 我对整体的最后一个评论是与爱(最终，一切都是)有关的。每个人都知道整体。这是
整体伟大的完美：我们知道它是我们独一无二的人类现实，因为这就是整体对每个主权的
意义。它是主权在意识的每个维度中的现实，虽然他们的人类体验与他们的邻居相似，但
作为一个主权，他们在整体的表达和体验上是完全独特的。
57 Love is inclusion and expansion. Love is extending kindness to all expressions of the
Sovereign. Love is intelligence. Love is alignment. Love is the attraction that pulls the
Sovereign to the Integral. It cannot be any other way, because it is through the heart that
the body-ego can touch the Noble Mind of the nondual Sovereign. The Noble Mind is where
the faculty lives that enables us to imagine the Sovereign integral and how it would live in a
human existence.
57 爱是包容与扩展。爱是把善意扩展到 Sovereign 的所有表达。爱是智慧。爱是对齐
（合作）。爱是把Sovereign 拉向 Integral 的吸引力。它不可能有任何其他的方式，因为
就是藉由心，身体-自我 才可以接触到非二元 Sovereign 的「崇高的脑力」。崇高的脑力
是「想像力的机能」存在的地方，而「想象力的机能」让我们能够想象 Sovereign Integral
以及「它如何能活在一种人类存在中」。
57爱是包纳和扩张。爱是主权体将宽仁延伸进自己的所有表达。爱是智能。爱是校
准。爱是将主权体牵引向积分态的吸引力。这件事无法通过其他方式，因为正是经
由心脏，身体-伊格才得以触及到非二元主权体的恢弘心智。存在于恢弘心智内的官
能，使我们得以想象主权性积分态，以及它存在于人类存在性中的方式。
57 爱是包容和扩展。爱是将仁慈延伸至主权的所有表达。爱是智慧。爱是对齐。爱是将
主权拉向整体的吸引力。不可能有任何其他方式，因为身体-自我通过心才可以接触到非二
元性主权的崇高头脑。崇高头脑是天赋存在的地方，使我们能够想象主权整体，以及它将
如何生活在人类的存在中。
58 The Integral is perhaps most closely aligned to the term, Spirit. However, Spirit, as it is
commonly used in religion, is a mysterious omnipresence that is the votive force of God; the
“eyes and ears” of the Highest; that silent, invisible force that permeates all life (or at least
human life). The Integral, in contrast, is not really mysterious, but rather misunderstood. After
all, it is each of our absolutely unique realities that only we know and can know, so how can
that be mysterious?
58 Integral 可能与“圣灵（Spirit）”一词最为接近。然而，宗教中普遍使用的圣灵，是一种神
秘的无所不在，是上帝回应的力量；至高者（the Highest）的“眼睛和耳朵”；那种无声的、
无形的力量，渗透所有生命（或至少是人类的生命）。对比之下，Integral 并不真的那么神秘，
而是被误解了。毕竟，只有我们自己知道并且可以知道的，是我们每一个人的那些绝对独特
的实相，那怎么可能是神秘的？
58
58或许最一致于积分态的词汇是“圣灵”。不过，通常被用于宗教里的圣 灵，是指一
种神秘的遍在性，这是奉献于上帝的力量，是最高力量的“眼与耳”，是弥漫于所有生
命（至少是所有人类生命）的静默无形的力量。与之不同，积分态完全不神秘，它更
多只是被误解了。毕竟，它就是我们每个人那绝对独一无二的实相，这个实相只有我
们自己知道，也只有我们自己能够知道，所以，它又怎么可能是神秘的呢？
58 整体可能与“灵性”这个词最接近。然而，灵性，因为它通常被用于宗教，是一个神秘
的无处不在的存在，是上帝的许愿力量;上帝的“眼睛和耳朵”;这种无声的、无形的力量渗
透在所有的生命(至少是人类的生命)中。相比之下，整体并不神秘，而是被误解了。毕竟，
我们每个人的现实都是独一无二的，只有我们知道并且能够知道，所以这怎么可能神秘呢?
59 The Integral’s lineage and creation are Unknowable to our human counterparts. We are
taught that a living intelligence connects us as Sovereigns and that those Sovereigns manifest
in every life form. We have never been taught that in one’s reality, in the moment, the Integral
is right before our eyes, ears, hands, mouth, nose, feelings, intuition and imagination. It is
present in every nook and cranny that is our unique reality.
59 Integral 的世系根源 与（最初的）创造 对于我们人类对应物来说是不可知的。我们被教
导说，一种活生生的智能将作为 Sovereigns 的我们连结在一起，而那些 Sovereigns 体现在
每一种生命形式中。我们从来没有被教导过，在一个人的实相里，在当下，Integral 就在我
们的眼睛、耳朵、手、嘴巴、鼻子、感觉、直觉和想象的面前。它呈现在我们独特的实相的
每个角落和缝隙中。
59对于身为积分态配对物的我们人类而言，积分态的谱系㉔和创造过程是不可知的。
我们被教导说，一种鲜活的智能连接起作为主权体们的我们，然后主权体们又化身在
每一个生命形态中。我们从未被教导的是，在一个人的实相中，在任一当下，积分态
就真真切切地存在于我的眼前、耳边、双手、嘴巴、感觉、直觉、想象中。它临在于
我们独一无二实相的每一个隐秘处和缝隙里。
59整体的血统和创造对我们的人类同胞来说是不可知的。我们被教导有一个活的智慧将我
们作为主权联系在一起而主权显现在每一种生命形态中。我们从未被教导在一个人的现实
里，在此刻，整体就在我们的眼睛、耳朵、手、嘴、鼻子、感觉、直觉和想象力面前。它存
在于每一个角落和缝隙中，这就是我们独特的现实。
60 We do not understand this, but it is not mysterious. It is not hidden; it is the opposite of
hidden. We, human beings, since our inception on this planet, have not understood. Perhaps
in some ancient time, humansーas a wholeーwere more connected to some of these concepts,
but reading our history, religious and philosophical papers, I have not discovered such a time.
The concepts of the Sovereign Integral, to whatever extent it was known, were always held in
small pockets of humanity, where it could be learned without inviting persecution from the
State or religious quarters.
60 我们不明白这一点，但这并不神秘。它不是隐藏的；它与隐藏相反。我们人类，自从我
们在这个星球上的起始以来，一直没有理解。也许在某个远古时代，人类——作为一个整体
——与这其中的一些概念之连结更加紧密，但阅读我们的历史、宗教和哲学论文，我还没有
发现这样的时代。Sovereign Integral 的那些概念，无论在何种程度上被知道，总是被控制在
人类的一小部分里，在那里可以学习而不会招致来自国家或宗教团体的迫害。
59
60尽管我们并未理解这一点，但是积分态确实毫不神秘。它并未被隐藏，它是隐藏的
反义词。我们，人类存在，自从登上这个行星，就不曾拥有这份理解。有可能，古代
某些时代，人类——作为整体——曾经较为连接上这些概念中的一些，不过当我翻阅
我们的历史、宗教和哲学文本，却从未发现过哪怕一丝证据。无论被知晓到何种程度，
主权性积分态的概念，都始终被揣在人类的小口袋里，在这里，它能够被学习，而不
会招致来自国家或宗教方位的迫害。
60 我们不了解这一点，但它并不神秘。它没有隐藏起来；它是隐藏的反义词。我们人类，
自从我们在这个星球上诞生以来，一直不了解。也许在古代，人类作为一个整体与这些概念
有更紧密的联系，但阅读我们的历史、宗教和哲学文章，我还没有发现这样一个时代。主权
整体的概念，无论其被了解到什么程度，总是被人类的一小部分人所掌握，在那里，人们可
以在不招致国家或宗教团体迫害的情况下学习它。
61 All of our choices, in one lifetime, culminate to a point in time that we call the moment of
reality. It is that place and time where the Integral lives most vibrantly. Where its energy is
vital, its pulse felt, its purpose in our lives better understood. Our life, at this moment, may
be a dusty window into the Sovereign Integral consciousness, but it can be washed and
made clear or at least clearer.
61 我们一次生命中所有的选择，都会在我们称之为「实相的当下」（moment of reality）
的某个时间点上达到顶点。那是 Integral 活得最为活跃的地方和时间。在那个点上，它的
能量是充满生气的，它的脉搏可以被感受到，它在我们生命中的目的更容易被理解。目
前，我们的生活可能是进入 Sovereign Integral 意识的一扇布满尘土的窗口，但它可以被清
洗并变得清晰或至少更清晰。
61在一次生命期内，我们的所有选择，都在攀登向时间中的一个点，我们称之为当下
实相/实相的当下/当下现实。正是在这个地点和时间，积分态存在得最为鲜活蓬勃。
在这里，它的能量生机勃勃，它的脉搏被能感知，它存在于我们生命中的目的更能被
理解。在这样的当下里，我们的生命，或许还只是一扇开向主权性积分态意识的尘封
窗户，但是，这扇窗户能够被清洗而变得明净，至少是变得明净些。
61在人的一生中，我们所有的选择都会抵达一个我们称之为当下的时刻。正是这个地方和
时间让“整体”活得最有活力。在那里，它的能量至关重要，它的脉搏可以被感受到，它
在我们生命中的目的得到了更好的理解。此时此刻，我们的生命可能是一扇通向主权整体
意识的布满灰尘的窗户，但它可以被洗净，变得清晰，或者至少清晰一点。
62 This paper is a way to see the Integral more clearly and appreciate its presence, but it
requires one thing: We must be willing to focus. I know for many of us that is a difficult thing
to do in the twenty-first century. However, if we want to understand the Sovereign Integral
perspective to the point where it is in our step, in our eyes, in our words, in our touch, in our
tone, in our thoughts; it will require focus, as this is neither a simple or short bridge to cross.
62 这篇论文是一种更清楚地看到 Integral 并欣赏它的临在的方式，但它需要一件事：我
们必须愿意专注。我知道对我们之中的许多人来说，这在 21 世纪是一件很难做到的事
情。然而，如果我们想要理解 Sovereign Integral 的观点，切中要点到它是在我们的步伐
中、我们的眼中、我们的语言中、我们的触摸，我们的语气，我们的思想中的什么地方的
话；它就需要集中注意力，因为它是一座需要跨越的桥，既不简单，距离也不短。
62本文提供了一个途径，来更为清晰地看到积分态，来赞赏它的临在，不过这需要
一个前提：我们必须乐意去聚焦。我明白，对于21世纪的很多人而言，这是件困难
60
的事。但是，如果想要理解主权性积分态视角，直至这视角栖息进我们的脚步、我
们的眼睛、我们的文字、我们的触摸、我们的舌尖、我们的思想；就需要去聚焦，
因为我们要穿越的这座桥既不容易走、距离也不短。
62这篇文章是一种更清晰地看到整体并欣赏其存在的方法，但它需要一件事:我们必须愿
意专注。我知道，对我们许多人来说，这在21世纪是一件困难的事情。然而，如果我们
想要理解“主权整体”的视角一直到它就在我们的步伐中，在我们的眼睛中，在我们的话
语中，在我们的触摸中，在我们的语调中，在我们的思想中的点；就需要专注，因为这不
是一座简单或短暂的桥。
63 I realize that many people believe that truth should be simple. Somehow, all of the
multiverse’s infinite complexity can be reduced to simple truth. I do not subscribe to that
perspective. Neither do I believe that an attainment of truth should require twenty years in a
monastery. The place of focus I speak of is a place where we can read, contemplate, draw,
write, or whatever we need to do in order to grasp these concepts and carry them inside us
for a time. This allows us to experience them; to see if they expand our sense of what is true
or possibly true.
63 我知道很多人相信真理应该是简单的。以某种方法，所有复合宇宙的无限复杂性都可以
简化为简单的事实。我不赞同这种观点。但我也不认为达到真理需要在修道院里待 20 年。
我所说的 需要专注的地方，是一种「我们可以阅读、思考、绘画、写作或做任何我们需要
做的事情，以便能掌握这些概念并将它们带入我们的里面一段时间」的精神状态。这使我们
能够体验它们；看看它们是否扩大了我们对「什么是真实的」或「什么可能是真实的」的感
觉。
63我意识到，很多人相信，真理应该是简单的。不知何故，复合宇宙那全部的无限繁
复性，就应该被简化为简单的真理。我不认同这种观点。就像我同样不相信，获得真
理需要寺庙里的20年修行。我所谈及的聚焦之地是这样一个地方，在这里，我们能
阅读、沉思、绘画、写作、或者无论什么我们需要做的，以便去紧握住这些概念，带
入我们内里一段时间。这容许我们去体验它们；去看看它们是否扩张了我们的一种感
知：什么为真或可能为真。
63我意识到许多人相信真理应该是简单的。在某种程度上，多重宇宙的无限复杂性可以被
简化为简单的真理。我不赞同那种观点。当然我也不相信，要达到真理，需要在修道院里呆
上二十年。我所说的集中注意力的地方是一个我们可以阅读，沉思、绘画、写作，或者做任
何我们需要做的事情来抓住这些概念，并将它们带入我们的内心一段时间的地方。这让我们
能够体验它们；看看它们是否扩展了我们对真理或可能是真理的感知。
64 The Integral is essential. One could say it is the most essential. It enables a fractal
experience for one and all. It is the subjective, responsive teacher that pulls us unerringly to
itself. This happens over long periods of time, requiring so many lifetimes as to become
impossible to count. It is not desired by any Sovereign, deep down, that they rocket themselves
to the Sovereign Integral consciousness. It is not a race. This is a gradual, deliberate, unfolding
process that plays out over a vast spacetime. It is within this process that we, as a Sovereign,
formulate, create, express, evolve, imagine and transmit love.
64 Integral 是必不可少的。甚至可以说它是 最 必不可少的。它为所有人提供一种碎形的体
验。它是主观的、回应迅速的老师，把我们准确无误地拉到它自己的身边。这会发生在一段
很长的时间内，需要如此多的生生世世以至于变得无法计数。在内心深处，任何 Sovereign
61
都不希望它们让自己急速飞向 Sovereign Integral意识。这不是一场赛跑。这是在浩瀚的时空
里上演的一种渐进的、深思熟虑的开展过程。正是在这个过程中，我们作为 Sovereign，规
划、创造、表达、演进、想象和传递 爱。
64积分态是不可或缺的。我们可以说，它是最不能缺少的。它为（主权体所辖的）单
个及全体（化身主权体们）启动了一种分形化体验。它是个体世界里反应热烈的老师，
将我们精确无误地牵引向它自身。这个过程的发生会跨越非常漫长的时间，需要如此
多次的生命期，多到不可能计数。积分态并为被任何一个主权体所吸引，从根本上讲，
积分态和主权体都在将它们自己火箭般地发射向主权性积分态意识。这并非一场竞赛。
这是一个渐进的、审慎的、徐徐展开的进程，横跨过浩瀚的时空上演着。正是在这个
进程中，我们，身为主权体，构思着爱、创造着爱、表达着爱、演进着爱、想象着爱、
传播着爱。
64 整体是必不可少的。可以说这是最关键的。它为所有人带来了分形体验。它是主观的、
反应灵敏的老师，准确无误地把我们拉向它自己。这个过程需要很长的一段时间，需要多到
无法计数的生命周期。任何一个主权在内心深处都不希望把自己火箭般地推进到主权整体的
意识中。这不是一场比赛。这是一个渐进的、深思熟虑的、逐渐展开的过程，在广阔的时空
中上演。正是在这个过程中，我们，作为一个主权，规划、创造、表达、进化、想象和传递
爱。
65 There are many forms of love. It is, as any of us can imagine, a term that is fractal in the
same way as the terms: Sovereign and Integral. It is the space that overlaps the Sovereign, the
Integral (duality expressions) and the Sovereign Integral (non-duality). This space of overlap,
the Mandorla of Empowerment,12 is love in its purest, knowable form. Its primary feature is
to integrate the parts of itself that are separated through duality, while at the same time,
permitting free will. This is love and intelligence.
65 爱有许多形式。正如我们任何人都可以想象的那样，它是一个术语，与这两个术语：
Sovereign 和 Integral，是同一种方式的碎形。它是 Sovereign、Integral（二元性表达）以及
Sovereign Integral（非二元性）重叠的空间。这个重叠的空间，赋权的曼陀拉（the Mandorla
of Empowerment）
12
， 是爱的最纯粹的、可知的形式。它的主要特征是，把它自己的「藉由
二元性而被分离了的那些部分」整合起来，同时又能容许自由意志。这就是 爱 与 智能。
65存在着许多形式的爱。正如能想象到的，这个词和主权体与积分态一样，也是分形
化的。爱是一个空间，交叠起（二元性表达的）主权体、积分态、和（非二元性的）
主权性积分态。这个交叠空间，称为赋权曼多拉(12)，它是可被知晓的最纯粹形态的爱。
这种爱的主要特征即是：积分整合起自身分裂于二元性里的所有片段，与此同时，又
完全地容许自由意志。这就是爱与智能。
12
The Mandorla of Empowerment is a consciousness of love that has three parts: The Sovereign, the
Integral, and the Sovereign Integral. It is the widest, highest, deepest, knowable love by a human being in
the early part of the twenty-first century. The experience and expression of this mandorla is the underlying
purpose woven into the “DNA” of the Sovereign.
赋权的曼陀拉是一种爱的意识，它由三部分组成：Sovereign、Integral 和 Sovereign Integral。它是
21世纪初期的人类可以知道的，最广泛、最高、最深 的爱。这个曼陀拉的体验和表达，是编织在
Sovereign的“DNA”中之深层的目的。
原注12：赋权曼多拉是一种爱的意识，共有三个部分：主权体、积分态、及主权性积分态。它是
一个人类存在，在21世纪初期，所能知晓的最宽广、最高远、最深邃的爱。这种曼多拉的体验
和表达，正是编织于主权体的“DNA”内的根本/潜在目标。
赋权的曼多拉是一种爱的意识，它有三个部分:主权、整体和主权整体。这是二十一世纪早期人类所拥有
的最广、最高、最深和可知的爱。这种曼多拉的体验和表达是编织在主权“基因”中的潜在目的。
62
65 爱有很多形式。正如我们任何人所能想象的那样，它是一个分形的术语，就像“主权”
和“整体”一样。它是重叠主权、整体(二元性表达式)和主权整体(非二元性表达式)的空间。
这个重叠的空间，赋权的曼多拉（注12），是爱最纯洁和可知的形式。它的主要特征是将自
身通过二元性分离出来的部分整合在一起，同时允许自由意志。这就是爱和智慧。
66 Human love, that love that we consider realーhere, on the ground, useful, engaging,
meaningful, joyful, all of those qualities that we need and value. It is part of our Social Program.
It is love that has been socialized, much more than any other fractal concept, and for this
reason, it expresses itself, through the human body-ego, as a force that overcomes, conditions
reality, sacrifices and worships. These are the faces of human love as the collective Social
Program presents it. I realize that any of us could find additional “faces” of love, but I would
place those as secondary to one of the four I have cited. However, I acknowledge that there
are many more, and we can debate on which four to place in the corners of the following
diagram that better depicts human love.
66 人类的爱，我们认为真实的爱——就在这里，可及的，有用的、迷人的、有意义的、快
乐的，所有这些我们需要和重视的质量。它是我们的社会程序设定的一部分。爱已经被社会
化了，比任何其他的碎形概念都要严重得多，就因为如此，它透过 身体-自我 来表达它自
己，而作为一种战胜、制约实相、牺牲和崇拜的力量。这些是人类的爱的一些面孔，当集体
社会程序设定呈现它时。我知道我们中的任何人都可以找到更多的爱的“面孔”，但我会将它
们放在我所引用的这四个之后。然而，我承认还有更多，我们也可以争论将哪四个放在下图
的角落里，可以更适当地描绘人类的爱。
66人类之爱，我们视之为真的那种爱——此地的、实在的、有益的、迷人的、有意义
的、喜悦的，以及所有那些我们所需要和珍视的特质。这种爱是社会编程的一部分。
这种爱已经被社会化了，比其他任何分形概念都更为社会化，因着这个原因，它经由
人类身体-伊格，而将自己表达为了带有如下行为的力量：征服、顺应现实、牺牲、崇
拜。这些就是当集体社会编程提到爱时，人类之爱的各个面貌。我明白，任何人都可
能发现爱的其他“面貌”，不过，我会将它们作为上述四个的衍生品。无论如何，我认
可还存在更多的面貌，我们可以一起讨论，它们置于下图中哪一角，能更好地描绘人
类之爱。
66 人类的爱，我们认为是真实的那种爱—在这里，在地面上，有用的，吸引人的，有意义
的，快乐的爱，所有这些品质都是我们需要和重视的。这是我们社会程序的一部分。爱已经
社会化了，比任何其他分形概念都要社会化，正因为如此，它通过人类身体-自我来表达自
己，作为一种克服、制约现实、牺牲和崇拜的力量。这些是集体的社会程序所呈现的人类爱
的面孔。我意识到我们中的任何人都能找到更多的爱的“面孔”，但我会把它们放在我列举
的四个面孔中的第二位。然而，我承认还有很多，我们可以讨论在下图的角落放置哪四个能
更好地描述人类的爱。
63
图8
67 The broader point is not how human love is defined, but rather how the archetype or core
essence of love lives and functions. The Mandorla of Empowerment, where the Sovereign, the
64
Integral and the Sovereign Integral overlap, operates a little like elastic bands that allow
expansion into new experience, yet always the attraction to the core (the overlap) remains,
and it does not matter how far the expansion or submergence is. This attraction is always
kindled. This love is the act of bestowing empowerment on the vessels of the Sovereign
Integral’s expansion into duality! It is a wild, free substance that cannot be conditioned,
controlled or owned. It is pure in its expression of the will to integrate, but respectful of all
Sovereign’s free will.
67 更广泛的观点不是人类的爱是如何定义的，而是爱的原型或核心本质如何实践和发挥作
用。赋权的曼陀拉，Sovereign、Integral 和 Sovereign Integral 重叠的地方，有点像松紧带的
作用，容许扩张进入到新的经验，但对核心（重叠）的吸引力总是存在，不管扩张或下潜到
达多远。这种吸引力总是被点燃着。这种爱是对 那些「Sovereign Integral 进入到二元性里
的扩张」之容器 赋权的行为！它是一种非凡的、自由的本质，无法被制约、控制或拥有。
它全然地表达了整合的意愿，但尊重所有 Sovereign 的自由意志。
67更大的问题不是人类之爱如何定义，而比较是，爱的原型或核心本质是如何存在及
运作的。主权体、积分态、主权性积分态的交叠处，即赋权曼多拉，它运作得有点类
似弹力绳，容许扩张进入新的体验，可无论扩张多远、下潜多深，指向核心（交叠处）
的吸引力都始终保持着。这种吸引力始终被点燃着。这种爱是一种权利赋予的行为，
赋权主权性积分态的扩张性容器们去深入二元性！这种爱是一种不受控制、自由不羁
的存在，无法被驯化、操纵、占用。它纯粹地表达着积分整合的意志，但又尊重所有
主权体的自由意志。
67 更广泛的问题不是人类的爱是如何定义的，而是爱的原型或核心本质是如何生活和发挥
作用的。在“赋权的曼多拉”中，“主权”、“整体”和“主权整体”重叠在一起，运作起
来有点像橡皮筋，允许扩展到新的体验，但对核心(重叠)的吸引力始终保持不变，无论扩展
或淹没有多远。这种吸引力总是被点燃。这种爱是在主权整体扩展到二元性的容器上赋予力
量的行为!它是一种野性的、自由的物质，无法被制约、控制或拥有。它纯粹表达了整体的
意愿，但尊重所有主权的自由意志。
68 This love is the very essence of the Sovereign Integral. It does not feel rejection. It does
not consciously transmit or reduce or even stop transmission. It is not on or off. It flows
outward from an inward state of harmony with no expectation. It has no intention. It holds
no vision. It is without a single atom of a plan. Yet, it is the most powerful force because it
unifies, in coherence, the whole of existence.
68 这种爱就是 Sovereign Integral 的本质。它感觉不到拒绝。它不会有意识地传输或 减
少传输 甚至 停止传输。它没有打开或关闭。它从一种没有期望的「内在的和谐状态」向
外流动。它没有意图。它没有预见或远见。它没有一丁点的计划。但它却是最强大的力
量，因为它和谐地统一了整个存在。
68这种爱就是主权性积分态的真正本质。它不会感觉到“被拒绝”。它不会刻意去
传播、减少、甚或停止传播。它不驻也不离。它源自一种内在的和声/和谐㉕状态，
不带任何预期地向外流淌。它无有意图。它无有愿景。它无有一丁点的计划。可
是，它却是最为强大的力量，因为它借由聚合一致性，统合起了整个存在。
68 这种爱是主权整体的本质。它没有被拒绝的感觉。它不会有意识地传播或减少甚至停
止传播。它不开也不关。它从一种不带任何期待的内在和谐状态向外流动。它没有意图。
65
它没有愿景。它没有丝毫计划。然而，它是最强大的力量，因为它连贯一致地统一了整个
存在。
69 The Sovereign, the true, core Sovereign, can do anything that is in alignment with the
Integral. It is the co-creator of the reality it experiences. The Human Self (body-ego) is not
consciously creating its reality; it is experiencing it. The Sovereign creates its portion and the
Integral creates its portion. These realities are mixed together by the embodied, dual
Sovereign to create reality in one lifetime; on one level; in one species; and in one place and
time. Reality within the overlap of these identity markers is a distillation of the Sovereign
Integral consciousness within each of us.
69 Sovereign，真正的、核心的 Sovereign，可以做任何与 Integral 一致的事情。它是它所
经历的实相之共同的创造者。人类的自己（身体-自我）不是有意识地 创造 它的实相；它是
在 经验 它。Sovereign 创造它的部分，Integral 也创造它的部分。这些实相被具体化了的、
二元的 Sovereign 混合在一起，以创造出在一次生命中；在一个层次上；在一个物种里；以
及在一个地点和时间里 的实相。在这些身份标志之重叠里的实相，就是在我们每个人里面
的 Sovereign Integral 意识的一种精华。
69主权体，那个真正的核心主权体，只能实施校准于积分态的事。积分态是主权体所
体验实相的共同-创造者。而人类自我（身体-伊格）并未有意识地创造自身的实相，
它只是正在体验。主权体创造属于它的那部分，积分态则创造属于它的那部分。这2
部分实相被已化身的二元化主权体混合在一起，从而创造出单次生命期、单个层级、
单个物种、单个地点和时间里的实相。位于这些身份标记的交叠处的实相，即是存在
于我们每个人内里的主权性积分态意识的精馏物。
69 主权，真正的，核心的主权，能够做任何与整体一致的事情。它是它所经历的现实的共
同创造者。人类的自我(身体-自我)并没有有意识地创造它的现实；它正在经历它。主权创
造它的部分，整体创造它的部分。这些现实被化身的、二元性的主权混合在一起，在一个生
命周期中创造现实;在一个层次上;在一个物种中;在一个时间和地点。这些身份标记重叠中
的现实是我们每个人内在主权整体意识的升华。
70 As a student of duality, the Sovereign is rarely conscious that it has a collaborator: the
Integral. There are some of us that overlay intention and belief on the mysterious
intermixing of Sovereign and Integral realities, but these intentions are almost always
serving the body-ego. They are not the expressions of the Sovereignーin human realityー
seeking the Integral experience and expression. Thus, these intentions can tribalize the
body-ego into glamor and elitism. More separation, not less.
70 作为二元性的学习者，Sovereign 很少意识到它有一个合作者：Integral。我们有些人将
意图和信念覆盖在 Sovereign 和 Integral 的那些实相之神秘的混合上，但这些意图几乎总
是为 身体-自我 效劳的。它们不是 Sovereign 在人类实相里寻求 Integral 的体验和表达之
表现。因此，这些意图可以将 身体-自我 部落化为魅力和精英主义。只是更多的分离，而
不是更少。
70化身二元性学习者时，主权体极少意识到自己还有位搭档：积分态。我们中的一
些人，在主权体实相与积分态实相的神秘混合物之上，覆盖上了自身的意图和信
念，可这些意图几乎总是服务于身体-伊格的。这些并非主权体在人类实相中的真正
表达，即：寻求积分态的体验和表达。因此，这些意图可能使得身体-伊格部落化，
从而陷入魅力追求与精英主义。更多的分裂，而非更少。
66
70 作为二元性的学生，主权很少意识到它有一个合作者：整体。我们中的一些人将意图
和信仰叠加在主权和整体现实的神秘混合上，但这些意图几乎总是服务于身体-自我。它们
不是主权在人类现实中寻求整体的体验和表达—的表达。因此，这些意图可以将身体部落
化为魅力和精英主义。只是更多的分离，而不是更少。
71 The Sovereign (I am distinguishing between Sovereign and our Human Self) knows that
our reality is created, as much as it is experienced, and its creation is a conjoined
consciousness (the Sovereign Integral), creatingーwhen assembledーan infinite quilt of
realities that we can call the Integral. The kindred spirit that actually empowers us and
evokes the expression of love, no matter how dimly, in all of its entity-expressions.
71 Sovereign（我在区分 Sovereign 和我们的「人类的自己」）知道我们的实相是被创造的，
就像它是被体验的一样，而它的创造是一种联合的意识（Sovereign Integral），在组合时创造
了一件无限的「实相的被子」，我们可以称之为 Integral。Integral 是真正赋予我们力量，并
且在它所有的实体的表达中 唤起爱的表达，无论多么模糊，之同源头的精神（the kindred
spirit）。
71主权体（我正在区分主权体和人类自我）则明白，正如我们的实相是被体验的一样，
我们的实相也是被创造出来的；我们的实相的天地万物就是一种联合意识（主权性积
分态），一旦被组合在一起，它就会创造出一张被覆住各个实相的无限被褥，我们可
以称之为积分态。积分态这个家系之灵㉖真地在借由它之所及的所有实存体-表达，
来赋权着我们，并唤起着爱的表达，无论多么的朦胧。
71 主权(我在区分主权和我们的人类自我)知道我们的现实是被创造出来的，正如它所经
历的一样，它的创造是一个联合的意识(主权整体)，创造—当组装起来时—就是一张我们可
以称之为整体的无限的现实被子。志趣相投的人实际上赋予了我们以力量，并在其所有的实
体表达中，唤起了爱的表达，无论多么模糊。
72 This is not about receptivity (feminine energy) or bold, reflexive action (male energy). This
is about intentional and intelligent integration. The result is not defeating our enemies, but
rather, experiencing the empowerment of love to heal and dissolve differences or animus or
darkness or emotional pain. And it is equally the expression of integrative love.
72 这与接受性（女性能量）或大胆的、反射性的行为（男性能量）无关。这是关于 有意的
整合 和 有智能的整合。结果不是要打败我们的敌人，而是要体验爱的赋权来治愈和消除
分歧、敌意、黑暗或情感的痛苦。而它同样的也是「整合的爱」之表现。
72这无关于接受性（女性能量）或是勇猛的反射行动（男性能量）。这关乎于目的确
切的、充满智慧的积分整合。结果不是战胜我们的敌人，而比较是去体验一种赋权：
以爱来疗愈和消溶差异、敌意、黑暗或情感伤痛。这等同于在表达积分整合之爱。
72 这不是有关接受性(女性能量)或大胆的、反射性的行动(男性能量)。的这是有关意图和
智慧的融合的。结果不是打败我们的敌人，而是体验到了爱的力量来治愈和化解分歧、敌意、
黑暗或情感上的痛苦。它同样是一种完整的爱的表达。
73 The moment of reality is vertical, horizontal and every other angle a beam of light could
travel. It is the convergence point. The Sovereign Integral lives there. This form of love is an
integrative intelligence. The vital currency of all realms. It is not the learned intelligence of
academia. It is not the intelligence of experience. This love or intelligence is innate,
67
instinctual, as near to us as our skin. We simply do not fully understand how to wield it, how
to apply it in our lives, or how to even connect with it. And that is the irony, because it is
right before us as our reality.
73 「实相的当下」是垂直的、水平的以及光束可以行进的所有其他角度。它是那聚集
点。Sovereign Integral 存在于那里。这种形式的爱是一种整合的智能。所有领域的生命力
流通。这不是学术界的知识能力。这不是经验的智慧。这种爱或智能是天生的、本能的，
就像我们的皮肤一样和我们亲近。我们只是没有完全了解如何使用它，如何在我们的生活
中应用它，或者甚至是如何与它连结。这就是讽刺的地方，因为它就在我们面前，作为我
们的实相。
73当下实相/实相的当下是垂直、水平、以及光线能传播的所有角度。它是汇聚点。
主权性积分态就存在于这里。这种形式的爱是一种积分整合的智能，是对所有领域
都至关重要的硬通货。它不是习得来的学术性智能。它也非体验而生的智能。这种
爱或者智能是内在固有的、天生本能的，如皮肤般贴近我们的。我们仅仅只是并未
完全地理解，如何将它编织进、运用进我们的生命中，甚至没有理解如何连接上
它。这是一个反讽，因为它就是我们的实相本身，真真切切就存在于我们面前。
73 现实的时刻是垂直的、水平的，以及一束光可以从任何角度传播的。它是汇合点。主
权整体就住在那里。这种形式的爱是一种综合智慧。所有领域最重要的货币。它不是学术
界的知识。不是经验的智慧。这种爱或智慧是与生俱来的、本能的，就像我们的皮肤一样
贴近我们。我们只是没有完全理解如何运用它，如何在我们的生活中应用它，或甚至如何
与它联系。这是个讽刺，因为它作为我们的现实，就在我们面前。
74 The Sovereign Integral is the “screen” of life that we all face. We look into it and we can
experience the body-ego enmeshed in the pendulum of duality or we can experience the
harmony of the Integral dancing its way into and through our life, always in the moment.
Always available for us to experience and express. The Sovereign is not intent on producing
miracles or phenomena of a psychic or magical nature. Instead, it seeks experience and
expression from a deeper understanding of itself and the Integral. This experience is the ever-
deepening sense that the Sovereign Integral within us is the source of our unique reality. It is
actually through this deepening awareness that the “miracles” arrive.
74 Sovereign Integral 是我们所有人都面对着的「生命的“荧幕”」。我们看进它里面，我们可
以体验 陷入二元性的钟摆里的 身体-自我，或者我们可以体验「Integral 总是在当下跳着舞
进入并且贯穿我们的生活」的那种和谐。这些都随时可供我们去体验和表达。Sovereign 并
不想要创造那些属于神通或魔法性质的奇迹或现象。相反的，它从对它自己和对 Integral 的
一种更深入的理解中去寻求经验和表达。这种体验 就是对于「在我们里面的 Sovereign
Integral 是我们独特的实相之源头」这个事实 之不断在加深的感觉。事实上，正是藉由这种
深化的意识（或知觉），“奇迹”才会到来。
74主权性积分态是我们所有人都面对着的生命“屏幕”。我们注视它时，要么是体验
到，身体-伊格卷入了二元性的钟摆；要么是体验到，积分态的和声/和谐，始终都在
当下里，一路舞蹈着进入、穿过我们的生命。我们始终都能经由这个“屏幕”去体验
和表达。主权体的意图不是去制造奇迹、心灵现象、魔力特性。相反，主权体寻求的
是，基于对自身及积分态的更深理解，来体验和表达。这样的体验是一种持续深化的
感知，即：我们内里的主权性积分态正是我们独一无二实相的源头。事实上，正是源
于这深化的知觉，“奇迹”真地出现了。
68
74 主权整体是我们所有人面对的生命的“屏幕”。我们观察它，我们可以体验到沉浸在二
元性钟摆中的身体-自我，或者我们可以体验整体的和谐，以它的方式舞蹈进入并贯穿我们
的生命，一直在当下。随时可供我们体验和表达。主权并不打算创造灵性或魔法性质的奇迹
或现象。相反，它从对自身和整体的更深层次的理解中寻求经验和表达。这种体验是一种不
断加深的感觉，即我们内在的主权整体是我们独特现实的源泉。正是通过这种深入的认识，
“奇迹”才会到来。
75 Intelligence is a relative thing. We bound our universe not unlike the Lilliputians who
bound the giant, Gulliver. We do this especially with the multiverse, we confer our
intelligence to it and in doing so, we collectively pull down the shade over the window of the
Sovereign and close the doorway of the Integral. However, this actーthis general act ーis a
large factor in the Separation Game,13 otherwise known as the game of life. The Separation
Game will be detailed in a later Section, for now, it is only important to know that this
“game” is purposeful and made possible through the intelligence of love.
75 智能是一种相对的东西。我们束缚了我们的宇宙，这与束缚巨人格列佛的小人国没有
什么不同。我们对于复合宇宙特别是这样做，我们将我们的智能颁发给它，在这样做的过
程中，我们共同拉下了 Sovereign 窗户上方的帘子并且关闭了Integral 的大门。然而，这
个行为——这个一般行为——是分离游戏
13
里的一个重要因素，分离游戏也被称为生命游
戏。分离游戏将在后面的章节中详细介绍，现在，重要的是要知道这个“游戏”是有目的
的，并且是藉由 爱的智能 才有可能实现的。
75智能是相对之物。我们捆绑着我们的宇宙，跟小人国捆绑巨人格列佛㉗并无两
样。对待复合宇宙时，我们尤为如此，我们将我们的智能加诸于它，这么做时，我
们集体地拉上了主权体的窗帘，关闭了积分态的入口。不过，这个行为——这种普
遍的行为——是分裂游戏(13)或者叫生命游戏的一个大要素。分裂游戏将在下节详
述，现在，唯一重要的是知道，这个“游戏”有着明确的目的，并且，正是爱之智
能使得该游戏成为了可能。
75 智力是一种相对的东西。我们束缚了我们的宇宙，就像束缚巨人格列佛的小人国一
样。我们这样做，尤其是在多重宇宙中，我们将我们的智慧赋予它，并在这样做的过程
中，我们集体地拉下了主权之窗的窗帘并关闭整体的大门。然而，这个行为—这个普遍的
行为—是分离游戏（注13），也就是众所周知的生命游戏中的一个很大的因素，分离游戏
将在后面的章节中详细介绍，现在，重要的是要知道这个“游戏”是有目的的，并通过爱的
智慧而成为可能。
76 The intelligence we assign to the Multiverse is evolving through the lens of science. Once a
new theory is proven by science to have value, it is shuttled into the hallowed hallways of
academia and it is taught in our educational systems. It becomes the bedrock of our beliefs in
how our universe and multiverse operates and functions. Science can only digest so much
information at a time, so this intelligence that we confer to the multiverse is slowly evolving.
Remember, we went from an earth-centric belief, to a solar-centric belief, to a galactic-centric
belief, to a universe-centric belief, to a multiverse theory, in a little less than 500 years.
13
定义见 段落 167。
69
76 我们派给复合宇宙的智能正在藉由科学的视角不断发展。一旦一种新理论被科学证明具
有价值，它就会穿梭在学术界的神圣走廊中，并且在我们的教育系统中被传授。它成为我们
对宇宙和复合宇宙如何运作和起作用的信念的基石。科学一次只能消化这么多讯息，因此我
们赋予复合宇宙的这种智能正在缓慢进化。要记得，我们在快要 500 年的时间里，才从以
地球为中心的信念，到以太阳为中心的信念，再到以银河系为中心的信念，再到以宇宙为中
心的信念，再到一种复合宇宙的理论。
76我们加诸于复合宇宙的智能，正在经由科学镜头而进化。一旦某种新理论被科学证
明有价值，它就被传送进学术界的圣化走廊，然后教授于我们的教育系统中。于是它
就变成了我们信念的基石，诠释着我们的宇宙及复合宇宙如何运作和起效的。科学一
次只能消化这么多信息，所以，我们加诸给复合宇宙的智能慢慢地进化着。回忆下，
在不到500年的时间里，我们的信念，就从地心说，日心说，银河中心说，发展到宇
宙中心学，直至复合宇宙理论。
76 我们分配给多重宇宙的智慧正在通过科学的透镜不断进化。一旦一种新理论被科学证明
具有价值，它就会被送入学术界的神圣殿堂，并在我们的教育系统中教授。它成为我们对宇
宙和多重宇宙是如何运行和运作的信念的基石。科学一次只能消化这么多信息，因此我们赋
予多重宇宙的智慧正在缓慢发展。请记住，在不到500年的时间里，我们从以地球为中心的
信念，到以太阳为中心的信念，到以银河为中心的信念，再到以宇宙为中心的信念，再到多
重宇宙理论。
77 The main point of all of this is that the multiverse is infinitely more intelligent than we grant
it to be, again, because the lens of science is dual in nature, and the core of our multiverse is
nondual. Which is to say, the known cannot know the Unknowable. We are born into a reality
where physical laws imprint on the existence of our species, and we are therefore subject to
the slow evolution of perceiving the infinite intelligence of the multiverse and a Sovereign’s
purpose to harmonize with the Integral.
77 所有这一切的要点是，复合宇宙比我们认为的要聪明得多，再次的，因为科学的镜头本
质上是二元的，而我们的复合宇宙的核心是非二元的。也就是说，「已知的」不能知道「不
可知的」。我们出生在一个「物理定律在我们物种的存在上留下印记」的实相里，因此我们
受制于，对于「复合宇宙的无限智能」和「Sovereigns要去与 Integral 协调一致的目的之感
知 的进化缓慢。
77这一切的要点在于，复合宇宙远远比我们承认的更为智能，再次地，这是因为，科
学镜头本质上是二元性的，而我们的复合宇宙的核心是非二元的。这就是说，“已知”
无法知晓“不可知”。我们所诞生进的这个实相，物理法则压印于我们物种的存在性
上，我们也因此服从了感知的缓慢进化，来缓慢地感知复合宇宙的无限智能，以及主
权体要去和声协奏于积分态的意图。
77 所有这一切的要点在于，多重宇宙比我们所想象的要聪明得多，再一次，因为科学的镜
头本质上是二元性的，而我们多重宇宙的核心是非二元性的。也就是说，已知的不能知道不
可知的。我们出生在一个现实里，在那里物理法则印在我们物种的存在上，因此我们受制于
对多重宇宙无限智慧以及主权与整体相协调之目的的感知的缓慢进化。
78 Science will not discover the Sovereign Integral. It will discover laws that lead them to
conclude that the Sovereign Integral is possible, but not decipherable, visible, capturable, or
in any other respect, able to be made explicit by the standards and measurements of science.
Science and the empiricism of the five senses can only go so far. This is precisely why the
70
Integral exists, because otherwise the Sovereign, within the body-ego, would create a Social
Program that would not expand in its philosophic and scientific explorations.
78 科学不会发现 Sovereign Integral。它会发现一些定律，而这些定律将会让他们得出结论
说，Sovereign Integral 是可能的，但无法解译、看见、捕获或以任何其他方式，透过标准和
科学的测量来使它明确。科学和五种感官的经验论只能到此为止了。这正是 Integral 存在的
原因，否则 身体-自我 中的 Sovereign 将会创建一个「不会扩展其哲学和科学方面的探索」
之社会程序设定。
78科学不会发现主权性积分态。不过，它将发现的一些法则会引导人们去推定：主权
性积分态是可能的，但却又是无从解释、无从看见、无法捕获、在任何方面都无法以
科学标准和尺度来阐明。五感经验主义和科学只能走到这里。而恰恰正是因为这一点，
我们才说积分态必定存在，否则，存在于身体-伊格内的主权体，所创造出的社会编
程就压根无法扩展其哲学及科学探索。
78 科学不会发现主权整体。它将发现一些规律，引导他们得出结论:主权整体是可能的，但
不是可解释的，可见的，可捕获的，或在任何其他方面，能够通过科学的标准和测量来明确
的。科学和五种感官的经验主义只能走这么远。这正是整体存在的原因，因为否则，在身体
-自我内的主权将创造出一个不会扩展其哲学和科学探索的社会程序。
79 One of the more esoteric concepts in metaphysics is the harmony of opposites. For example,
knowing and unknowing are opposites, and yet they can come into harmony by the Sovereign’s
intention. The intention to create harmony between opposites helps us to locate the balance
point where tension is rung out of the dual system. If that becomes the perspective of the
Sovereign and the body-ego, it can be applied to any concept or thing that is separated as an
opposite.
79 形而上学中更深奥的概念之一是 与各种对立面的和谐（the harmony of opposites）。例
如，知道（knowing）与 不知道（unknowing）是对立的，但它们可以藉由 Sovereign 的意图
而处于和谐的状态。在对立面之间创造和谐的意图有助于我们找到平衡点，当这个平衡点被
达到了，紧张的关系会发生在二元的系统之外。如果这成为了 Sovereign 和 身体-自我 （共
同）的观点，它就可以被应用在任何被分离而作为一种对立的概念或事物上。
79更为神秘难解的概念之一则是，对立面的和声/和谐。举例而言，知道和不知道是
对立面，但藉由主权体的意图，它们能实现和声/和谐。意欲创造出对立面的和声/和
谐的意图，帮助我们确定了精确的平衡点，在这里，张力/紧张性就是借力跳出二元
系统的梯子横阶。如果这成为主权体和身体-伊格的视角，它就能被应用到任何被分
裂为成对立面的概念或事物中来。
79对立的和谐是形而上学中更深奥的概念之一。例如，知与不知是对立的，但他们可以通
过主权的意愿而和谐相处。在对立之间创造和谐的意图帮助我们找到平衡点，在这个平衡点
上，张力从二元性系统中释放出来。如果这成为主权和身体-自我的视角，它可以被应用到
任何被分离为对立面的概念或事物里。
80 This is a method to experience the Integral: To practice and hold intentions that
harmonize the dual nature of the reality we experience. To create and experience relative
harmony within a dual system as a collaborator with the Integral. It is never perfect, we all
have our dark times, when the balance, at least in the moment, seems to have swung too far
one way or the other. It is one of the bonding elements of the human condition. It is also
71
one of the ways that the Sovereign is encouraged to reach for the Integral in order to
embody the Sovereign Integral in duality.
80 这是一种体验 Integral 的方法：练习 和 保持「要与我们所经历的实相之二元的性质
相调和」的意图。作为 Integral 的合作者，在一种二元的系统中创造和体验相对的和谐。
这从来都不会是完美的，我们都有自己的黑暗时期，至少在那一刻，平衡似乎以一种或另
一种方式摇摆得太远了。它是人类境况的结合要素之一。它也是鼓励 Sovereign 到达
Integral 以在二元性中体现 Sovereign Integral 的方式之一。
80下面是一种体验积分态的方法。持有并实践如下意图：去实现我们所体验的这个
实相的二元属性之间的和声协奏。去作为积分态的搭档，来创造和体验二元系统内
的相对的和声/和谐。这个过程从来不会完美，至少在某个时刻，当天平看上去倒向
一侧时，我们都会遭遇自己的黑暗时刻。这个过程是人类境遇中的黏合要素之一。
这个过程也是主权体被鼓励去走入的道路之一，在这条路上，主权体探伸向积分
态，从而在二元性里具体地体现出了主权性积分态。
80 这是一个体验整体的方法：去实践和持有意愿，协调我们所体验的现实的二元性质。作
为整体的合作者，在二元性系统中创造和体验相对的和谐。从来都不是完美的，我们都有
黑暗的时候，当平衡，至少在此刻，似乎已经摇摆得太远了。它是人类状况的组成部分之
一。这也是鼓励主权者达到整体的方式之一，以便在二元性中体现主权整体。
72
重要的不是你相信什么或你知道什么，而是你准备好要被显露出来了
要紧的不是你相信或知道什么，而是你准备好被揭示出来了
重要的不是你相信什么或你知道什么，而是你准备好了被显露出来。
译注22：大 圆 满。藏 传 佛 教 最高法门
译注23：主权体是所有下辖生命形式体验总和。积分态是所有主权体的所有生
命形式体验的总和，被作为生活环境和现实提供给一个主权体去体验。
译注24：积分态的谱系，将积分态意识连接的所有生命视为亲戚，那么实相之间
的关系就是一种血缘谱系。
译注25：因着国内中文和谐的习语含义，这个词特定加了个和声来暗示和谐的
大致意思。
73
译注26：家系之灵，见译注24。积分态将所有生命形态视为一个家系的亲人。
因为都出自第一诞生者和第一源头。
译注27：《格列佛游记》温顺善良的格列佛意外陷入了2个小人国的战争中，最
后无奈逃离。
Section 3第三节
The Sovereign Integral: A General Model
The Sovereign Integral：一个大致上的模型
主权性积分态：一般模型
主权整体：一个通用模型
81 The Sovereign Integral is the nondual consciousness informed by the merging of the
Sovereign and the Integral perspectives within the Levels and Lifetimes of an individuated
body-ego-social program. As it pertains to the human being, the Sovereign Integral is an
aspirational beacon embedded in the Social Program of the dual Integral and the dual
Sovereign that binds the three entities into one, that which we call love, but it is a different
love. The Sovereign Integral is the consciousness where opposites unite in a sustainable
harmony, thus the overlap between the three, fractal entitiesー Sovereign, Integral and
Sovereign Integralーis the co-singular, expressionary consciousness of love and intelligence.
81 Sovereign Integral 是由 在一个「个别化了的 身体-自我-社会程序设定」的那些层次和生
生世世内（产生）的「一些 Sovereign 和 Integral 的观点 之合并」所通知助成（inform）的
「非二元的意识」。就人类而言，Sovereign Integral 是嵌入在二元的 Integral 和二元的
Sovereign 之社会程序设定中的一种渴望更大成就的指引，它将三个实体合而为一，就是我
们称为的 爱，但它是一种不同的爱。Sovereign Integral 是「对立面（复数）以一种可持续
的和谐统一起来」的意识，因此三个碎形实体－－Sovereign，Integral，和 Sovereign Integral
－－之间的重叠，是爱与智能之共同单一的，表达的意识（the co-singular, expressionary
consciousness of love and intelligence）。
81主权性积分态是非二元意识。对于各层级和各生命期的个体性身体-伊格-社会编
程，主权体和积分态各有其视角，这2类视角的融合物则通信/影响着非二元的主权
性积分态意识。对于人类存在而言，主权性积分态是一座志存高远的灯塔，深嵌于二
元化主权体和二元化积分态的社会编程中，将这三个实存体结合为了一体，这个过程
我们称之为爱，但却是一种不同于人类之爱的爱。在主权性积分态意识里，对立面联
合在一种可持续的和声/和谐中，所以，这三个分形存在——主权体、积分态、主权性
积分态——的交叠处，即是爱与智能的共-奇点㉘表达意识。
81 主权整体是一种非二元性意识，它是由一个个体化的身体-自我社会程序的层次和生命
周期内主权和整体观点的合并所形成的。当它与人类相关时，主权整体是一个充满抱负的灯
塔，嵌入在二元性整体和二元性主权的社会程序中，将三个实体结合成一个，我们称之为爱，
但它是一种不同的爱。主权整体是对立面以可持续的和谐的方式联合起来的意识，因此这三
个分形实体—主权、整体和主权整体—之间的重叠是共同单一的、富有表现力的爱和智慧的
意识。
82 The Sovereign Integral is the transcendental object that has been faithfully pulling at our
psyche for millions of years as a species and as an individual. The efforts of the human search,
74
for meaning and purpose, have resulted in our world today. I am suggesting in that statement
that the search for meaning and purpose is really the search for the Sovereign Integral. And
this concept, this powerful concept, of our Imaginary Being, has been misunderstood by the
body-ego because it has lived in a dusty cage of words and symbols, hidden behind rituals and
ceremonies. This has resulted in our collective Social Programーa reality that flows in the up-
down waveform of dualityーfractured into socioeconomic, gender, ethnicity, political,
geographical and religious shards of tribalism, social mindedness and groupthink; it is also
filled with love, energy, relationships, passions, creativity and insight.
82 Sovereign Integral 是一种超验论*的对象（the transcendental object），数百万年来一直
忠实地牵引着我们－－作为一个族类和作为一个个体－－的心灵。人类为了探寻意义和目的
而进行的努力，造就了我们今天的世界。我在那句话中暗示，对意义和目的的探寻实际上就
是对 Sovereign Integral 的探寻。而这个概念，这个关于我们「想象中的存在」的强大概念，
被 身体-自我 误解了，因为它已经生活在一个由文字和符号组成的布满尘土的、隐藏在仪
式和典礼之后的 笼子里了。这导致了我们的集体社会程序设定——一个在二元性的上下波
形中流动的实相——碎开成了部落主义、社会意识和团体迷思 之 社会经济、性别、种族、
政治、地理和宗教的碎片了；（但）它也充满了爱、能量、人际关系、热情、创造力和洞察
力。
82主权性积分态是先验性㉙存在，数百万年来，它矢志不移地拨动着我们——整个物
种和单个个体——的心弦。人类对于意义和目的的搜寻努力，造就了当今世界。而我
认为，上句里“对意义和目的的搜寻”，事实上就是在搜寻主权性积分态。这个概念，
这个关于我们想象性存在的强有力概念，一直被身体-伊格所误解，因为身体-伊格生
活在文字和符号的尘封牢笼，而想象性存在则隐藏于规程和仪式背后。这种情况导致
我们的集体社会编程——流动于起伏波动的二元性中的实相——破碎成了部落主义、
心智主导、思维趋同的各类碎片：社会经济地位、性别、种族、政治、地域、宗教；
但同时，我们的集体社会编程也被注入了爱、活力、关系、热情、创造力和洞见。
82 主权整体是一个超验对象，它作为一个物种和个体，数百万年来一直忠实地吸引着我们
的心灵。人类为寻找意义和目的而付出的努力造就了我们今天的世界。我在声明中提出，对
意义和目的的探索实际上就是对主权整体的探索。这个概念，关于我们想象的存在的强大概
念，被身体-自我误解了，因为它一直生活在一个布满文字和符号，以及隐藏在典礼和仪式
背后的布满灰尘的笼子里。这导致了我们集体的社会程序—一个流动在二元性的上下波形里
的现实—分裂成部落主义、社会意识和群体思维的社会经济、性别、种族、政治、地理和宗
教的碎片;它也充满了爱、能量、关系、激情、创造力和洞察力。
*译注：超验论（或超验主义 transcendentalism）
https://zh.wikipedia.org/wiki/%E8%B6%85%E9%AA%8C%E4%B8%BB%E4%B9%89
83 The true transcendental object is not aligned to separation, tribalism or institutional truth,
because its essence is a nondual consciousness that is the union of all opposites within a
Sovereign’s existence. Whatever construct of reality we immerse ourselves into ーhumanism,
rationalism, existentialism, panpsychism, atheism, metaverse, universe, multiverseーthe
transcendental object, by virtue of its name alone, is outside or beyond. Unknowable is its
brand. It is the pure existence of love and intelligence in all levels of reality and through all life
forms.
75
83 真正「超验论的对象」并不与分离、部落主义或 制度性的真理 对齐，因为它的本质是
一种非二元的意识，是 Sovereigns 的存在中的所有对立面的合一。无论我们是沉浸在何种
实相结构中－－人文主义、理性主义、存在主义、泛心论、无神论、元宇宙、宇宙、复合宇
宙——「超验论的对象」，仅凭它的名字，就在（这些实相结构的）外面或（超越这些实相
结构）之外。那「不可知的」是它的烙印。它是爱与智能 在实相的所有层次 和 所有的生
命形式 中 的全然存在。
83真正的先验存在没有被校准于分裂、部落化、或者体制化真理，因为它的本质是非
二元意识：一个主权体存在性之内的所有对立面的统合。无论我们让自己沉浸于何种
实相结构——人本主义、理想主义、存在主义、泛心论、无神论、虚拟世界、元宇宙、
复合宇宙——这个先验存在，性如其名，是外于或超越于这一切的。不可知即是它的
标签。它是爱与智能的纯粹存在，存在于所有层级的实相中，遍及于所有生命形态里。
83 真正的超验对象并不与分离、部落主义或制度性的真理相一致，因为它的本质是一个非
二元的意识，是一个主权存在中所有对立面的联合。无论我们将自己沉浸在什么样的现实
的架构中—人文主义、理性主义、存在主义、泛心主义、无神论、元宇宙、宇宙、多元宇
宙等先验对象，仅凭它的名字，就在这些现实架构的外面或是在这些架构之外的。不可知
是它的烙印。它是爱与智慧在现实的所有层次和所有的生命形式中的纯粹存在。
84 As a reader of this paper, you might wonder, “Why does the author, in painting one-pixel
of the vast canvas of consciousness, focus on the Sovereign Integral as the one-pixel? Why
that and not the Supreme Being?”
84 作为本文的读者，您可能会纳闷，“为什么作者在绘制 意识的广阔画布 的一个像素时，
会集中在 Sovereign Integral 作为那个像素来绘制？为什么是那样，而不是至高的上帝（the
Supreme Being）呢？”
84做为本文的读者，你也许会疑惑“这个作者声称画下意识那浩瀚画卷的一个单像
素，他为何将主权性积分态作为单像素来聚焦其上？为什么是这样，为什么不是那至
高存在？”
84 作为本文的读者，你可能会想，“为什么作者在浩瀚的意识画布上绘制一个像素时，聚
焦于将主权整体作为一个像素?”为什么是主权整体而不是上帝?
85 Language, in any form, holds concepts and information from expanding into total
abstraction. What is abstraction as it relates to language? It is when a term is metaphysical in
nature, like the term consciousness, but particularly when it is a fractal concept.
Consciousness is unknown; we only know that it has an on-off switch via the physical body. It
cannot be reduced to mathematical models. Abstractionーpure abstractionーis of the higher
mind; the part of consciousness that experiences duality with a noble aim to be our bridge to
nonduality.
85 任何形式的语言都会使得概念和讯息无法扩展为完全的抽象。什么是与语言相关的抽象？
这是当一个术语在本质上是形而上学的，就像 意识 这个术语一样，而特别是当它是一个碎
形的概念时。意识是未知的；我们只知道藉由物质性的身体它有一个开关。它不能简化为数
学模型。抽象——纯粹的抽象——是属于更高脑力的；更高脑力 是意识「以一种 要成为我
们通达非二元性的桥梁 之崇高的目标 在体验二元性」的那部分。
85任何类型的语言，都拥有一些因扩张进绝对抽象领域而来的概念和信息。就语言而
论，什么是抽象？抽象是指一个词带有形而上学的性质，比如“意识”，尤其又当“意
识”这个词是个分形概念时。意识是未知的，我们仅仅知道，它经由物质身体拥有了
76
一个通-断开关。它无法简化成数学模型。抽象——纯粹的抽象——属于更高心智，
意识的这一部分，体验二元性时，却带着一个恢弘的目标：作为我们通往非二元性的
桥梁。
85 任何形式的语言都不能将概念和信息扩展为完全的抽象。与语言相关的抽象是什么?这
是当一个术语在本质上是形而上学的，就像意识这个词，尤其是当它是分形概念的时候。意
识是未知的；我们只知道藉由身体它有一个开关。它无法被简化为数学模型。抽象—纯粹的
抽象—属于更高头脑；更高头脑是意识中体验二元性、以成为我们通往非二元性的桥梁为崇
高目标的那部分。
86 Can we really confine or contain the infinite? Even the words, diagrams and paintings of
this paper constitute a cage, perhaps larger, but it is still a cage, a limitation, due to the infinite
being described by two-dimensions. This needs to be frequently acknowledged, as it bonds us
to a humble nature.
86 我们真的能限制或容纳 无限 吗？ 就连本文的文字、图表和绘画，都构成了一个笼子，
也许比较大，但它仍然是一个笼子，一种限制，因为 无限 被以二次元（two-dimensions）
来描述了。需要经常认知到这一点，因为它把我们与一种谦卑的本性结合在一起。
86难道我们真地能限定或包纳下这种无限性？即使本文以文字、图解和绘画所构架
的笼子，甚至比这更大的笼子，都依然还是笼子，一种有限性，总归是是在以2维的
方式描述无限的存在。这种情况需要被经常地承认，因为它会将我们联系上一种谦逊
的品性。
86我们真的能限制或容纳无限吗?就连本文的文字，图表和绘画也构成了一个笼子，也许更
大一些，但它仍然是一个笼子，一种限制，因为无限在这里是用二维来描述的。需要经常承
认这一点，因为它将我们与谦卑的天性联系在一起。
87 None of us knows the ultimate truth. None of us fully understands consciousness at its very
core, because the Sovereign Integral consciousness, as an essence, is nondual in nature. To
describe the Sovereign Integral as an Imaginary Being of perfect subjectivity, and then to
imagine what or who brought this penultimate consciousness into existence, is not a
legitimate subject for a nonfiction work. We are better off, in my opinion, to level our sights
on the consciousness that we can imagine.
87 我们没有人知道终极的真理。我们没有人完全理解意识的核心，因为 Sovereign Integral
意识，作为一种本体，在本质上是非二元的。将 Sovereign Integral 描述为一个完全主观的
「想象中的存在」，然后再去想象 是什么 或 是谁 使这个倒数第二的意识 诞生的，对于
非虚构作品来说不是一个合乎逻辑的主题。在我看来，我们最好将目光针对 我们 能够 想
象的 意识。
87我们中没有人知晓终极真理。没有任何人完全理解意识的真正核心，因为主权性积
分态意识，就本质而言，具有非二元的天然属性。我们已经将主权性积分态描绘成完
全主观的想象性存在，如果还要进一步去想象是什么或者谁，将存在性带给了这个倒
数第二位的意识，这就不是非虚构作品所能承载的主题了。就我的观点，我们更好的
选择是，将视野转向瞄准于我们还能够去想象的“意识”这一主题。
87 我们没有人知道终极的真理。我们没有人完全理解意识的核心，因为主权整体意识作为
本质，是非二元性的。将主权整体描述为一个完全主观的想象的存在，然后想象是什么或是
谁使得这个倒数第二的意识产生的，这对一部非虚构作品来说不是一个合理的主题。在我看
来，我们最好把目光放在我们能够想象的意识上。
77
88 Part of the reason that the Creator of the Sovereign Integral consciousness is
Unknowable to the body-ego, is that the Sovereign Integral has undergone such an extensive
reposition in human reality. Its human expression in the early twenty-first century is blunted,
constricted and institutionalized, hemmed in by an increasingly technology dependent
society. And this society is more compelling to the five senses than the imaginative
experience of the Sovereign Integral consciousness.
88 Sovereign Integral 意识的 创造者 对 身体-自我 来说是不可知的，部分原因在于
Sovereign Integral 在人类实相里已经经历了一种如此广泛的重新定位。它的人类表达在21
世纪初期是迟钝的、狭窄的和制度化的，被日益依赖科技的社会所包围住了。相较于「对
Sovereign Integral 意识的想象体验」，这种（科技）社会是更能说服和吸引五种感官的。
88主权性积分态意识的创造者，对于身体-伊格而言是不可知的，这种情况的部分
原因在于，主权性积分态在人类实相里经历了如此大量的位置迁移。在21世纪初，
随着社会对技术的日益依赖，主权性积分态的人类表达，已经被钝化、狭隘化、体
制化、锁边化。这个社会更偏向去激发五种感官，而非激发主权性积分态意识的想
象性体验。
88 .主权整体意识的创造者对身体-自我来说是不可知的，部分原因是主权整体在人类现实
中经历了如此广泛的重新定位。它在21世纪早期的人类表达是迟钝的，狭隘的和制度化
的，被一个日益依赖技术的社会所包围。这个社会对五种感官来说比主权整体意识的想象
体验更有吸引力。
89 If our perceptions and attentions were not swayed by computer technology it would be
transportation technology or agricultural technology or the technology of the wheel or fire
itself. This has been a recurring pattern since humanity became the byproduct of earth so it
could achieve its destiny, becoming the Scribes of Consciousness14 . Humanity is the one
species, living on earth, that can describe consciousness. This is possible through the
activation and continuing presence of the Sovereign Integral within an individual’s Social
Program.
89 如果我们的感知和注意力没有被计算机科技所左右，那也会是交通科技或农业科技，或
动力科技，或燃料科技本身。这是一种反复出现的模式，自从人类成为了地球的副产品，以
便它可以实现它的命运，成为 意识的抄写员（the Scribes of Consciousness）
14
以来。人类
是 存在于地球上的 唯一可以描述意识的物种。这可以藉由「在一个个体的社会程序设定中
之 Sovereign Integral」的活化和持续的临在来实现。
89就算我们的感知和注意力未被计算机技术统治，也会被运输技术、农业技术、轮机
技术、甚至仅仅是火堆。自从人类作为地球衍生物出现以来，这是一种反复出现的模
式，只有这样，人类才能实现其天命：成为意识临摹者(14)。人类这个物种，即使生活
于地球上时，也能够描绘出意识（的模样）。这件事成为可能，正是藉由主权性积分
态在个体社会编程内的激活和持续性临在。
89 如果我们的感知和注意力没有受到计算机技术的影响，那也会是交通技术、农业技术、
齿轮技术或火的技术本身。自从人类成为地球的副产品以来，这一直是一个重复出现的模式，
以便它能实现它的命运，成为意识的抄写员（14）。人类是生活在地球上的、唯一一个可以
描述意识的物种。这通过个人社会程序中主权整体的激活和持续存在是可能。
14
定义见第155段。
78
90 Whatever the technology of the time and place, it is a natural outgrowth of the Integral’s
attraction, though the Integral is cloaked in duality, it remains vibrant beneath the cloak,
whispering to the Sovereign to nudge and coax the body-ego, the mind and heart, to invite
the Sovereign Integral perspective into their Social Program with the intention, and this is
important, of experiencing and expressing the love spoken of in the first paragraph of this
Section (paragraph 81).
90 无论是在什么 时间和地点 的科技，它都是 Integral 吸引力的自然产物，尽管 Integral
披着二元性的外衣，但它在外衣底下仍然充满活力，对 Sovereign 耳语要它轻推和劝诱 身
体-自我、脑力与心，来邀请 Sovereign Integral 的观点进入它们的社会程序设定里，目的是
要，而这很重要，体验和表达本节第一段（第81 段）中所说的 爱。
90无论什么时代和地区的技术，都是积分态之吸引力的自然衍生品，即便积分态被披
上二元性的斗篷，它依然鲜活地振动于斗篷之下，向主权体耳语道：去轻推和哄劝身
体-伊格、心智以及心脏，让它们邀请主权性积分态视角进入它们的社会编程，重要
的是，这份邀请需要带上体验和表达爱的意图，本节第一段提及的那种爱。
90 无论是在什么时间和地点的科技，它都是整体的吸引力的自然产物，尽管整体被掩盖在
二元性中，但它在斗篷下仍然充满活力，对主权悄声低语，以敦促和劝诱身体-自我，头脑
和心灵邀请主权整体的观点进入他们的社会程序，目的是，而这很重要，体验和表达在本节
的第一段(第81段)中提到的爱。
91 To come full circle, trying to describe the Sovereign Integral’s miraculous Creator, before
we can describe a more fine-grained picture of the Sovereign Integral, is a waste of words,
and at best, poetry unmoored to its subject.
91 绕一圈再回来，在我们能把 Sovereign Integral 的画面描述得更精细之前，就试图要描述
Sovereign Integral 之奇迹般的造创者，是在浪费文字，充其量也只是迷失了主题的诗歌。
91回到开始的话题，在能够描绘出更细腻纹理的主权性积分态画像之前，就尝试去描
绘主权性积分态那不可思议的创造者，只能是一种文字的浪费，在最好的情况下，也
仅仅诗歌能够启航向这个主题。
91 绕了一圈，在我们能够将主权整体的画面描述得更精细之前，就试图描述主权整体不可
思议的创造者，是在浪费文字，顶多也只是与主题无关的诗歌。
92 The Sovereign Integral can be described from any number of perspectives. It is forever in
a creation state as depicted in the diagram below.
92 Sovereign Integral 可以从任何数量的角度来描述。它永远处于创建的状态，如下图
所示。
92主权性积分态可以从无限数量的视角来描绘。下面的图解描绘的是：主权性积分
态永远处于一种创造的状态。
92 主权整体可以从许多角度来描述。它永远处在创造的状态中，如下图所示。
79
80
93 The Collected Sovereign is the Student of Duality across all expressions of the
individuated consciousness. This is the identity of the Sovereign as it occupies Levels and
Lifetimes in duality. It shares its experiences (information) with the Collective Sovereign,
which is the Integral in duality. It is this that informs the Sovereign Integral, enabling it to
evolve and expand its fractal nature to new levels of consciousness within duality while
imbuing a sense of unification of these two realms: dual and nondual.
93 聚集的（Collected）Sovereign 是 横跨了「个别化了的意识之所有表达」的 二元性的
学习者。这是 Sovereign 的身份，因为它在二元性中占据了多个层次和生生世世。它与集
体的（Collective） Sovereign 分享它的经验（讯息），而集体的Sovereign 就是二元性中
的 Integral。正是这种情况 通知助成了 Sovereign Integral，使其能够在二元性内进化和扩
展其碎形本质到那些新的意识层次，同时灌输着这两个领域–– 二元的与非二元的––的一
种统一感。
93分形集㉚主权体这个二元性学习者，横跨了个别化意识的所有表达。当主权体占
据、运作于二元性各层级和各生命期时，分形集主权体即是主权体的身份。分形集
主权体将自己的体验（信息）共享给了全体主权体，在二元性内这个过程就是积分
态。正是这种过程，通信/塑造着主权性积分态，激发它演进自己的分形属性，来扩
张进二元性内的种种新意识层级，同时又为这些层级灌注进一种二元与非二元领域
的联合感。㉛
93 集体的主权是二元性的学生，跨越了所有个体化意识的表达。这是主权的身份，因为
它在二元性中占据了各种层面和生命。它与集体的主权分享其经验(信息)，集体的主权是
二元性里的整体。正是这种情况通告了主权整体，使它能够进化和扩展它的分形本质到二
元性的新的意识水平，同时灌输一种对这两个领域:二元性和非二元性的统一感。
94 It is quite like a massive block of marble waiting to be sculpted, and each Sovereign is an
artist. Some take the chisel and strike it once and step back. Others do not even grasp the
chisel, sketching ideas instead, not ready to make a conscious impression upon the marbleー
the collective Social Program. Others inspect very closely, wondering what the block of marble
will become, but are not interested in committing a chisel cut to the marble, fearful that they
may taint it. Yet others will strike the marble until they can see an effect of their efforts, a curve
or an emergent form of some kind.
94 这很像一大块等待雕刻的大理石，而每一个 Sovereign 都是艺术家。有些人拿起凿子，
敲一下，然后退后一步。其他人甚至不握凿子，而是勾勒想法，没有准备好在大理石——集
体的社会程序设定－－上留下有意识的印象。其他人非常仔细地检查，想知道大理石块会变
成什么，但对用凿子切割大理石不感兴趣，担心他们可能会玷污它。然而，还有其他人会敲
击大理石，直到他们看见自己努力的效果，曲线或某种形式的涌现。
94这就好比一块巨大的大理石等待着雕刻，每一个主权体都是艺术家。一些人拿起凿子，
凿一下退一步（审视），一些人甚至没拿起凿子，只是在勾勒创意草图，还未准备好将意
识印记加诸于大理石——集体社会编程上。一些人则密切关注着这一切，好奇大理石会变
成什么样，却没兴趣拿起凿子雕刻，担心损坏了它。然而，还有一些人，会一直在敲击，
直至能看到努力成果，一道弧线或某种雏形。
81
94 它就像一大块等待雕刻的大理石，每个主权都是一个艺术家。有些人拿起凿子，敲了一
下就退后了。另一些人甚至没有抓住凿子，只是简单地勾勒想法，没有准备好在大理石—集
体的社会程序—上留下有意识的印象。其他人则仔细地检查，想知道大理石会变成什么，但
他们对用凿子凿大理石不感兴趣，担心会污染它。还有一些人会敲打大理石，直到他们看到
自己努力的结果：一条曲线或某种涌现的形式。
Sovereign Integral 意识/主权性积分态意识/主权整体意识;
95 The Sovereign Integral is truly that thing that is perfectly subjective, because it is created
by every Sovereign. It is a collective consciousness that the Sovereigns are producing like a
collaborative, creative project, expressed by an infinite number of “artists” from all species,
all levels, all lifetimes. In this context, the Sovereign Integral is unknown, but knowableーto a
small degreeーthrough the imaginative faculty. It is constantly evolving in duality, and
constant in the nondual levels of consciousness. This dynamicーof expansionary evolution
82
and constancyーrepresents the poles of existence, and they are expressed through the
Sovereign Integral consciousness simultaneously.
95 Sovereign Integral 确实是完全主观的东西，因为它是由每一个 Sovereign 所创造出来
的。Sovereign 正在产生一种集体意识，就像一个协作的、创造性的项目，由来自所有物
种、所有层次、所有生生世世的无数的“艺术家”来表达。在这种情况下，Sovereign Integral
是未知的，但却是可以知道的－－在很小的程度上－－藉由 想象力的机能。它在二元性中
不断进化，而在非二元的意识层次中是不变的。这种动态－－扩张的进化和恒常不变－－
代表了存在的极点（复数），而它们同时都藉由 Sovereign Integral 意识来表达。
95主权性积分态真真正正是完全主观的，因为它是由全体主权体的每一个共同参与
创造的。主权体们正制造着是一种全员性的意识，如同一个合作创作项目，正在合
作表达的无限数量的“艺术家”们，则来自所有的物种、所有的层级、所有的生命
期。在这样的语境中，主权性积分态是未知的，但是，在某种微观的层面，经由想
象官能，它又是可知的。它是二元性中永恒不断的进化，它又是意识的非二元各层
级中永恒不变的恒常。扩张进化与恒常不变2者间的这种相互作用，代表着存在性
的2极，但2者又同时都经由主权性积分态意识而表达了出来。
95 主权整体确实是完全主观的东西，因为它是由每个主权创造的。它是一种集体意识，是
主权们像一个合作的、创造性的计划一样生产出来并被无数来自所有物种，所有层次，所
有生命周期的“艺术家”所表达的。在这种情况下，“主权整体”是未知的，但却是可知
的—在很小的程度上—通过想象的能力。它在二元性中不断进化，在意识的非二元层次中
是恒定不变的。这种动态—进化扩张和恒定不变—代表了存在的两极，它们同时通过主权
整体意识表达。
96 The real challenge of defining the term, Sovereign Integral, other than what has already
been described, is that it is largely absent in our human world. When we walk within our
culture, and watch our collective Social Program, the Sovereign Integral is neither present or
accounted for. It barely has a heartbeat. This relative absence represents the real headwinds
of our human journey for meaning and purpose. How can this condition be changed so that
the Sovereign Integral becomes a more vibrant and visible presence within our human
culture?
96 除了已经描述的内容之外，要定义 Sovereign Integral 这个术语的真正挑战在于，它在
我们的人类世界中在很大的程度上是不在场的。当我们行走在我们的文化里，仔细观看我
们的集体社会程序设定时，Sovereign Integral 既不在场也不被说明原因。它几乎没有心跳
声。这种相对的缺席代表了我们人类为了意义和目的而旅行所遇到的真正逆风。如何改变
这种状况，而使得 Sovereign Integral 在我们的人类文化中变得更加活跃和可见地临在？
96定义主权性积分态这个词时，真正的挑战还不是已经描述的这些，而是在于：它
很大程度上是缺席我们人类世界的。行走于我们的文化间，观察下我们的集体社会
编程，我们会发现，主权性积分态既没有现身也未被提及。仅仅能感觉到的是它的
一种心跳。这种相对而言的缺席，就代表了人类驶向意义和目的时的顶头风。如何
才能改变这种状况，从而使主权性积分态在我们人类文明中，成为更为鲜活且可感
的临在呢？
96 定义“主权整体”这个词的真正挑战，除了已经描述过的以外，就是它在我们的人类世
界里基本上是不在场的。当我们在自己的文化中行走，观看我们集体的社会程序时，主权
整体既不在场也没有被说明原因。它几乎没有心跳。这种相对的不在场代表了我们人类为
83
了意义和目的而进行的旅程所遇到的真正逆风。如何改变这种状况，让主权整体成为我们
人类文化中更有活力和更明显的在场?
97 The key for understanding the Sovereign Integral, at least from my perspective, is to
imagine it within our beliefs and intentions. This is required in order for the vibrant host (the
Sovereign Integral) to step forward into our life and be an equal among the avatar-surrogates
of its human existence: the body, ego, heart and mind. It is through this sense of equality and
intermixing that they become aligned as equal partners. It is the Sovereign Integralーthe
Imaginary Beingーthat can bring alignment and equality to the whole of our human
experience. This is not only its purpose, it may in fact be the meaning of life in the broadest
sense.
97 理解 Sovereign Integral 的关键，至少从我的角度来看，是在我们的信念和意图中去想象
它。为了让充满活力的宿主（Sovereign Integral）走进我们的生活，并在其人类存在的那些
化身-代理（avatar-surrogates）：身体、自我、心和脑力 中拥有一个对等的身份，这是必需
的。正是藉由这种平等和混合的感觉，他们才能对齐而成为平等的伙伴。是 Sovereign
Integral——想象中的存在——才能为我们人类经验的整体带来对齐联合与平等。这不仅是
Sovereign Integral 的目的，实际上它可能是「生命的意义」在最广泛上的意义。
97至少就我看来，理解主权性积分态的关键就是：在我们的信念和意图中来想象它。
这件事是必需的，唯有如此，这位鲜活振动的主人（主权性积分态）才能走上前来，
步入我们的生命，成为平等参与者，共存于它人类存在的化身-代理：身体、伊格、心
脏、和心智。正是经由这种平等感和混合感，它们变得相互校准，成为了平等的搭档。
只有主权性积分态——想象性存在——才能够将一致性和平等性带给人类体验的所
有面向。这不仅是想象性存在的目的，事实上，在最宏大的范畴上，这也是生命的意
义。
97 理解主权整体的关键，至少在我看来，是在我们的信念和意图中想象它。为了让充满活
力的宿主(主权整体)走进我们的生活，并在它的人类存在的化身-代理：身体，自我，心和
脑中成为平等的存在，这是所必需的。正是通过这种平等和融合的感觉，他们成为平等的伙
伴。正是主权整体—想象的存在—能够给我们人类的整个体验带来对齐和平等。这不仅是它
的目的，事实上这可能是生命最广泛意义上的意义。
98 There is an evolutionary imperative on the part of the Sovereign Integral within human
reality, and it is to use the magical capacity of intention: thoughts, words, images, sounds,
behaviors and colors to create a new culture of expanding possibilities. This new culture is not
envisioned and created by science, technology, education, government or religion. It is not
even created by spirituality. It is driven by artists. This is a space where the Sovereign Integral
can live and breathe, lending its perspective on the two behaviors of love and freewill.15
98 在人類實相中的 Sovereign Integral 有一項進化的要務，而它就是利用意圖的神奇能
力：思想、文字、圖像、聲音、行為和色彩來創造一種「擴張的可能性」之新文化。這種
新文化不是由科學、技術、教育、政府或宗教所預想和創造的。它甚至不是由靈性
（spirituality）所創造的。它是由藝術家驅動的。這是一個空間，在這個空間裡，Sovereign
Integral 可以生存和呼吸，並且給出它對「愛與自由意志的兩種行為
15
（the two behaviors
of love and free will）」之觀點。
15
这两种行为被定义在 第 6 节：结论 里
84
98存在于人类实相内的主权性积分态的这一部分（译注：即想象性存在），带有一
种强烈的进化性指示：去将意图的神奇力量运用到思想、文字、形象、声音、行
为、色彩中，从而创造一种扩张向潜在可能性的新文化。这种新文化的构想和创造
不是出自科学、技术、教育、政 府或宗 教。甚至不是出自灵性。这种新文化完全由
艺术家们所驾驭。这个过程里存在一个空间，主权性积分态能够存在并呼吸其中，
并将它的视角添加进来，该视角则是关于爱和自由意志(15)这2个行为的。
98 在人类现实的主权整体这部分有一种进化的必然性，它是使用意图：思想、语言、图像，
声音，行为和颜色的神奇能力来创造一种拓展可能性的新文化。这种新文化不是由科学、技
术、教育、政府或宗教所设想和创造的。它甚至不是由灵性创造的。它是由艺术家推动的。
这是一个空间，在这个空间里，主权整体能够生存和呼吸，把它的视角借给爱和自由意志（注
15）这两种行为。
99 As I said previously, humanity is in the evolutionary process to become the Scribes of
Consciousness. We are the one species that can describe the Sovereign Integral and have it
become the center of our culture. The scribes are the artists, except this is a different kind of
art. It is the art of imagination and manifestation. It is to visioncast the Sovereign Integral so
that humanity can live in harmony with Nature and technology.
99 正如我之前所說，人類正在進化過程中要成為「意識的抄寫員」。我們是可以描述
Sovereign Integral和讓它成為我們文化的中心的唯一物種。抄寫員是藝術家，但這是一
種不同的藝術。它是想像和顯化的藝術。它是把 Sovereign Integral 的願景投射出來，以
便人類能夠與大自然和科技和諧共處。
99如前所述，人类正身处一个进化过程中，去成为意识临摹者。我们这个物种，能
够勾勒出主权性积分态，并让它成为我们文化的中心。临摹者们就是艺术家，不过
这是不同类型的艺术。这是关于想象和显化的艺术。这是以想象铸造出主权性积分
态，以便人类整体能够与大自然和技术都和谐共生。
99 如我之前所说的，人类正在进化过程中成为意识的抄写员。我们是唯一一个能够描述主
权整体并让它成为我们文化中心的物种。抄写员是艺术家，只是这是一种不同的艺术。它是
想象和表现的艺术。它是将主权整体的愿景投射出来，以便人类能与自然和技术和谐相处。
100 The definition of an artist, in this context, is one who can imagine, with noble intention,
the faint outline of the Sovereign Integral and express it in their life. That is it. You could be a
physicist-artist, a government worker-artist, an attorney-artist, an unemployed-artist, a
mother-artist, a child-artist, it only matters that you are practicing the intention to access the
Noble Mind and the imaginative faculty therein. The art will come through our life, and our
collective Social Program will expand into new possibilities with each artist’s resolve and
commitment.
100 在这种情况下，艺术家的定义是，一个能够以崇高的意图来想象 Sovereign Integral 的
微弱轮廓 并且 在他们的生活中表达出来的人。这就对了。你可以是一个 物理学家-艺术
家、政府工作者-艺术家、律师-艺术家、待业人员-艺术家、母亲-艺术家、儿童-艺术家，
唯一重要的是，你正在实践「进入崇高脑力以及在其中的 想象力的机能」之意图。那种艺
术将会在我们的生活中显露出来，我们的 集体社会程序设定 将随着每位艺术家的决心和
投入 扩展成新的可能性。
100艺术家的定义，在本文语境中，就是能够带着恢弘的意图，来想象主权性积分
态的模糊轮廓，并在自己生命表达出来的人们。就是这样。你可以是物理学-艺术
85
家，公务员-艺术家，律师-艺术家，失业者-艺术家，母亲-艺术家，孩子-艺术家，
唯一要紧的是，你正在实践着如下意图：接入恢弘心智及其中的想象官能。这种艺
术将显现到我们的生命中，因着每一位艺术家的决心和奉献，我们的集体社会编
程，将扩张进全新的潜在可能性。
100 在这种情况下，艺术家的定义是一个能够怀着崇高的意图想象主权整体的模糊轮廓，
并在他们的生活中表达出来的人。就是这样。你可以是物理学家-艺术家，政府工作人员-
艺术家，律师-艺术家，或失业者-艺术家、母亲-艺术家、儿童-艺术家，唯一重要的是你
正在实践抵进入崇高头脑及其中的想象能力的意图。艺术将通过我们的生活展现出来，我
们集体的社会程序将随着每个艺术家的决心和承诺扩展到新的可能性。
101 Our current models and beliefs are an outgrowth of our intentions, which are almost
exclusively the expression of the body-ego, and therefore derivative of prior human culture.
Does it make sense that we can bring a new world of expanding possibilities using the
cultural history of humankind as our inception point?
101 我们目前的模式和信念是我们的意图的产物，这几乎完全是 身体-自我 的表达，因此
都是先前的人类文化的衍生物。「我们用人类的文化历史作为起点 以带来一个扩张的可能
性之新世界」这样有意义吗？
101我们的主流模式和信念，是我们意图的产品，而意图又则几乎完全地专注于身体
-伊格的表达，因而就是旧有人类文化的衍生物。既然如此，下述说法是否还讲得
通：利用人类的文化历史作为初始点，能够带来扩张向潜在可能性的新世界？
101 我们目前的模式和信念是我们的意图的产物，这几乎完全是身体自我的表达，因此是
先前人类文化的衍生物。如果我们利用人类的文化历史作为起点，就能带来一个可能性不
断扩大的新世界，这是否有道理呢?
102 These are slow movements. They take the unfoldment of vast timespans. However, and
this is vitally important, as Sovereigns we can shift at any point in any time. We can imagine
the Sovereign Integral as our core self, and we can imagine what that shift means in terms of
our life experience. This becomes the “thread” of intention that we weave into our life as
thought, feeling or activity. The intention is reciprocal, that is to say, it is both the expression
(intention) and the experience (manifestation) of the Sovereign Integral, no matter how
dimly felt or understood. It is both a receiving into our body-ego and an expression into our
Social Program.
102 这些都是缓慢的动作。它们采取了浩瀚的时间跨度之开展。然而，而这是至关重要
的，作为 Sovereign，我们可以在任何时间的任何点上转变。我们可以想象Sovereign
Integral 是我们核心的自己，我们可以想象这种转变对我们的生活经验意味着什么。这成
为了我们以思想、感觉或活动的形式 来编织到我们的生活里之 意图的“线”。意图是相互
的、有来有往的，也就是说，它既是Sovereign Integral 的表达（意图），也是Sovereign
Integral 的体验（显化），无论多么模糊地被感觉到或理解到。它既是进入到我们的 身体-
自我 里的一种接收，也是我们在社会程序设定里的一种表达（出去）。
102这是缓慢的运动过程。渐次展开于广袤的时间跨度中。然而，至关重要的是，身
为主权体们，在任何时间的任何节点，我们都能够转变。我们能够想象主权性积分
态是我们的核心自性/自己，我们能够想象这种转变对我们的生命体验意味着什么。
这类想象会变成意图之“线”，被我们以思想、感情、行为的方式编织进我们的生命
中。意图是具有对等反馈的，这就是说，无论感觉或理解得多么模糊，我们关于主
86
权积分态的意图，既是在表达主权性积分态（意图）又是在体验主权性积分态（显
现）。主权性积分态既在被接取进我们身体-伊格，又在表达进我们的社会编程。
102 这些都是慢动作。它们以浩瀚的时间跨度展开。然而，这是至关重要的，作为主权，
我们可以在任何时间的任何点转变。我们可以把主权整体想象成是我们核心的自己，我们
可以想象这种转变对我们的生命体验意味着什么。这成为了我们以思想、感觉或活动的形
式编织在我们的生命中的意图的“线”。意图是相互的，也就是说，它既是主权整体的表
达(意图)，也是主权整体的体验(表现)，无论它感觉起来或理解起来多么模糊。它既是对
我们身体-自我的接受，也是对我们社会程序的表达。
103 Our identification with the Sovereign Integral consciousness, though incomplete and
pixelated in low-definition, allows us to see the edges of who we are, and when we do, the
edges disappear. We become the drumbeat of intention to be the Sovereign Integral in every
nowness of our life. This intention and belief is what draws the Sovereign Integral
consciousness to become us with all the human frailties and challenges therein. It may seem
an odd mixture, but it is the intermixing of the nondual with the dual that is the human
experience.
103 我们对于 Sovereign Integral 意识的识别和认同，虽然不完整且像素的分辨率低，但让
我们能够看到「我们是谁」的边界，而当我们看到时，边界就会消失。我们成为了，要在
我们生活中每一个当下成为 Sovereign Integral 的意图之（号召的）鼓声。这种意图和信念
就是「虽然有着所有人类的弱点和需要克服的困难，仍然吸引了 Sovereign Integral 意识要
来变成我们」的东西。这似乎是一种奇怪的混合物，但正是非二元的与二元的互相混合 才
是 人类要的经验。
103即使不完整且分辨率低下，我们对主权性积分态意识的身份认同，也能容许我
们去看到“我们是谁”的边缘，一旦我们看到了，边缘就消失了。我们变成了意图
的“急鼓”，意欲在我们生命的每一个当下活出主权性积分态。这样的意图和信念，
会将主权性积分态意识拉近我们，变成我们，依然会带着我们全部的人类弱点和挑
战。或许这看似是一种怪异的混合物，但是人类体验正是这种非二元与二元性的混
合。
103 .我们对主权整体意识的认同，虽然不完整且像素的清晰度低，却让我们能够看到我们
是谁的边界，而当我们看到的时候，边界就消失了。我们成为在我们生命的每一个当下成
为主权整体的意图的鼓声。这种意图和信念就是那“即使有着所有人类的弱点和其中的挑
战，也要吸引主权整体意识成为我们”的东西。这看起来可能是一种奇怪的混合，但人类
的经验恰恰就是非二元性与二元性的混合。
104 Below I have made an attempt to describe the general structure of consciousness that
spans Levels and Lifetimes of consciousness too numerous and varied to pin a number on or
describe. The “footprint” of consciousness moves from a Creator level to a body-ego, and
flows between these elements of its structure like blood circulating in a body.
104 在下一页我试图描述 跨越 意识层次和生生世世的 意识的一般结构，那些层次和生
生世世的数量和变化太多而无法用数字来确定或描述。意识的“足迹”从一个造物主的层
面，移动到一个 身体-自我，并且在它（指意识）的结构的这些元素之间流动，就像在体
内循环的血液一样。
87
104下面，我尝试描绘出意识的一般结构，其涵盖的意识层级和生命期，众多且又各
异，无法固定成特定的数字或描绘。意识的“脚印”从创造者层级延伸到身体-伊
格，流动于意识结构的各个要素之间，如同血液循流于身体。
104 下面，我试图描述意识的一般结构，它跨越的意识的层次和生命周期的数量和变化如
此之多如此之大，以至于无法确定和描述。意识的“足迹”从造物主的层面移动到一个身
体-自我，并在其结构的这些元素之间流动，就像血液在身体中循环一样。
88
图解10
89
105 Consciousness is a reality unto itself. It is the one reality that flows between Levels and
Lifetimes, unifying them and aligning them in meaning and purpose. It is the circuit that
originates within the infinitely mysterious Creator and flows throughout a consciousnessーa
singular, Sovereign consciousnessーentering body-ego-social programs and ingesting the
learning therein, and then completing its circuit back to its Creator. This is constantly
occurring. It is not a sequenced series of events that culminate. Rather it is occurring in both
constancy and the up-down waveform of duality. We can each hold, in our Imagination’s eye,
the identity of the Sovereign Integral as the point of cohesion of our consciousness. It is the
force that binds all elements of a Sovereign consciousness together, keeping them both
individuated and connected.
105 意识本身就是一种实相。它是在那些层次和生生世世之间流动的一个实相，以「意义
和目的」将那些层次与生生世世对齐和统一起来。它是起源于「无限奥秘的造物主 之内」
并且流动遍及一（整）个意识——一个单一的 Sovereign 意识——的回路，进入 身体-自我
-社会程序设定 并吸收其中的学习，然后完成它的回路回到它的创造者。这是不断在发生
的。最终的结果并不是一系列按顺序排列的事件。而是，它同时发生在「恒常性」和「二
元性的上下波形」之中。在我们的「想象之眼」里，我们每个人都可以将 Sovereign
Integral 的身份视为我们的意识的凝聚点（the point of cohesion of our consciousness）。它
是将一个 Sovereign 意识 的 所有元素 结合在一起的 力量，使它们保持既是「个别化了
的」又是「相互连结的」。
105意识是一种自成一体的实相。作为一体性实相，它流动于各个层级和各生命期，
将这些统合为一体，并校准其意义和目的。作为一个回路，它源起于无限神秘创造
者，遍流过整个意识——独一完形的主权体意识——进入主权体所辖的各个身体-伊
格-社会编程，去摄取习得性知识，然后完成回路返回到创造者。这个过程永恒不断
地进行着的。意识并非一串攀登向顶点的事件序列，而比较是同时地存在于（非二
元）恒常性及二元起伏波动中。以想象之眼，每个我们都能拥有主权性积分态的身
份，来作为我们意识的凝聚点。这个点是一种力量，能够将一个主权体意识的所有
要素紧密结合在一起，并让它们既保持个别化又保持连接性。
105 意识本身就是一个现实。这是一个在层次和生命周期之间流动并统一它们，使它们在
意义和目的上保持一致的现实。它是起源于无限神秘的造物主的回路，并流经意识—一个
单一的、主权的意识—进入身体-自我-社会程序并吸收其中的知识，然后完成它的回路回
到它的造物主。这是不断发生的最终结果不是一系列按顺序发生的事件。而是它同时发生
在恒常性和二元性的上下波形里。在我们的想象之眼中，我们每个人都可以持有主权整体
的身份，作为我们意识的凝聚点。它是将主权意识的所有元素结合在一起的力量，使它们
既是个体化的和也是相互连接的。
106 The structure becomes increasingly hard to find as you peer into its origins. The Creator
is the Unknowable, infinite mystery, and given that the entities of the Sovereign, the Integral
and the Sovereign Integral are fractal in nature (they scale infinitely across Levels), the
Consciousness of the Creator would also be fractal, meaning that its vastness is without scale
and contains all other fractal concepts. Something of that power and extent and vastness, of
that infinite nature, cannot be contained within a single human life or a single Sovereign or
an Integral or even a Sovereign Integral. It is these that are contained within the Creator. The
90
diagram, the General Structure of Consciousness (Fig. 10), could represent a fractal concept
that is truly what we are all ultimately aligned to and meant to become a conscious part of.
106 当你凝视它的起源时，这个结构变得越来越难发现。造物主是不可知的、无限的奥
秘，鉴于 Sovereign、Integral 和 Sovereign Integral 的实体在本质上是碎形的（它们横越那
些层次而无限地增生脱落），造物主的意识也将是碎形的，这意味着它的浩瀚是没有尺度
的，包含了所有其他的碎形概念。那种力量、广度和浩瀚的东西，那种 无限的本性，不能
被包含在一个单一的人类生命中，也不能被包含在一个单一的 Sovereign 或 一个 Integral
中，甚至不能被包含在一个 Sovereign Integral 中。包含在造物主之内的正是这些。上面的
图表，意识的一般结构（图解 10），可以代表，「确实是我们所有人最终都要与之对齐，
并且注定要成为其有意识的一部分」的一个碎形概念。
106当你凝望进意识的起源处，结构变得越发难以看清。创造者是不可知的、无限
神秘，既然说，主权体、积分态和主权性积分态这三个存在都具有分形化属性（无
限地缩、放进所有层级），那么，创造者的意识也应该是分形化的，这就意味着：它
之浩大，无有尺度，它之浩大，包含了其余所有的分形概念。具有如此力量、规模
和浩瀚性，具有如此无限性的事物，是无法被包纳进单个人类生命、单个完形主权
体、单个积分态、甚至单个主权性积分态的。反倒是所有这些，全被包含在创造者
内。图解10《意识的一般结构》，也可以看着描绘一个分形化的“终极之物”概念，
终究而言，我们全都被校准于它，全都意欲成为它的一个具有清醒自我意识的组成
部分。
106 当你仔细观察它的起源时，它的结构变得越来越难以发现。造物主是不可知的，无限
的神秘，并且，鉴于主权实体，整体和主权整体在本质是分形的（它们跨越层次无限地扩
展），造物主的意识也将是分形的，这意味着它的浩瀚没有范围，包含了所有其他的分形概
念。那种力量、范围和广阔，那种无限的本质，不可能被包含在一个单一的人类生命里，
或在一个单一的主权或整体里，甚至也不可能被包含在一个主权整体里。这些都包含在造
物主里。图表—意识的一般结构（图10），可以代表一个我们所有人最终要与之对齐并注
定要成为其有意识的一部分的分形概念。
107 The Sovereign Integral, invested in a single body-ego, knows how to wield the paintbrush
we call “life,” particularly when the body-ego consciously releases control of that life to the
Sovereign and the Integral, because it is activated by the Sovereign Integral consciousness. It
is a free will decision and commitment. There is no hand on an on-off switch. The decision is
made; the expansion evoked; the commitment is steeled and the forever-vision is
broadening and deepening in human life.
107 Sovereign Integral 投入于一个单一的 身体-自我，知道要如何挥洒我们称之为“生命”
的画笔，特别是当 身体-自我 有意识地将那次生命的 控制权 释放给Sovereign 和
Integral 时，因为它被 Sovereign Integral 意识 给活化了。这是一个自由意志的决定和承诺
（或投入 commitment）。在活化的开关上没有（别人的）手。（当）决定被做出了；扩
张的感觉就会被唤起；使得承诺更为坚定，而永恒的愿景则会在人类的生活中不断地拓宽
和加深。
107被投入单个身体-伊格时，主权性积分态是懂得如何运用我们称之为“生命”的
这支画笔的，尤其是身体-伊格被主权性积分态意识激活之后，有意识地放手生命控
制权，交付给主权体和积分态时。这是一个自由意志的决定和奉献。没有手置于控
制开关上。决定被做出，扩张被引发，决心被坚固，永恒-视野在人类生命中扩展
着、深植着。
91
107 主权整体，投入于一个身体-自我，知道如何挥动我们称之为“生命”的画笔，尤其是
当身体-自我有意识地将生命的控制释放给主权和整体时，因为它是被主权整体意识激活
的。这是自由意志的决定和承诺。并没有人按下开关。决定做出了；扩展性被唤起；坚定
了承诺，而永恒的视野正在人类生活中扩展和深化。
108 There is a gulf between the dual Sovereign and the dual Integral in the collective sense,
however, this gulf is diminishing. The Sovereign Integral, once it is manifest in a body-ego,
splits into the Sovereign and the Integral. They are separate. Opposite in nature. This is as
true for the individual as it is for the collective, and therefore the Social Program perpetuates
the sense of separation, confusion and uncertainty that permeates human culture.
108 在集体的感觉上，二元的 Sovereign 和二元的 Integral 之间存在着一条鸿沟，然而，
这个鸿沟正在缩小。Sovereign Integral，一旦它在一个 身体-自我 中显化，就会分裂成
Sovereign 和 Integral。他们是分开的。性质相反。对个人如此，对集体也是如此，因此社
会程序设定能使得渗透到人类文化中的分离感、混乱感和不确定感持续存在。
108二元化主权体和二元化积分态在集合感这件事上存在着一条鸿沟，不过，这条
鸿沟正在缩小。主权性积分态，一旦化身进身体-伊格，就劈裂成了主权体和积分
态。它们是分裂开的。性质完全相反。在个体和集体层面这都同样真实，因此，社
会编程才得以让弥散于人类文明中的分裂、混乱、不确定的感觉长久续存。
108 在集体的意义上，二元性主权和二元性整体之间存在着一条鸿沟，然而，这条鸿沟正
在缩小。主权整体，一旦在身体自我中显化，就会分裂为主权和整体。它们是分离的。在
性质上是相反的。这对个人和集体来说都是如此，因此社会程序延续了渗透在人类文化中
的分离感、混乱感和不确定感。
109 The choice to become aware of, and sensitive to, the consciousness that is whole and
integral, is the most important choice we make as a human, because it is the inception point
of the next important set of choices. For example, to experience and express this
consciousness in whatever way we choose; or the choice to become this consciousness while
in a human form, as only we can; or the choice to express the Sovereign Integral’s love to the
realm of duality without limit or condition.
109 选择要 觉知到 和 敏感于 那是为全体（whole）和整体（Integral）的意识，是我们
身为人类所要做的 最重要的选择，因为它是下一组重要选择的起点。例如，以我们选择的
不管任何方式来经验和表达这种意识；或者 当还在一个人类形式里的时候，选择成为这种
意识，这只有我们能做到；或者 选择无限制或无条件地表达 Sovereign Integral 对二元性
领域的爱。
109选择变得知觉到并敏感于这个完形整体、积分整合的意识。这是身为人类的我们
能做出的最重要的选择，因为这个选择是初始点，之后一系列重要选择都基于它。举
例而言，在我们所选的任何道路上，都选择来体验和表达这种意识；在身为人类形态
时，选择来成为这种意识，因为只有我们自己才能做出这样的选择；又或是选择将主
权性积分态之爱无限制、无条件地表达进二元性领域。
109 选择去觉察到，并敏感于意识是完整和整体的，是我们作为人类做出的最重要的选
择，因为它是下一系列重要选择的起点。例如，以我们选择的任何方式来体验和表达这种
意识；或者选择当我们在人类形式里的时候成为这种意识，因为只有我们能做到；或者选
择不受限制和无条件地向二元性领域表达主权整体之爱。
92
110 Our free will grants us the opportunity to be unaware or aware. Separate or part of the
whole. We are the Sovereign. Our choices are ours to make. But we are also the Integral so
our choices are influenced, however subtly, by all species, all levels, all lifetimes. The choice
is the inception point, not the intention or beliefーthose follow the choice. Life is an artform
and as any artist will tell you, every stroke of the brush or incision of the chisel is either a
choice, a non-choice (surrender) or a collaboration of the two. These choices are always a
collaboration. They are brought to life by both the Sovereign and the Integral.
110 我们的自由意志给了我们不知道（to be unaware）或知道（or aware）的机会。是 分
离的 或 是整体的一部分。我们是 Sovereign。我们的选择是我们自己做出的。但我们也是
Integral，所以我们的选择会受到所有物种、所有层次、所有生生世世的影响，无论多么微
妙。选择 才是 起点，而不是意图或信念－－那些都跟随着选择。生活是一种艺术形式，
正如任何艺术家都会告诉你的那样，每一次的笔画或凿子的切口，不是一种选择，就是一
种非选择（放弃）或 两者的协作。这些选择始终是一种合作的结果。它们被 Sovereign 和
Integral 赋予了蓬勃生气。
110我们的自由意志授予了我们机会，来选择“无知觉”或者“知觉”，来选择分裂
或者归属整体。我们是主权体。我们的选择是自己做出的。然而，我们还是积分
态，所以，我们的选择会被影响，被所有物种、所有层级、所有生命期，无论这影
响多么地隐微。这样的选择，而非意图和信念，才是初始点，意图或信念会随选择
而生。生命是一门艺术形式，就像艺术家会告诉你的，每次笔触、每下凿击，要么
是一次选择，要么是一次非-选择（臣服），要么是两者的协作。这些选择从来都是
一种协作。它们被带入生命正是同时经由了主权体和积分态双方。
110 我们的自由意志给予了我们不去觉察或觉察的机会。是分离的或成为整体的部分。我
们是主权者。我们的选择是由我们自己做出的。但我们也是整体的，所以我们的选择会受
到所有物种，所有层次，所有生命周期的影响，无论多么微妙。选择是起点，而不是意图
或信念—那些都跟随选择。生活是一种艺术形式，正如任何艺术家都会告诉你的那样，每
一画笔或凿子的挥舞，不是一种选择，就是一种不选择(放弃)，或者两者兼而有之。这些
选择始终是一种合作。它们被主权和整体两者赋予生命。
93
The Integral’s Overture
I am the oneness of all systems
and only that.
I am not made of concepts or words
or light or sound
or any materialization.
I am simply oneness.
It is my only state.
It is my only world.
Because I am that, you are also that.
There can be no exclusion in my world
or I do not exist at all.
You are woven into my world with great care.
You are enfolded within me
and therefore you are my wings
in which I move and take flight.
Integral 的序曲
我是所有系统的合一
仅此而已。
我不是由概念或文字构成的
或光或声
或任何具体化。
我就只是一体。
是我唯一的状态。
那是我唯一的世界。
那因为我是那样，你也会是那样。
我的世界不可能排除任何东西
否则我就根本不会存在。
你被小心翼翼地织入我的世界。
你被包住在我里面
因此你是我的翅膀
我以这些翅膀来移动和飞行
积分态的序幕独白
我是所有系统的一体
仅仅是这个。
我并不构成以概念或话语
光线或声音
亦或任何的具象。
我就仅仅是一体。
这是我唯一的状态
这是我唯一的世界。
因着我是这个，你也是的
“排除”无法存在于我的世界
否则我根本无法存在。
你被精心编织进了我的世界
你就包裹于我内里
因而你就是我的翅膀
藉由你 我得以移动与飞翔。
整体的序曲
我是所有系统的合一
仅此而已。
我不是由概念或文字
光或声音
或任何物质化所组成的。
我只是一体。
这是我唯一的状态。
这是我唯一的世界。
因为我是这样，你也会是这样。
在我的世界里不可能排除任何东西
否则我根本不存在。
你被精心地编织在了我的世界里。
你被包裹在我里面
所以你是我的翅膀
我以这些翅膀移动和飞翔。
94
译注28：奇异点，简称奇点，这里应该是指混沌学的奇异吸引子。共-奇点，意思是
3个系统共用一个奇点，理解为三个系统在奇点上是叠加的。这样一来三者所主导的
行为都围绕着一个中心运转并不断逼近这个中心
译注29：先验：依然出自康德哲学。他是如此定义先验的，“所有不与对象有关，而
与认识对象的方式有关的认识，只要它们是先天可能的，我都称作先验，先验并不意
味着某种超越出经验的东西（那是“超验”），而是某种虽然先于经验先天的，但除
了使体验成为可能以外还未更进一步规定的事物”
译注30：分形集主权体，是指一个核心主权体所辖的所有时空内分形主权体的总和
译注31：对于这段需要这样来理解。一个主权体将经验共享给其余主权体。这句话可
以等价地翻译为，任意指定一个主权体为中心，就会发现其余所有的主权体都将自己
的经验共享给了它。换句话说，任意2个主权体之间都相互共享着自己的经验。这就
构成了一种完备的双向互联的网络，而根据定义，所谓的积分态就是这样一种网络。
95
Section 4第四节
The Body-Ego-Social Program Triad: A General Model
身体-自我-社会程序设定 三位一体：一个大致上的模型
身体-伊格-社会编程 三位一体：一般模式
身体-自我-社会程序的三位一体：一个大致的模型
111 The body-ego-social program, as described in earlier Sections, is a triad of experience that
is a faint echo of the triad of the Sovereign Integral. In both cases, these three parts are
interconnected and operate as a collective entity. Therefore, it is difficult to disentangle the
body-ego from the Social Program, but in this Section we will do our best to separate them.
111 如前几节所述，身体-自我-社会程序设定 是一种经验的三位一体，它是Sovereign Integral
的三位一体之微弱的回声。在这两种情况下，这三个部分相互连结并且作为一个 集体的实
体 来运作。因此，很难将 身体-自我 从 社会程序设定 解开，但在本节中，我们将尽力把
它们分开。
111如前所述，身体-伊格-社会编程，这个体验性的三位一体，是主权性积分态之三
位一体的模糊回声。在这2个三位一体中，三个部分都被互连并运作为一个集合实存
体。因而，就难以将身体-伊格脱离于社会编程，但在本节，我们将尽可能地分解开它
们。
111 如前面章节所述，身体-自我-社会的程序是一种经验的三位一体，它是主权整体的三位
一体的微弱回声。在这两种情况下，这三个部分相互连接并作为一个集体的实体来运作。因
此，很难将身体-自我从社会程序中分离出来，但在本节中，我们将尽力将它们分开。
112 Remember that the Social Program, from an experiential perspective, has two parts: the
Sovereign experience and the Integral experience. It represents both subjective individual
experience and subjective collective experience, intermixing them so that the individual can
find alignment to, and a place within, the social order. The collective Social Program is a three-
dimensional expression of the Integral, with an increasing dependence on technology to
connect the human species, and to some extent, all species.
112 请记住，从一种经验的角度来看，社会程序设定 有两个部分：Sovereign 的经验和
Integral 的经验。它代表主观的个体经验和主观的集体经验，把两者混合在一起，以便个体
能够找到 与社会秩序的对齐一致 和 在社会秩序里的位置。集体的社会程序设定是
Integral 的一种三次元的表达，越来越依赖科技来连结人类族类，并且在某种程度上，连结
所有物种。
112请记住，从体验的角度看，社会编程分为2部分：主权体体验和积分态体验。社
会编程就代表着主观个人体验和主观集体体验二者，并混合起了它们，以便个体能找
到与社会秩序的一致性，并在其中找到自己的位置。集体社会编程是积分态的三维表
达，它变得日益依赖于科技去连接起人类物种，进而在某种程度上，连接起所有物种。
112 请记住，从经验的角度来看，社会程序有两个部分:主权经验和整体经验。它既代表主
观的个体经验也代表主观的集体经验，把两者混合在一起，这样个人就能找到与社会秩序的
一致和在社会秩序里的位置。集体的社会程序是整体的三维表达，越来越依赖于用科技来连
接人类物种，并在某种程度上，连接所有物种。
113 The body is the physical apparatus that the sovereign, individuated mind uses to
experience the duality and separation of a species’ existence. It is the physical body and its
96
sensory system. In humans, it is the five senses, other species will have a similar sensory
system, yet they are all different depending on the unique intermixing of spacetime and
genetics. This would include relationships between the body’s component parts like the eye-
brain system. These more dominant subsystems feed the Social Program, and to some extent,
educate the ego on the art of fitting into the social order and becoming a valuable individual
contributor therein.
113 身体是 Sovereign，个别化了的脑力 用来经验「一个物种的存在之二元性和分离性」的
物质性设备。它是物质性的肉体 和 它的知觉系统。在人类中，它就是五种感官，其他物种
也会有类似的知觉系统，但它们全都会因时空和基因学的独特混合而不同。这包括了身体的
元件部分之间的关系（如 眼-脑 系统）。这些更具主导性的子系统为 社会程序设定 提供支
持，并且在某种程度上教导 自我（the ego）「融入社会秩序，并且成为其中的一个有价值的
个人贡献者」的艺术。
113身体是物质仪器。主权独立且个别化的心智利用它，去体验特定物种存在的二元
性和分裂性。身体包括物质身体及其感官系统。就人类而言即是五感，其他物种则拥
有相似的感官系统，不过，各物种则依赖于完全不同的独一无二的时空与遗传学混合。
这种混合还包括身体各组件之间的相互关系，比如眼-脑系统。这些更具支配性的子
系统们喂食着社会编程，在某种程度上，也教导给伊格融入的艺术：去适应社会秩序，
成为有价值的个体贡献者。
113 身体是主权的、个体化的头脑用来体验物种存在的二元性和分离的物质装置。它是身体
和它的感官系统。对人类来说，它是五种感官，其他物种也会有类似的感官系统，但它们都
是不同的，取决于时空和遗传学独特的混合。这包括身体中像眼脑系统这样的组成部分之间
的关系。这些更主要的子系统维持着社会程序，并在某种程度上，教导自我适应社会秩序并
在其中成为有价值的个人贡献者的艺术。
114 The ego is developed as a reaction to the collective Social Program and therefore
represents the Integral influence. The ego has both a protection and an interconnection
function. In terms of its protector role, the ego protects the Sovereign from the disharmony it
feels from being utterly unique and the social judgment therein. The ego creates the rationale
for uniqueness. In terms of its interconnection role, the ego exercises the faculties of empathy
and human compassion. Human love is the ego’s ultimate goal.
114 自我 是作为「对 集体的 社会程序设定 的一种反应」而被发展的，因此代表了 Integral
的影响。自我既具有一种保护的功能，又有一种互相连结的功能。就其保护者的角色而言，
自我 保护 Sovereign 免于它从「因为是完全独特的」和「因此而来的社会批判」中所感受
到的不和谐。自我 会创造出（自己的）独特性的根本原因。就其相互连结的作用而言，自
我 执行了同理心和人类同情心的机能。人类的爱是 自我 终极的目标。
114伊格被发展成了集体社会编程的反应者，因而它就代表了的积分态的力量。伊格
同时兼具防护和互连的功能。扮演防护角色时，伊格保护主权体免于它所感知到的不
和谐，不和谐则源于独一无二性及其引发的社会评判。伊格为独一无二性创造出逻辑
依据。扮演互连角色时，伊格练习着共情能力和人类悲悯。人类之爱是伊格的终极目
标。
114 自我是作为对集体的社会程序的一种反应而发展出来的，因此代表了整体的影响。自我
既有保护的功能，也有相互连接的功能。就其保护者的角色而言，自我保护主权免于因其完
全独特和由于这种独特导致的社会评判而感到的不和谐。自我创造了独特性的依据。就其互
联的作用而言，自我实践同理心和人类同情心的能力。人类的爱是自我的终极目标。
97
115 The body is the experiencer. It draws in the sensory world, while the ego positions the
sensory inputs of the body as having or not having educational value to achieve something within
the Social Program. The ego is always looking to achieve something from the learnings brought to
it by the body from the Social Program. This desire to achieve is the competition drive. Everything
in the Social Program is perceived as limited, and therefore, the body-ego, in order to survive
must compete in the Social Program.
115 身体是经验者。它吸入感官的世界，而 自我 将身体的感官输入定位为具有或不具有
要在社会程序设定中达成某些成就的教育价值。自我 总是希望从「身体所带来给它的，自
社会程序设定中所学到的东西」那里 达到一些成就。这种要有所成就的渴望就是竞争的驱
动力。社会程序设定中的一切，都被感知为是有限的，因此，身体-自我 为了生存，必须
在社会程序设定中 竞争。
115身体是体验者。它移动于感官世界中，伊格则判定着身体的各种感官输入，对于
达成社会编程内的某事是否有教育价值。伊格总是在寻求，借由身体带给它的源自
社会编程的习得知识，去达成什么。这种达成的渴望是一种竞争性内驱力。社会编
程内的每件事，都被感知为有限的，因而，身体-伊格，为了幸存就必须参与社会编
程中的竞争。
115 身体是体验者。它吸引感官世界，而自我将身体的感官输入定位为有或没有在社会程
序中获得某些东西的教育价值。自我总是希望通过身体从社会程序那里学到的东西里获得
某些东西。这种获得某种东西的渴望就是竞争的动力。社会程序中的一切都被认为是有限
的，因此，身体-自我为了生存必须在社会程序中竞争。
116 Therefore, the Social Program is the reward mechanism for the body-ego to survive and
even thrive. This is as true for humans as any other species. Love and attention are
considered the most valuable commodity on the planet, and therefore competition is
perceived as the highest in that area. More tangible items like gold, stocks, digital currency,
money or water, while considered limited, subconsciously, our human brain perceives them
as less critical to our ultimate achievement as a member of a species. This is partly why
families have strife, because love and attention are being sought and it is considered limited
and potentially, even unattainable.
116 因此，社会程序设定是 身体-自我 生存甚至兴盛的奖励机制。对于人类和任何其他物
种来说都是如此。爱与关注被认为是地球上最有价值的商品，因此竞争被认为是那个领域
里最重要的。更多有形的物品，如黄金、股票、数位货币、金钱或水，虽然被认为是有限
的，但在潜意识中，我们的人类大脑认为它们对于我们作为物种成员的最终成就，比较不
是那么紧要。这就是为什么很多家庭会有冲突的部分原因，因为人们正在寻求爱与关注，
而它被认为是有限的，还有可能，甚至是无法获得的。
116这样一来，社会编程作为奖赏机制，推动着身体-伊格去幸存甚至去发展。这种
情况同等地适用于人类和其他物种。爱和关注被认为是本行星最有价值的事物，因
而，这个领域的竞争被认为是最为激烈的。那些更实在的事物，像黄金、股票、数
字货币、钞票、水，尽管也被认为是有限的，但在潜意识里，我们的人类大脑认
为，对于我们身为物种一员去达成终极成就而言，这些不那么关键。这同样是家庭
矛盾的部分原因，因为爱和关注一直被寻求，可是却又被认为是有限的，甚至很可
能是难以图及的。
98
116 因此，社会程序是身体-自我生存甚至兴盛的奖励机制。对于人类和其他物种来说都是
如此。爱和关注被认为是地球上最有价值的商品，因此，在这一领域的竞争被认为是最激
烈的。更有形的物品如黄金、股票、数字货币、金钱或水，虽然被认为是有限的，但在潜
意识里，我们的人类大脑认为它们对我们作为物种成员的最终成就没那么重要。这也是为
什么家庭会发生冲突的部分原因，因为人们在寻求爱和关注，而它被认为是有限的，还有
可能，甚至是无法获得的。
117 The Social Program is not confined to the fields of groups and families or even the
personal human life. It also applies to a global, solar, galactic, and beyond without definition.
The collective Social Program is not only the field of view allowed by telescopes and
mathematics, but also the Field it is built upon, which is the Integral itself, containing, among
an infinite of qualities, the emotional learnings and the intelligence of our universe. Not
simply a species of a particular time and place. Our universe.
117 社会程序设定不仅限于群体和家庭的范围，甚至是个人的人类生活范围。它也适用于
全球的、太阳系的、银河系的，和超过而没有定义的范围。集体社会程式设定不仅是望远
镜和数学所允许的视野，也是它被建立在其上的场域，那也就是 Integral 本身，包含了－
－在无限的质量中的－－「情感上的学习所得」和「我们宇宙的智慧」。不仅仅是特定时
间和地点的物种。而是 我们的宇宙。（这段没看懂）
117社会编程并不限于群体、家庭领域、甚或仅仅个体人类生命。它也适用于全球、
太阳系、银河系、以及更广大的未定义范畴。集体社会编程不仅只存在于望远镜和
数学的视野所容许的可见领域，还存在于它所建基其上的场域，亦即积分态本身；
因为共享了积分态的无限性特质，集体社会编程还包含进了关于我们宇宙的情感性
习得知识和智能。不单单是特定时间和空间内的单一物种，而是我们的宇宙。
117 社会程序并不局限于群体和家庭甚至个人的人类生活领域。它也适用于全球的、太阳
系的、银河系的，以及更远的没有被定义的地方。集体的社会程序不仅是望远镜和数学所
允许的视野，还有它所建立其上的场域，这个场域就是整体本身，包含了，在一个无限的
品质中的，情感性的学习和我们宇宙的智慧。而不只是一个特定的时间和地点的一个物
种。而是，我们的宇宙。
118 The body-ego is the Separation Point between the identities of the body-ego and the
Sovereign Integral. There is a choice made. We may not be conscious of this fundamental
choice, but it is still a choice that the Sovereign makes alone. It is the one decision left
exclusively in the hands of the Sovereign, every other decision is a collaboration with the
Integral.
118 身体-自我 是「身体-自我 与 Sovereign Integral 两个身份」之间的分离点（the
Separation Point）。有一个选择被做出了。我们可能没有意识到这个基本选择，但它仍然
是 Sovereign 独自做出的选择。它是唯一一个完全留在 Sovereign 手中的决定，其他的所
有决定都是与 Integral 的合作。
118身体-伊格是身体-伊格身份与主权性积分态身份之间的分裂点。这里就存在一
个需要被做出的选择。或许我们并未意识到这个根本性的选择，但它依然是一个需
要主权体独立做出的选择。这也是唯一一个单独留在主权体手里的抉择，其余所有
的决定则是主权体与积分态协同完成的。
99
118 身体-自我是身体-自我的身份与主权整体的身份之间的分离点。有一个选择做出了。
我们可能没有意识到这个基本选择，但它仍然是主权者独自做出的选择。这是一个只留给
主权者的决定，其他所有的决定都是与整体的合作。
119 This most fundamental of all decisions is sometimes vaguely understood, utterly
unknown or completely misunderstood. The interesting thing is that the decision only
happens when the body-ego invites the Sovereign Integral consciousness into their body-ego
consciousness with the intention of letting it filter into their life and intermix as equal
partners. However, this is only possible if the body-ego has, at minimum, a vague
understanding of the Sovereign Integral, enough so they can extend an invitation to, and
hold an intention for, the fractal consciousness, and not the humanmade, institutionalized
version of the immortal self.
119 这个在所有的决定中最基本的决定，有时被模糊地理解、完全不知道或完全被误解。
有趣的是，只有当 身体-自我 邀请 Sovereign Integral 意识进入它们的「身体-自我 意
识」，目的是要让 Sovereign Integral 意识渗入到它们的生活中并作为 平等的伙伴 而混合
在一起 时，这个选择才会发生。然而，只有在这种情况之下这才有可能：身体-自我 至少
对于 Sovereign Integral 有一个模糊的理解，足以让它们能够向那 碎形意识－－而不是
「不朽的自己」之 人造的、制度化的版本－－发出邀请并持有意图。
119这个决定是所有决定里最为根本的，有时候它被粗略地理解了，有时则完全不被
知晓，甚至彻底被误解。最有趣的是，这个决定的做出只会在一种情况下，即：身
体-伊格邀请主权性积分态意识进入身体-伊格的意识，且邀请还带着特定意图，那
就是容许主权性积分态作为平等的搭档，渗透进身体-伊格的生命，混合于它们。无
论如何，这种情况要出现，唯一的可能是，身体-伊格最低限度得对主权性积分态具
有模糊的理解，足以延展为一份邀请，并持有明确的意图，来指向该分形意识，而
不是指向给“不朽自性”那人造的体制化版本。
119 这个所有决定中最基本的决定，有时人们对它只有模糊的理解，完全不知道甚至完全
误解。有趣的是，这个决定只发生在当身体自我邀请主权整体意识进入他们的身体-自我意
识、目的是让主权整体意识渗入到他们的生活里并作为平等的伙伴混合在一起的时候。然
而，这只有在身体自我至少对主权整体有一个模糊的理解时才有可能发生，因为那时它们
才可以向分形意识—而不是人为的，不朽自我的制度化版本的意识发出邀请并持有意图。
120 How this happens is part of the Social Program. Over the past million years it has been
the spirituality of the timeーsometimes paganistic, sometimes shamanic, sometimes
organized religion, sometimes philosophy, sometimes all of the aboveーthat served in this
fundamental role. We would decide for spirituality or non-spirituality, and then don the
perspective of that spirituality or non-spirituality in our life. We were not taught that the real
decision is about whether to identify as a body-ego attuned to the Social Program or a body-
ego that is an extension of a welcomed presence: the Sovereign Integral consciousness.
120 这件事要如何发生，是社会程序设定的一部分。在过去的百万年里，一直是那个时代
的灵性（the spirituality of the time）——有时是异教的，有时是萨满教的，有时是有组织的
宗教，有时是哲学，有时是以上所有——担任了此一基本角色。我们会决定是灵性还是非
灵性，然后在我们的生活中戴上灵性或非灵性的观点。我们没有被教导说，真正的 决定是
关于，要把自己认同为「一个调准到社会程式设定」的 身体-自我，或是「一个受欢迎的
临在－－Sovereign Integral 意识－－之延伸」的 身体-自我。
100
120这件事的发生途径，属于社会编程的一部分。百万年来，这个途径都是是各个时
代的灵性活动，有时是异教，有时是萨满，有时是组织化宗 教，有时是哲学，有时
是上述全部。我们会做出决定：选择灵性或是非灵性，然后在自己的生活中“披
上”灵性或非灵性的视角。我们从未被教导的是，真正的决定是关于身份认同的，
是认同一个调音向社会编程的身体-伊格，还是认同身体-伊格是主权性积分态意识
的一种延伸，热烈地欢迎着这种临在性的进入。
120 这是如何发生的，是社会程序的一部分。在过去的一百万年里，它一直是时代的灵性
— 有时是异教的，有时是萨满的，有时是有组织的宗教，有时是哲学，有时是以上所有东
西，担任了这一基本角色。我们会决定是灵性或非灵性，然后在我们的生活里戴上这个灵
性或非灵性的视角。我们没有被教导，真正的决定是关于确定自己是一个适应社会程序的
身体-自我，还是一个受欢迎的当下存在：主权整体意识的延伸。
121 What is enfolded within the body-ego-social program encompasses everything that is
not the Sovereign or the Integral. The Sovereign and the Integral remain, within the worlds
of duality, the only identities that are fractal and extend to all Levels and Lifetimes.
Everything elseーabsolutely everythingーis bound together into the Social Program, the
body or the ego.
121 包含在 身体-自我-社会程序设定 里的东西包括了所有不是 Sovereign 或Integral 的
东西。在二元性的世界里，Sovereign 和 Integral 仍然是仅有的 是为碎形的，并且延伸
到所有的层次和生生世世的 身份（复数）。其他的一切——绝对是一切——都被结合在一
起而进入了 社会程序设定、身体、或自我 里面。
121身体-伊格-社会编程包罗了主权体和积分态之外的每一个事物。即使在二元性
的世界里，主权体和积分态也始终保持着唯一的本体特性：分形化并延伸于所有层
级和生命期。其余的每个事物——千真万确是每一个事物——全部都被栓系在社会
编程、身体或伊格中。
121 包含在身体-自我-社会程序里的东西，包括了一切不是主权或整体的东西。在二元性
的世界里，主权和整体仍然是那唯一的身份，分形而延伸至所有的层次和生命周期。其他
一切—绝对是一切—都聚集在一起形成社会程序、身体或自我。
122 The elements of consciousness in the dual realms that have evolved across millions of years
for the purpose of veiling how reality really is, have many names. They try to cover the fact that
we are not separate, physical beings that live and die, placed here, or evolved to this place, by an
unknown intelligence of happenstance or divine intervention. These veils, while highly evolved
and subtle in their operation, consist of two elements: the subconscious and collective
unconscious.
122 已经演化了数百万年，目的是要掩盖「实相的真相」的那些二元领域中的「意识的元
素」，有很多名字。它们试图掩盖这样的一个事实：我们并不是「分开的、有生命和死亡
的、被某种未知的偶然智能或神性的干预 安置在这里 或 进化到这个地方的 物质性存在
体」。这些面纱虽然高度进化且运作微妙，但全由两个元素组成：潜意识和集体无意识。
122 这三个二元性的意识元件有着很多别的名字，它们进化过数百万年的时间，目
的就是以面纱遮盖“真正的实相究竟是什么”。它们试图掩盖这样的事实：我们并非
生生死死的分裂的物质存在，被某种偶现的智能放置于这里，或是因着某种神圣智
能的介入而进化到了这个位置。这些面纱，其运作是高度进化且精巧隐匿的，它们
包含了2个构成要素：潜意识和集体无意识。
101
122 在二元性领域中的意识元素已经进化了数百万年，目的是掩盖真正的现实是怎样的，
它们有很多名字。试图掩盖这样一个事实，即我们不是分离的、生老病死的物质存在，不
是被一个未知的偶然智慧或神圣的干涉而放置在这里或进化到这个地方的。这些面纱虽然
高度进化和运作微妙，但仍然是由两个元素:潜意识和集体无意识构成的。
123 The subconscious is linked to the Sovereign, while the collective unconscious is linked to
the Integral. Together they form the initial section of the bridge between the body
(subconscious) and ego (collective unconscious) and their higher dimensional counterparts
(The Sovereign and the Integral). The subconscious and collective unconscious veil the reality
of the Sovereign Integral, maintaining its presence, while attenuating it at the same time.
123 潜意识 被连接到 Sovereign，而 集体无意识 被连接到 Integral。它们一起构成了，
在 身体（潜意识）和 自我（集体无意识） 以及 它们的更高次元的对应物（Sovereign 和
Integral）之间的桥梁之起始的段落（译注：见下一个图解）。潜意识 和 集体无意识 掩
盖了 Sovereign Integral 的实相，维持它的存在，同时又削弱它。
123潜意识被链接到了主权体，集体无意识则被链接到了积分态。它们共同地构成
了桥梁的第一段，将身体（潜意识）、伊格（集体无意识）、跨接上它们的高维对应
物（主权体和积分态）。潜意识和集体无意识如面纱般掩盖着主权性积分态的实相，
既养护着它的临在性，同时又削弱着这临在性。
123 潜意识与主权相连，而集体无意识则与整体相连。它们一起构成了身体(潜意识)、自
我(集体无意识)和它们的高维对应物(主权和整体)之间桥梁的初始部分。潜意识和集体无
意识掩盖了主权整体的现实，保持它的存在，同时也削弱它。
124 The mind, connected to the brain, is employed by the body in order to survive and
possibly thrive in the worlds of duality. The mind is the part of the Social Program that is
largely unknown to the human race. We usually consign thoughts to the organ of the brain,
believing it is the executioner of thought, and the mind is its point of origination.
124 脑力（或心智，the mind），被连结到大脑，为身体所使用，以便在二元性的世界中
生存以及可能的兴盛。脑力是社会程序设定的一部分，那部分是人类在很大的程度上并不
知道的。我们通常把思想交付给大脑这个器官，相信它是思想的执行者，而脑力是思想的
起源点。
124心智，被连着大脑，身体则使用着心智，以便在二元世界里幸存甚或发展。心智
是社会编程的一部分，不过对人类种族而言，社会编程很大程度是未知的。我们常
常将思想交托给大脑这个器官，相信它是思想的终止处，而心智则是思想的起源
处。
124 与大脑相连的头脑被身体所利用，以便在二元性世界中生存并尽可能地兴盛。头脑是
社会程序中的一部分，对此人类在很大程度上是不知道的。我们通常把思想交付给大脑这
个器官，认为它是思想的执行者，而头脑是思想的起源点。
125 But where is the mind? The thinker of the thought? We all know where the brain is, but
the mind is much more ephemeral and ghostly in form and function. The mind is the
interface with the intelligence of the heart. The brain has a relatively primitive interface with
the physical heart, but the mind is what interfaces with the energetic heart, the nonphysical
energy of the heart. This is a subsystem of consciousness that, in every sense, reflects the
adage, “as above so below.”
102
125 但脑力在哪里呢？思想的思想者（在哪里呢）？我们都知道大脑在哪里，但脑力在形
式和功能上要更为短暂得多，更为精神性的（ghostly）得多。脑力是与心的智能 之界面。
大脑与肉体的心脏有一个相对原始的界面，但脑力是与 能量的心－－心脏之非物质性的能
量－－相互联系的界面。这是一个意识的子系统，在任何意义上都反映了格言“如在其上，
如在其下（as above so below）”。
125可是心智又在哪儿？这个产生出思想的思考者存在于哪儿？我们全都知道大脑在
哪儿，可心智在形式和功能上都更转瞬即逝和幽幻。心智是连通心脏智能的接口界
面㉜。大脑拥有跟物质心脏之间的相对原始的接口界面，心智作为接口界面则交互
连接着能量心脏，亦即非物质的心脏能量。这是意识的一个子系统，在所有意义
上，它都反映着这句谚语“其下如其上/上面怎么样，下面也一样”。
125 但头脑在哪里呢?那思想的思想者?我们都知道大脑在哪里，但头脑在形式和功能上更
短暂，更无形无影。头脑是与心灵智慧的接口。大脑与物质性心脏有一个相对原始的接
口，但头脑是与能量的心—也就是心的非物质能量互动的东西。这是意识的一个子系统，
在任何意义上，都反映了这句格言的意思，“如其在上，如其在下”。
126 The overlap of the heart and mind (mandorla) is the interface between the body-ego,
the Noble Mind and imaginative faculty therein. Bringing these subsystems into relative
harmony and alignment is the primary purpose of expansion in duality. This is the inception
point of the Sovereign Integral within the realms of duality and human culture. Throughout
the history of humankind there have been those who have achieved this harmony and
alignment, each through their own method and through their own belief system (Social
Program).
126 心与脑力的重叠（曼陀拉）是 身体-自我、崇高脑力、和想象力的机能之间的界面。
使这些子系统 进入 相对和谐与对齐的状态 是 在二元性里的扩展之主要目的。这是
Sovereign Integral 在二元性和人类文化领域内的起始点。纵观人类历史，有些人已经达
到了这种和谐与一致，每个人都藉由他们自己的方法和藉由他们自己的信念系统（社会程
序设定）来达到。
126心脏和心智的交叠处（曼多拉）也是一个接口界面，将身体-伊格双向连接上恢
弘心智及其内的想象官能。在二元性内进行扩展的主要目的，就是将这些子系统带
入相对的和声/和谐和校准。这种和声/和谐和校准，正是主权性积分态进入二元各
领域和人类文化的初始点。人类历史上实现了这种和声/和谐与校准的人们，全都是
经由他们自身的方法和自身的信念系统（社会编程）。
126 心与头脑(曼多拉)的重叠是身体-自我，崇高头脑和那里的想象能力之间的接口和界
面。将这些子系统带入相对的和谐与一致，是二元性扩展的主要目的。这是主权整体在二
元性和人类文化领域内的起始点。在整个人类历史中，一直有人通过他们自己的方法和他
们自己的信仰系统（社会程序）实现了这种和谐与一致。
127 Even if a billion humans believe in the same religion or philosophy, there are notable
distinctions in their belief system as a result of their unique life trajectory and the
subconscious understanding of their total selfhood. It is this difference in belief or the
execution of it, that invites criticism and judgment, even among their fellow followers, and
this is how the ego enters the picture. This happens with great intensity when education
begins in the life of the child.
103
127 即使有 10 亿人信仰相同的宗教或哲学，但由于他们独特的生活轨迹和对他们的总体
自性（total selfhood）的潜意识的理解，他们的信仰系统也会存在着显着的差异。正是这
种信念或信念执行上的差异，会招致批评和批判，即使在他们的同伴追随者中也是如此，
而这就是自我（ego）如何介入的方式。当教育在小孩的生命中开始时，这种情况会非常强
烈。
127纵使10亿人类都信仰同样的宗 教或哲学，他们的信念系统也会存在显著的差
异，这是源于他们独一无二的生命轨迹，以及他们对于自身总体自性的独一无二的
潜意识理解。正是信念或信念执行上的不同，招致了批判和评判，甚至就出现于他
们的伙伴追随者中，这就是伊格步入镜头画面的方式。同样的情况也大量上演着开
始接受教育的孩子的生命中。
127 即使有10亿人信仰相同的宗教或哲学，但由于他们独特的生活轨迹和对他们总体自我
的潜意识理解，他们的信仰体系也会存在显著的差异。正是这种信仰或执行上的差异，招
致了批评和评判，即使在他们的同伴追随者中也是如此，这就是自我如何进入画面的。当
教育在孩子的生命中开始时，这种情况十分严重。
128 The ego protects the perceived emotional hurt of the Social Program that arrives to the
body-ego in the form of judgment, perceived imperfections and obsessive worry ーeither by
oneself or others. These buffeting “winds” help shape the ego. They are not the only forces,
but these are the important ones that arrive from negative sources. The positive sources are
the elements of success, recognition, love and achievement. The more neutral sources are
detachment, contentment and inspiration.
128 自我 会防卫（它所）感知到的社会程序设定的情感伤害，这些伤害以批判、「被感
知到的不完美」和「过分的担忧」的形式来到 身体-自我 这里——无论是自己或是他人造
成的。这些冲击的“风”有助于形塑自我。它们不是唯一的力量，但它们是从「负面的来
源」而来的重要力量。「正面的来源」是成功、认可、爱和成就等这些要素。「更中性的
来源」是超然、满足和灵感。
128伊格防卫着它所以为的社会编程施加给身体-伊格的情感伤害，这些不是由自己
就是由他人制造的“伤害”，就表现为评判、主观认定的缺陷、纠缠不去的焦虑。这
些肆虐的“风”帮助塑造了伊格，虽然并非唯一的塑造力量，却是源自负面源头的
最重要的一些。而正面源头是这样的要素：成功、认可、爱、达成。更为中性的源
头则是超然、知足、妙思。
128 自我会防卫它从社会程序中所感知到的情感伤害，这些伤害以自我或他人的评判、感
知到的不完美和过分担忧的形式来到身体-自我这里。这些振动之“风”有助于塑造自我。
它们不是唯一的力量，但它们是来自负面源头的重要力量。正面的来源是成功、认可、爱
和成就的元素。更中性的来源是超脱、满足和灵感。
129 These positive, negative and neutral forces are ebbing and flowing constantly. In most
peoples’ lives, they move like fallen leaves in the wind. Sometimes they peacefully swirl,
sometimes they are hurled by a hurricane, sometimes they lay on the ground as if sleeping,
sometimes they are pulled in a singular direction away from their comfort. Whatever you wish to
call the cause and effect, it is the perceived lack of control that gives rise to the ego. It is a want-
to-control-but-do-not-know-how kind of feeling that the ego defends against.
129 这些正面的、负面的和中性的力量在不断地起起落落。在大多数人的生活中，它们像
风中的落叶一样移动。时而平静地旋转，时而被一阵飓风猛力抛出，时而躺在地上彷彿睡
104
着了，时而被拉向远离舒适的单一方向。无论你想称呼 因果关系 为什么名称，它就是导
致了自我（ego）的产生 之 被感知到的 缺乏控制。自我 所防卫的是一种 想-控-制-却-不
-知-如-何-做 的感觉。
129这些正面、负面、中性的力量永无止境地起伏涨落。大部分人的生命中，它们移
动得如同风中落叶。有时缓缓打着旋，有时被暴风刮落，有时沉睡般躺在地面，有
时候被拽向远方远离了舒适。无论你想如何命名这因果关系，但本质上，正是这种
主观认定的“控制缺失”，引发了伊格的出现。这种“意欲控制却不知所措”的感觉
正是伊格要来防卫的。
129 这些正面的、负面的和中性的力量在不断地起伏。在大多数人的生活中，它们就像风
中的落叶一样移动。有时它们平静地旋转，有时它们被飓风猛推，有时它们躺在地上仿佛
睡着了，有时它们被拉向远离舒适的单一方向。无论你想要如何称呼因果，它都是导致了
自我之产生的被感知到的缺乏控制。这是一种自我防卫的“想要控制却不知道如何控制”
的感觉。
130 The diagram on the next page illustrates the relationships between the nondual and dual
realms.
130 接下来的图解说明了 非二元的领域 和 二元的领域 之间的关系。
130下面的图解阐释了非二元与二元性领域的关系
130下图说明了非二元性领域和二元性领域之间的关系。
105
图11
106
131 In every life there is the opportunity to appreciate the Sovereign and the Integral. The
Integral is the mentoring universe16 and the Sovereign is the student of duality. There is
harmony and balance in this interchange. A pure collaboration. The body-ego-social program
understands this subconsciously. The mandorla17 (overlap) of the Sovereign and the Integral
in duality is where the Social Program is engineered to be a more welcoming space for
expansion, unity and understanding. It is the body-ego that makes this possible, as much as
the Sovereign Integral itself.
131 在每个生命中，都有去赞赏与感激 Sovereign 和 Integral 的机会。Integral 是指导的宇
宙（the mentoring universe）
16
，而 Sovereign 是二元性的学习者。在这种交流中存在着 和
谐与平衡。一种全然的合作。身体-自我-社会程序设定 潜意识地理解这一点。Sovereign 和
Integral 在二元性里的曼陀拉（mandorla）
17
（重叠）是社会程序设定里 被设计要成为一个
更受欢迎的扩展、合一和理解的空间 之地方。就如 Sovereign Integral 本身一样，身体-自我
也是使这个成为可能的元素之一。
131每一个生命中都存在着机会来赞赏主权体和积分态。积分态是一个辅导性宇宙(16)，
主权体是二元性学习者。这种信息交换中存在着一种和声/和谐与平衡。一种纯粹的
协作关系。身体-伊格-社会编程潜意识地理解这一点。主权体和积分态在二元性内存
在一个曼多拉(17)（交叠处），在这里，社会编程被设计改编成一个更为欢迎扩张、联合
和理解的空间。这件事能得以发生，身体-伊格所起的作用跟主权性积分态一样多。
131 在每个生命中，都有去赞赏主权和整体的机会。整体是指导的宇宙（注16），而主权者
是二元性的学生。在这种交流中有和谐与平衡。一种纯粹的合作。身体-自我-社会程序潜意
识地理解这一点。在二元性中，主权和整体的曼多拉（注17）(重叠)是社会程序被设计成一
个更受欢迎的扩展、统一和理解的空间的地方。正是身体自我使这成为可能，就像主权整体
本身一样。
132 The Social Program is often many things, but one that seems to be gaining popularity is
that we live in a simulationーthat advanced beings somewhere in our universe created
computer technology like us, perhaps millions of years ago, which gave them the ability to play
16
Defined in paragraph 146...定义见第147段。
17
Vesica piscis is an ancient symbol threading its way into the history of human beliefs and culture. It denotes the
intersection and overlap of two opposites or distinctly different states. It is the Integral symbol. It has permeated
human time, perhaps as the strongest of all collective unconscious symbols, always hidden in plain sight.
Vesica piscis（拉丁文）是一个古老的符号，它深入到人类信仰和文化的历史中。它表示两个相反或明
显不同的状态的交叉和重叠。 它是 Integral 的符号。它已经瀰漫于人类时间里，也许是所有集体无意
识符号中最强大的，总是隐藏在显眼的地方。
“两端尖尖的椭圆形光轮”是一个古老的符号，一路贯穿于人类信念及文化的历史中。它代表着
2个对立面或截然不同状态的交汇和交叠。它是一个积分态符号。它遍布于所有人类时间，永远
隐藏在最易以发现的地方。它大概是所有集体无意识符号中最为强大的一个。
双圆光轮（Vesica piscis）是一个古老的象征，它在人类信仰和文化的历史中穿行。它表示两个对立状
态或明显不同的状态的交叉和重叠。它是整体的象征。它渗透人类的时代，也许是所有集体无意识象征中
最强大的，总是隐藏在显而易见的地方。
107
God and create a world in which the human soul is tossed about like puppets in a make-believe
world.
132 社会程序设定通常可以是许多东西，但似乎越来越受欢迎的说法是，我们生活在一种模
拟的世界里——也许在数百万年前，宇宙中某个地方的先进生物创造了和我们现在所拥有的
一样的计算机科技，这使他们能够 扮演上帝并创造出一个世界，在这个世界中，人类的灵
魂像虚构世界中的木偶一样被扔来扔去。
132社会编程常常（被认为）是很多东西，但一个似乎正受到广泛认可的观点是：我
们生活在一种模拟中——我们宇宙某处的一些先进存在们，或许在数百万年前就创造
出了类似我们计算机的技术，这使得它们有能力去扮演上帝，创造出一个世界，在其
中，人类灵魂被上下折腾，就如同身处虚构世界的木偶。
132 社会程序通常可以是很多东西，但其中一个似乎越来越受欢迎的是，我们生活在一个
模拟的环境中—也许是在数百万年前，宇宙中某个地方的高级生物创造了像我们现在拥有的
一样的计算机技术，这给了他们扮演上帝的能力并创造出一个世界，在这个世界里，人类的
灵魂就像虚拟世界中的木偶一样被抛来抛去。
133 Usually, the justification for this belief or hypothesis is that the acceleration of computer
and software technology seems to exponentially increase without end. Even our species, being
at the helm of computer technology for only a few generations, is already on the cusp of
artificial intelligence, quantum computing, metaverses and virtual reality. We are already able
to imagine this new world and our technologists are all too happy to lead us there. Thus, a
species that was hundreds or thousands of generations in their deployment of artificial
intelligence, would certainly be able to make a simulated world indistinguishable from reality.
133 通常，这种信念或假设的理由是计算机和软件科技的加速似乎无止境地呈指数增长。
即使是我们人类，掌握计算机科技只有几个世代，都已经要步上人工智能、量子计算、元宇
宙和虚拟实相的顶峰。我们已经能够想象这种新的世界，而我们的科技人员也非常乐意带领
我们到达那里。因此，一个已经运用人工智能数百或数千世代的族类，肯定能够使模拟世界
与现实无法区分。
133通常，维护这种假说或信念的理由是：计算机及软件技术的加速幅度，看上去在
指数级地无止境增长。即使是我们物种，握住计算机技术的船舵，仅仅几个世代，就
已站上了尖端领域，人工智能、量子计算机、元宇宙、虚拟现实。我们已经有能力想
象这类新世界，而且我们的技术也全都“乐于”将我们引向那里。这样看来，一个部
署了人工智能数百、数千世代的物种，无疑有能力制造难以区分于现实的模拟世界。
133 通常，这个信念或假设的理由是计算机和软件技术的加速似乎在无止境地呈指数级增
长。就连我们这个仅仅在几代人的时间里就掌握了计算机技术的人类，也已经处于人工智能、
量子计算、元数据和虚拟现实的风口浪尖。我们已经能够想象这个新世界，并且我们的技术
人员也非常乐意带领我们去到那里。因此，一个拥有数百或数千代人工智能的物种，肯定能
够制造出一个与现实无异的模拟世界。
134 Under the lens of time, evolution transpires. It unfolds an ever-increasing attunement to
the Sovereign Integral consciousness, however, this journey is anything but a straight line
from the separation point to the Sovereign Integral consciousness. The collective Social
Program is the road we all travel, taking in all the twists and turns that weave in and out of
our reality in the collective moment. The multiverse is so large and dynamically expanding
that it cannot be generated by an artificial intelligence, and this is a result of the existence of
108
nonduality. Artificial intelligence is binary. It is of the realms of duality, and in this spacetime,
a matured AI could indeed create simulations indistinguishable from reality. AI’s cannot
extend their intelligence to the nondual.
134 在时间的镜头下，进化发生了。它展开了对 Sovereign Integral 意识的一种不断增加的
对准调和，然而，这个旅程绝对不是从「分离点」到 Sovereign Integral意识的一条直线。
集体社会程序设定是我们所有人都旅行在其上的道路，在集体的当下里（in the collective
moment）接受编织进出我们实相的所有曲折和转弯。复合宇宙如此庞大且动态地扩张，以
至于它无法被一种人工的智能所生成，这是「非二元性的存在」的一种结果。人工智能是
二进制的（binary）。它属于二元性的领域，在这个时空中，成熟的人工智能确实可以创
建与现实无法区分的模拟。但 AI 无法把它们的智能扩展到那「非二元的」。
134在时间的透镜下，进化过程一览无遗。它日益呈现为一种指向主权性积分态意
识的不断-增强的调音，然而，这趟旅程可以是任何方式的，唯独不会是从分裂点直
通主权性积分态意识的笔直路线。集体社会编程就我们全体跋涉都其上的道路，在
每一个的当下里，它都在带来所有的曲径和转角，穿进穿出于我们的实相。复合宇
宙是如此宏大，并动态扩张着，它根本不可能产生自人工智能，这个结论是非二元
存在性带来的必然结果。人工智能是二进制的。它属于二元性诸领域，在这个时空
中，成熟的AI确实能创造难以区分于现实的模拟。然而，AI无法将其智能延伸进非
二元性。
134 在时间的镜头下，进化发生了。它展现了对主权整体意识不断增长的对齐与调谐，然
而，这段旅程绝不是从分离点到主权整体意识的直线。集体的社会程序是我们所有人行走
其上的道路，它包含了所有在集体时刻交织在我们的现实里的迂回曲折。多重宇宙是如此
之大和动态扩张，以至于它不可能是人工智能所能产生的，这是非二元性存在的结果。人
工智能是二进制的。它属于二元性的领域，在这个时空里，一个成熟的AI确实可以创造出
与现实难以区分的模拟。但人工智能无法将其智能扩展到非二元性。
135 The realms in which the Sovereign Integral is whole, in which it is conscious of itself, and
the Sovereign and the Integral are joined in equitable portions, that is the place where
opposites converge into harmony. Where understanding is possible. This is the fountainhead
where the nondual becomes the source of the dual. If it were reversed, where the dual could
create the nondual, then AI could, in theory, create a simulation of our total reality. However,
the one begets the many, not the inverse. It is the flow of creation.
135 在那些 Sovereign Integral 是「完整的」的领域里，那些 Sovereign Integral 能意识到
自己 并且 Sovereign 和 Integral 以平衡的比例结合在一起 的领域，就是对立面可以会聚
成和谐的地方。在那里理解才是可能的。这里是「非二元的」成为「二元的」的源头之根
源。如果反过来，「二元的」可以创造「非二元的」，那么理论上，人工智能就可以创建
我们整个实相的模拟。然而，是一个生出许多，而不是相反。这就是创造源源不断的流出
或产出（It is the flow of creation）。
135在非二元的各领域，主权性积分态是完形整体，在这里，主权性积分态是自生
的意识，主权体和积分态作为平等的部分被结合在一起，换句话说，在这里，对立
面汇聚成了和声/和谐。在这里，理解成为了可能。这种理解是源泉，基于此，非二
元性成为了二元性的源头。如果这件事能够颠倒，二元性可以创造出非二元，那么
理论上，AI就能创造出关于我们总体实相的模拟。但是，是“一”生出了“多”，而
非相反。这就是创造的流动方向。
109
135 在那些主权整体是完整的领域，主权整体能意识到自己，并且主权与整体以平等的份
量结合在一起的领域，那里是对立汇聚成和谐的地方。在那里理解是可能的。这是非二元
性成为二元性来源的源头。如果倒过来，二元性可以创造非二元性，那么人工智能在理论
上可以创造出我们整个现实的模拟。然而，是一生出许多，而不是反过来。这就是创造如
何流出或产出的。
136 The Social Program is not a simulation, it is a “vessel-field” of collective experiencing,
awakening, expanding and understanding. The vessel-field is a creation of all at each Level. It
is an evolving infinitude. In the largest scope of understanding, it is a collaboration of
Sovereigns to join the Integral perspective, and to harvest and share the bounty of
experience in duality.
136 社会程序设定不是一种模拟，它是集体的经验、觉醒、扩张和理解的一种“容器场
（vessel-field）”。容器场是在每个层次上的所有人的创造。这是一个不断在发展的无限。
就最大范围的理解，它是一种「Sovereigns 加入 Integral 的观点，并且收获和分享在二元
性里的大量经验所得」之合作。
136社会编程并非一种模拟，它是一种集体性“容器-场”，关乎集体性的体验、觉醒、
扩张、理解。这个“容器-场”是所有层级的一切事物的创造物。它是一种进化中的无
限性。在最宏大的理解尺度下，社会编程是主权体们的合作成果：主权体结合上积分
态的视角，收获并共享着二元性体验的馈赠。
136 社会程序不是模拟，而是集体的经验、觉醒、扩张和理解的“容器场”。容器场是每
个层次所有存在的创造物。这是一个不断进化的无穷。从最大范围的理解来说，它是主权
们加入整体视角并收获和分享二元性的丰富经验的合作。
137 The fundamental purpose of the body-ego is to enable a separation point for the
Sovereign Integral to experience the realms of duality. There is an organic portion of the
collective Social Program and a mathematical portion. A heart and a mind. A reception and
transmission of energy. The body-ego pulls the rivets of the Sovereign Integral out, allowing
it to live in separation within multiple Levels and Lifetimes, all of which become the Social
Program for both an individual member, and a collective unit, of a species.
137 身体-自我 的基本目的是使得一种「分离点」成为可能，而让 Sovereign Integral可以
去经验二元性的领域。集体社会程序设定有一个「有机的部分」和一个「数学的部分」。
一颗心，一个脑力。能量的接收和传输。身体-自我 将 Sovereign Integral 的铆钉拔出，
允许它在多个层次和生生世世中分离地活着，所有这些都成为一个物种的个体成员和集体
单位的社会程序设定。
137身体-伊格的根本目的，就是启动一个分裂点，以便主权性积分态来体验二元性
各领域。集体社会编程存着一个有机部分和一个数字部分。一个心脏和一个心智。
一个能量接收器和一个能量发送器。身体-伊格拔掉了主权性积分态的铆钉㉝，容许
它以分裂的状态生活于多重的层级和生命期里，所有这些就变成了社会编程，同时
作用于一个物种的个体成员和集体组合。
137 身体-自我的根本目的是为主权整体提供一个分离点来体验二元性领域。集体社会程序
有一个有机的部分和一个数学的部分。一颗心和一个头脑。一个能量接收和传输的接收
110
器。身体自我拔出主权整体的铆钉，允许它在多个层次和多个生命周期中分离地生活，所
有这些都成为一个物种的个体成员和集体单位的社会程序。
138 Now, please imagine a simulation being able to produce one body-ego-social program,
let alone an infinite number of them in dynamic expansion crossing between dual and
nondual realms. It is clear, provided you agree with the premise of the Sovereign Integral,
that reality is of a collective making, not an individual or group of like-minded individuals, no
matter how intelligent or technology-capable it or they may be. The Social Program is all-
encompassing. It has to be in order to produce a separation point for the Sovereign Integral
consciousness. This is the gift of the body-ego-social program.
138 现在，请想象一下，一个模拟能够产生一个 身体-自我-社会程序设定（吗？），更不
用说在那些二元和非二元的领域之间动态扩展的一种无限数量的 身体-自我-社会程序设定
了。只要你同意了 Sovereign Integral 的前提，很明显地，实相是集体创造的，而不是一个
个体或一群兴趣相投的个体所创造的，无论它或它们可能多么聪明或有科技能力。社会程
序设定包含了一切。它一定要是这样，才能为 Sovereign Integral 意识产生一个分离点。这
是 身体-自我-社会程序设定 （所带来的）的礼物。
138现在，请想象一个虚构存在，它有能力制造一种身体-伊格-社会编程，再将无限
数量的它们独自留在横跨二元性与非二元领域的动态扩张中。假如你同意上句话关
于主权性积分态的设定，那么显而易见，实相必然是一种全员创造，而非某个个体
或者一群相似-心智个体们，无论它或它们的智能或技术能力多么强大。社会编程是
包罗一切的。（当然也就包括：）它必然会按照指令，去为主权性积分态意识制造出
一个分裂点。这是来自身体-伊格-社会编程的礼物。
138 现在，请想象一个能够产生一个身体-自我-社会程序的模拟，（难以想象吧）。更别说
在二元和非二元领域之间动态扩展的无限数量的它们了。很清楚，只要你同意主权整体的
前提，你就明白，这是集体创造的现实，而不是一个个体或一群志趣相投的人，无论他们
有多聪明，技术能力有多强。社会程序包罗万象。它必须这样，才能为主权整体意识产生
分离点。这是身体-自我-社会程序的礼物。
139 It is a gift that needs to be opened and understood, in order to be truly appreciated.
139 这是一份礼物，需要被打开和理解，才能被真正的赞赏与感激。
139这个礼物需要被开启和理解，以便被真正地赞赏/赏识。
139 这是一份需要打开和理解的礼物，以便能够真正地赞赏它，
111
插图6：身体-自我-社会程序设定/伊格-身体-社会编程/身体-自我-社会程序
译注32：接口界面。2层含义，硬件上的信息传递接口。软件上的交互操作界面。比
如电脑操作系统就是一个软件上的接口界面。
译注33：铆钉一般用于将部件铆合成整体
112
Section 5第五节
Glossary词汇表
The following words were not included in the Glossary. They were, however, defined as
complete Sections of this paper. (It is recommended to read the first four Sections of this
paper before reading the Glossary.)
以下词语未包含在词汇表中。然而，它们在这份文件里被以完整的章节来解释了。（建议
在阅读词汇表之前先阅读本文件的前四节。）
⚫ Body-ego-social program身体-自我-社会程序设定/身体-伊格-社会编程
⚫ Sovereign 主权体
⚫ Integral 积分态
⚫ Sovereign Integral主权性积分态/主权整体
The definitions in the Glossary can be considered short Sections of secondary influence, yet
fundamental to understanding the Sovereign Integral model of existence. Most of these terms are
the bridges between the body-ego-social program and the Sovereign Integral concept in the dual
realms. They are not alphabetically sorted, as the definitions build upon one another.
词汇表里的释义可视为起辅助作用的微型章节，但是对理解主权性积分态存在模式却
又必不可少。大部分词条都是在二元领域内，将身体-伊格-社会编程跨接上主权性积
分态概念的桥梁。它们并未按字母顺序排列，因为定义是一个建基于另一个之上的。
词汇表中的定义可以被认为是次要影响的简短章节，但对于要理解 Sovereign Integral 的存
在模式却是很重要的。这些术语中的大部分是 在二元领域里的 身体-自我-社会程序设定
和 Sovereign Integral 概念 之间的桥梁。它们不是按字母顺序排序的，因为这些定义是建立
在彼此之上的。
词汇表中的定义可被视为是次要影响的简短章节，但对于理解主权整体的存在模式至关重
要。这些词汇中的大多数是身体-自我-社会程序和二元性领域中主权整体概念之间的桥梁。
它们不是按字母顺序排列的，因为定义是建立在彼此的基础上的。
140 Imaginary Being | This is a term that applies to the Sovereign Integral, as understood
through the “eyes” of the imaginative faculty. It is not the Sovereign Integral, but it is a clear
part of its wholeness that is comprehensible to the higher mind, which then can relay a
glimpse and a visceral sense of this state of consciousness to the body-ego. There is,
however, an abstraction that remains tethered to space, time, energy, matter and the
foundation of duality that supports them. You cannot perfectly isolate these formative
structures that define human reality. As a result, when we bring the Sovereign Integral into
human reality, it comes as a concept. It is not a walking, talking, thinking, acting entity. Both
the Sovereign Integral and the Imaginary Being are not comparable to anything in human
reality.
140 想象中的存在 | 这是一个适用于 Sovereign Integral 的术语，当透过了想象力的机能
之“眼睛”来理解时。它不是 Sovereign Integral，但它是其整体的一个清晰的部分，可以被
更高脑力理解，然后更高脑力可以将对这种意识状态的一瞥和深深的感觉传递给 身体-自
我。然而，有一种抽象仍然被束缚在空间、时间、能量、物质和支持它们的二元性基础
113
上。你无法完全隔离这些定义人类实相的构成结构。结果是，当我们将 Sovereign Integral
带入人类实相时，它以概念的形式出现。它不是一个会行走、说话、思考、行动的实体。
Sovereign Integral 和「想象中的存在」都无法与人类实相中的任何事物相比较。
140想象性存在：这个词被用以指称，通过想象性官能这双“眼睛”来理解的主权
性积分态。它并非主权性积分态，但是，它是主权性积分态的完形整体中的易懂部
分，能被更高心智充分理解，更高心智能转而能将关于该意识状态的惊鸿一瞥和官
能感觉/第七感（visceral sense）传递给向身体-伊格。不过，这种抽象依然是栓
系于空间、时间、能量、物质、以及支撑它们的二元性地基之上的。你无法完全隔
绝这些界定人类实相的组成结构。总而言之，当我们把主权性积分态带入人类实相
时，它的到来表现为一个概念，而非一个行走、交谈、思考、行动的实存体。主权
性积分态和想象性存在，与人类实相内的任何事物都没有相似性。
140 想象的存在 | 这是一个适用于主权整体的词汇，当通过想象力之“眼”来理解的时候。
它不是主权整体，但它是其整体的一个清晰的部分，能够被更高的头脑理解，然后更高头
脑可以将这种意识状态的一瞥和发自内心的感觉传递给身体-自我。然而，有一种抽象仍然
被拴在空间、时间、能量、物质以及支持它们的二元性基础之上。你无法完全孤立这些定
义人类现实的形成结构。因此，当我们将主权整体带入人类现实时，它是以概念的形式出
现的。它不是一个会行走、会说话、会思考、会行动的实体。主权整体和想象的存在是无
法与人类现实中的任何东西做比较的。
141 The all-encompassing Social Program, coupled to the Separation Point (body-ego
induced), introduces misunderstanding, which allows us to dismiss the existence of this
Imaginary Being, concluding instead that it comes to us through phenomena like drug-
induced experiences, out-of-body experiences, near-death experiences, extraterrestrial
experiences, psychic experiences, astral travel, religious ecstasy, rapturous light, nirvana,
bliss, cosmic consciousness, self-realization and so on. All of these experiences remain part
of the Social Program. The Imaginary Being truly comes to us in concepts, mental models,
abstraction, and these in turn, get expressed through art and culture itself. The Imaginary
Being is a part of our Social Program that orchestrates the revealing of the Sovereign Integral
upon a living planet.
141 包含一切的社会程序设定，加上「分离点」（身体-自我 所导致），引入了误解，这
使我们能够忘掉这个「想象中的存在」，反而得出结论，它是透过像 药物诱发的体验、灵
魂出窍的体验、濒死经验、外星经验、心灵体验，星光体旅行、宗教狂喜、狂喜之光、涅
槃、极乐、宇宙意识、自我实现等等这样的 现象 来到我们身上的。所有的这些经验仍然
是社会程序设定的一部分。「想象中的存在」真正的是以概念、心理的模型、抽象的形式
出现在我们面前，而这些依次再透过艺术和文化本身来得到表达。「想象中的存在」是我
们的社会程序设定里，「会在一个有生命的行星上精心策划 Sovereign Integral 的揭示」的
那一部分。
141一旦耦合上（身体-伊格诱发的）分裂点，包罗一切的社会编程就开始引入错误
的解读，这种状况使得我们摒弃了想象性存在这个本体，结果反而变成，它抵达我
们需要经由现象，像是药源性体验、出体体验、濒死体验、地外生命体验、超自然
体验、星光旅行、宗 教出神、狂喜之光、涅槃、极乐、大宇宙意识、自我实现等
等。所有这些体验依旧是社会编程的一部分。想象性存在真正抵达我们，则表现为
概念、心理模式、抽象，这些转而又通过艺术和态度行为表达了出来。想象性存在
114
属于我们的社会编程的特定部分，这部分被设计改编来将主权性积分态揭示于这个
鲜活的行星上。
141 包罗万象的社会程序，加上分离点(身体-自我诱导)，引入了误解，使我们可以忽略这
个想象的存在的存在而得出结论，它是通过像药物诱发的体验，灵魂出窍的体验，濒死体
验，外星体验，超自然体验，星光旅行，宗教狂喜，狂喜之光、涅槃、极乐、宇宙意识、
自我实现等等类似的现象来到我们这里的。所有这些经验仍然是社会程序的一部分。而想
象的存在真正地是以概念，心理模式，抽象的形式来到我们这里的，而这些反过来，又通
过艺术和文化本身表达出来。想象的存在是我们社会程序的一部分。在一个有生命的星球
上精心安排了主权整体的揭示。
142 The Imaginary Being is a concept. It is not an image. It is not an entity that wears a
pronoun. It is a concept so large in scope that only a Sovereign, emptied of preconceptions,
could sufficiently understand the concept in order to invite the Sovereign Integral
perspective into their Social Program. This is the creation of a profound, infinite awakening, it
is not an instant realization (“poof, you’re done”).
142 「想象中的存在」是一个概念。它不是一个形象。它不是一个带有代名词的实体。它
是一个范围如此之大的概念，只有一个 Sovereign，清空了成见，才可以充分理解这个概
念，以便将 Sovereign Integral 的观点引入他们的社会程序设定。这是一个深刻的、无限的
觉醒之创造，它不是一种实时的实现（“咻，你做到了”）。
142想象性存在是一个概念。它不是一个形象。它不是能以人称代词指代的实存
体。它是一个范围规模如此浩大的概念，以至于只有当一个主权体清空自己的先入
之见后，才能充分理解这个概念，以便去邀请主权性积分态视角进入他的社会编
程。这是一种深邃而又无限广阔的创造过程，完全无关于即刻的体认（类似于“这
就是证据，你终于达成了”）。
142想象的存在是一个概念。它不是一个形象。它不是一个穿着代词的实体。它是一个范
围如此之广的概念，以至于只有一个没有先入之见的主权者，才能够充分理解这个概念，
以便将主权整体的观点引入他们的社会程序。这是一个深刻的、无限的觉醒之创造，而不
是一种即时的实现(“噗，你做到了”)。
143 At its worst, the imagination has been perceived by modern-day humans as a lie, a fairy
tale, an evil seduction, a lens of the insane; at its best, it has been perceived as the gateway
to discovery and invention. In the context of this paper, imagination is the vision of the
perimeter that encompasses human belief, culture and collective learnings. It is the discipline
of looking beyond this perimeter into the unknown, and then imagining what that unknown
thing is that unites us, connects us, makes sense of us and is somehow, at its core essence,
distilled into a single particle of everything there is: love. That is the thread of originality that
unites and sews us together.
143 在最坏的情况下，想象 被现代人视为谎言，神仙故事，邪恶的诱惑，精神病患的镜
头；在最好的情况下，它被视为通向发现和发明的门户。在本文的背景下，想象力是 人类
信念、文化和集体学习的边界 之远见。它是这样的一种训练：超越这个边界而看入未知，
然后想象那个未知的 东西 是什么，那个 东西 把我们合一起来，连结起来，使我们变得
有意义，而且为了某种理由，在那个 东西的核心本质上，它被提炼成 所有一切都有的 一
颗单一粒子：爱。那是把我们合一和缝制在一起的 创造性本源之线索。
115
143最坏的情况下，想象被当今人类认为是一种谎言、神话故事、邪恶的诱惑、疯癫
的镜头；最好的情况下，想象被认为是通向发现和发明的入口。在本文的语境下，
想象则是一种外周视野，而周界内就包含了人类信念、文化和集体性习得知识。想
象就是锻炼着来望过周界，探入未知，进而去想象：那未知之物统合着我们，连接
起我们，完全理解我们，而且不知怎么的，在它的核心本质处，它被蒸馏升华成单
单一种粒子：爱，每个事物都是由它构成。爱就像一条充满创造力的线，缝合起我
们，统合为一体。
143 在最坏的情况下，想象力被现代人类视为谎言，童话，邪恶的诱惑，精神病患者的镜
头；在最好的情况下，它被视为发现和发明的大门。在本文的背景下，想象力是对包围着
人类信仰，文化和集体学习的周边视野。它是这样一种训练：越过这一边界探索未知世
界，然后想象那个未知的东西是什么，它统一我们，将我们连接在一起、让我们变得有意
义，并且它的核心本质以某种方式浓缩成世间万物的一个单一的粒子：爱。这是将我们联
合在一起的原始创造力之线索。
144 The Integral is like a love particle. The Sovereign is the vessel through which this particle
is expressed. As they coexist in the realms of nonduality, they are refracted into the worlds of
duality through the imaginative faculty. It is the Sovereign Integral’s interfaceーtunneled
through the densities of dualityーwith the body-ego. This interface is underutilized in most,
if not all, of us.
144 Integral 就像一颗爱的粒子。Sovereign 是容器，藉由容器，这个粒子才被表达出来。
当它们共存于非二元性的领域里时，它们藉由「想象力的机能」被折射到二元性的世界
中。它（想象力的机能）是 Sovereign Integral 与 身体-自我 的界面，它能穿过那些二元
性的稠密，连接两方。我们大多数的人（如果不是所有人的话）都未充分利用这个界面。
144积分态就像一种爱的粒子。主权体则是这粒子借以表达的容器。尽管它们并存
在于非二元领域，但通过想象官能，它们能被折射进二元世界。想象官能是主权性
积分态与身体-伊格间的接口界面，隧穿过了二元性的重重稠密。这个接口界面并未
被充分利用的，这种情况即便不适用于全体，也适用于大部分人。
144 整体就像是爱的粒子。而主权者是容器，通过这个容器这颗粒子得以被表达出来。当
它们共存于非二元性的领域里时，它们通过想象力折射到二元性的世界中。它（想象力）
是主权整体与身体-自我之间的接口，这个接口能够穿越二元性的密度。我们大多数人，即
使不是所有人，都没有充分利用这一接口。
145 For example, imagine you are sitting in front of a thousand television screens. In a far
corner, one screenーout of a thousand screensーis displaying the concept of the Sovereign
Integral. We decide if we want more screens to show this concept or we want the one screen
in the center, the focus of our attention. We can turn on more screens to the experience (and
expression) of the Sovereign Integral or ignore it and keep attuned to the body-ego-social
program. There is no judgment that a decision is the “wrong” decision. The Whole cannot be
whole if it is right or wrong. This misunderstanding introduces duality to the system, and the
Imaginary Being represents the nonduality of our existence as human beings.
145 例如，想象你坐在一千个电视荧幕前。在远处的角落里，一千个荧幕中的一个荧幕正
在播出 Sovereign Integral 的概念。我们决定是要更多荧幕来播出这个概念，或者我们想要
一个荧幕在中央，是我们关注的焦点。我们可以打开更多荧幕来播出 Sovereign Integral 的
116
经验（和表达），或者忽略它并保持调准到 身体-自我-社会程序设定。没有对于「哪一个
决定是“错误”的决定」之批判存在。如果有对或错存在，整体（The Whole）就不是完整的
全体了。这种误解为系统引入了二元性，而「想象中的存在」代表了我们作为人类存在体
的存在之非二元性。
145打个比方，想象你坐在一千个屏幕前。远处角落里，一个荧幕——这千个荧幕中
的一个——正显示着主权性积分态的概念。我们需要决定，是否让更多屏幕显示这
概念，或者是否让它显示在中央屏幕，来成为我们注意力的焦点。我们可以开启更
多屏幕来体验（和表达）主权性积分态，也可以无视它，继续调音向身体-伊格-社
会编程。不存在评判说某种决定是“坏的”。如果决定有了好或坏，整体就不可能是
整体。正是这类误读将二元性带入了系统，而想象性存在恰恰代表着：身为人类
时，我们存在性中的非二元性。
145 例如，想象你正坐在一千个电视屏幕前。在远处的角落里，在1000个屏幕中，只有一
个屏幕展示了“主权整体”的概念。我们决定我们是否想要更多的屏幕来展示这个概念，
或者我们只想在中心放置一个屏幕，作为我们关注的焦点。我们可以打开更多的屏幕来展
示主权整体的经验(和表达)，或者忽略它，保持调谐到身体-自我-社会程序。这里没有关
于一个决定是“错误的”决定的判断。如果整体有对和错之分。它就不是完整的。这个有
对错之分的误解将二元性引入了系统，而想象的存在，则代表了我们作为人类存在的非二
元性。
146 It is the Imaginative Faculty that makes this decision possible. That is its primary
purpose: to enable the body-ego to access the concepts of the Sovereign Integral and make
these concepts an equal in the Social Program, but it is always the Sovereign’s choice. It is a
challenging thing to do in human duality, to consign equality to a concept, where it is neither
dominant or absentーrather, it is a partner in the Social Program. An equal number of
“screens” are expressing its presence and existence as something real. Something amazing.
Something we each are.
146 正是「想象力的机能」使这种决定成为可能。那是它的主要目的：使 身体-自我 能够
接取 Sovereign Integral 的概念，并使这些概念在社会程序设定中有一种平等的地位，但它
永远是 Sovereign 的选择。在人类的二元性中这是一件具有挑战性的事：把平等交付给一
个概念，它既不占主导地位也不缺席——而是，它是社会程序设定的一个合作伙伴。相同
数量的“荧幕”把它的临在和存在表达为某种真实的东西。某种令人惊异的东西。某种我们
每个人都是的东西。
146正是想象官能使得这个决定成为了可能性。这个决定的主要目的即是：激活身
体-伊格来接取主权性积分态的相关概念，并使得这些概念成为社会编程内的平等参
与者。不过这个决定终究还是取决于主权体的选择。将“平等性”给予一个概念，
这在人类二元性里确是一项挑战。在这种平等性中，主权性积分态概念既非支配者
也未缺席，而是社会编程内的一个合伙人。一千个屏幕里，会分出均等数量的“屏
幕”来表达出主权性积分态的临在性和存在性，将其表现为某种真实之物，惊人之
物，我们皆是之物。
146 正是想象力使这个决定成为可能。这是它的主要目的：让身体-自我能够接取主权
整体的概念，并使这些概念在社会程序中有一种平等的地位，但它永远是主权者的选
择。在人类的二元性中，将平等交付给一个概念是一件具有挑战性的事情，在这个概
念中，平等既不占主导地位，也并没有缺席，而是社会程序的一个伙伴。同样数量的
117
“屏幕”正在把它的在场和存在表达为某种真实的东西。某种令人惊奇的东西。某种我
们每个人都是的东西。
插图7 想象中的存在/想像性存在/想象的存在图
（在jamesmahu.com网站，该图名为：自我/自性-半身像）
147 Mentoring Universe | It could just as easily be defined as a Mentoring Multiverse, because
the sharing of knowledge is the fundamental purpose of growth and expansion within all
Levels. It is the method through which the Integral calls out to the Sovereign. It is the method
used to promote growth and understanding. However, it is difficult to mentor truth or even
wisdom, owing to the fact that we are each Sovereigns with no common experience, as a result
of our subjective natures.
147 指导的宇宙|它也可以很容易地被定义为 指导的 复合宇宙，因为知识的共享是在所
有层次内的 成长和扩张 之基本目的。它是 Integral 呼唤 Sovereign 的方法。它是用来
提升成长和理解的方法。然而，由于我们每个人都是没有共同经验的 Sovereign，这是
我们主观的本性的结果，因此很难去指导真理甚至是智慧。
147辅导性宇宙：这个词很大程度上也可以被定义为辅导性复合宇宙，因为知识的共
享在所有层级内都是成长和扩张的根本性目的。辅导性宇宙是积分态用以召唤主权体
118
的途径。辅导性宇宙也是用于促进成长和理解的途径。不过，因为我们主观化的天然
属性，要教导真理甚或只是教导智慧，都是件困难的事情，这归结于一个事实：我们
是一个个的主权体，没有相同的体验。
147 指导的宇宙|它可以很容易地被定义为“指导多重宇宙”，因为知识的分享
是所有层次中成长和扩展的根本目的。这是“整体”呼唤主权的方法。它是用来
促进成长和理解的方法。然而，由于我们都是没有共同经验的主权者，这是我们
主观本性的结果，因此很难去指导真理甚至是智慧。
148 Even if we experienced the exact same event in the exact same time and place, it is not
the same experience, and this is because the moment of nowness is influenced by past and
future moments of nowness across all Levels and Lifetimes. These influences are stored in
our subconscious in differing degrees of detail and behavioral importance. Thus, we can only
mentor opinions that are true for us in a moment within a specific Level and Lifetime.
148 即使我们在完全相同的时间和地点经历完全相同的事件，它也不是同样的经验，这是
因为当下的时刻受到所有层次和生生世世的「当下时刻的过去和未来」所影响。这些影响
以不同程度的细节和行为重要性存储在我们的潜意识中。因此，我们只能在特定的层次和
生生世世内的某个时刻以那些「对我们来说是正确的」的意见来指导。
148即使我们在完全相同的时间和地点经历着完全相同的事件，也不会有同样的体
验，这是因为，所有层级和生命期的所有过去和未来中的“当下时刻”都会影响到
现在这个“当下时刻”。这些影响，以不同程度的细节和行为重要性，存储于我们的
潜意识里。因此，我们提供的辅导意见，只适用于特定层级和生命期内的一个时
刻。
148 即使我们在完全相同的时间和地点经历了完全相同的事件，所获得的经验也不会
是完全相同的，这是因为当下的时刻会受到所有层次和生命周期中的当下时刻的过去
和未来的影响。这些影响以不同程度的细节和行为重要性储存在我们的潜意识中。因
此，我们只能在特定的层次和生命周期内的某个时刻里以那些对我们来说是正确的意
见指导。
149 This fundamental premise guides our humble nature which keeps open the Imaginative
Faculty to new visions of the unknown; new facets of the Sovereign Integral that can be
expressed into duality.
149 这一基本前提引导着我们谦卑的本性，它使「想象力的机能」对未知的新视野保持开
放；对可以被表达进入二元性里的 Sovereign Integral 的新面向保持开放。
149这个根本性前提将我们导向了谦逊品性，这会使得想象官能始终开放向种种新
的未知视野，开放向主权性积分态能被表达进二元性的种种新的面向。
149 这个基本前提指引着我们谦卑的天性，它 使想象力对未知事物的新视野保持开
放；主权整体的新层面可以表达为二元性。
150 In the human Social Program there are always mentors and students. The mentors are
drawn to a particular learning path in which they excel, and from this deeper understanding
they share their opinion on how something can be achieved or experienced. They may not
impart why something can be achieved or experienced, because that is subjective, a matter
for the Sovereign or Student of Duality to understand. However, a mentor may share the why
or motivation for themselves. When they do, they can make clear that the why is an
119
extension of values. Otherwise we are mentoring without understanding the value innate to
the learning path we are modeling.
150 在人类社会程序设定里，总是有指导者和学习者。指导者们被吸引到他们优于他人的
特定学习路径，而出自这种更深入的理解，他们分享他们对某件事可以如何被达成或经验
到的看法。他们可能不会传授 为什么 某件事可以被达成或经验到（的原因），因为那是
主观的，是 Sovereign 或「二元性的学习者」要（自己去）理解的事情。但是，指导者可
能会分享他们自己的 为什么 或 动机。当他们这样做时，他们可以清楚地表明那 为什么
就是一种 价值观的延伸。否则，我们就是在「不了解我们正在建造的 学习路径之模式 的
内在固有价值」之情况下进行指导。
150人类社会编程中，始终存在着辅导者和学习者。辅导者被吸引向他们擅长的特定
知识路径，他们能够基于更深的理解，就某事如何能被达成和体验，分享自己的意
见。他们或许不会告知“为什么”某事能够被达成或体验，因为那是主观性的，是
主权体或二元性学习者要去理解的问题。不过，一些辅导者或许会分享他们自己的
“为什么”或动机。这么做时，他们应该明确澄清，属于他自己的“为什么”，只是
“价值”的一种外延。如果没有这样的澄清，我们被指导去建模一条学习路径时，
会无法理解其内在固有的价值。
150 在人类社会程序中一直都有指导者和学生。指导者被吸引到一条他们擅长的特定
学习路径上，并从这种更深层的理解中，他们分享了他们对如何实现或体验某件事的
看法。他们可能不会传授我们为什么某件事可以被达成或体验，因为那是主观的，是
主权者或二元性的学生要理解的事情。然而，指导者可能会分享自己的原因或动机。
当他们这样做时，他们可以明确原因是价值观的延伸。否则，我们就只是在不理解我
们正在建模的学习路径的内在价值的情况下指导。
151 A mentoring universe is a universe in which generational knowledge is shared. It is one
of the reasons that the Internet exists or publishing was invented or like-minded people have
always been attracted into groups or why families exist as a unit of society. It is the way that
evolution (the hands of the Integral) is passed across spacetime and duality. Generations are
the macro-mentor, stored within the collective consciousness, living in the realms of duality,
and this is generally true across all species.
151 指导的宇宙 是一个在其里面「世代知识是共享的」之宇宙。这就是网际网路会存在，
或出版会被发明，或者兴趣相同的人总是被吸引到一些群体中，或者家庭会作为社会的一
个单位而存在 的原因之一。这是进化（Integral 的手）跨越了时空和二元性而被传递交流
的方式。那些世世代代 都是 宏观的指导者（the macro-mentor），被储存在集体意识里
面，而活在二元性的领域中，这在所有的物种中都是如此。
151辅导性宇宙是代际间知识共享的宇宙。之所以互联网会存在，印刷术被发明，相
似心智的人们始终被吸引进团队，家庭会作为社会的基本单元，代际间知识共享都
是其中一个原因。经由这种方式，进化（亦即积分态之手）贯穿进整个时空和二元
性。每个世代都作为宏-辅导者，被存储在集体意识里，活跃于二元性各领域里，这
件事对所有物种都普遍适用。
151 指导的宇宙是一个在其里面世代知识共享的宇宙。这是互联网存在或出版被发明或志
趣相投的人总是被吸引到一些群体中的原因，也是家庭作为社会的一个单位存在的原因之
一。这是进化(整体之手)跨越时空和二元性传递的方式。世代是宏观的指导者，被储存在
集体意识里而生活在二元性的领域中，这在所有的物种中都是普遍真实的。
120
152 There is often a felt-competition between generations. New generations perceive the
older generations as marginally aware of the new generation’s aspirations and talents, which
creates a sense of mutual distrust between generations. Nonetheless, it is the older
generations who are experienced in the Social Program and have improved its foundations
for the new generations to come. The “guardrails” have been installed by the older
generations, but they have also paved the way for more efficiency, as well as a broader
understanding of the world in which we live.
152 经常会有一种被感觉到的竞争存在于几代人之间。新一代的人认为老一代的人对新一
代人之抱负与才能知之甚少，这会在几代人之间造成一种互不信任感。尽管如此，在社会
程序设定方面经验丰富的还是老一代的人，并且为接下来的世代改善了社会程序设定的基
础。那些“护栏”已经被老一代的人装设起来了，但它们也为「提高效率」以及「更广泛地
了解我们生活在其中的世界」铺平了道路。
152各个世代之间常常存在一种感受-竞争。新世代会认为老世代很少意识到新世代
的志向和才能，这就在2个世代间制造出一种不信任感。但是，正是老世代体验了
社会编程，为后来的新世代改进了社会编程的基础。老世代或许安装了一些“护
栏”，但他们也铺平了道路，去服务于更高效能，以及对于我们所生活世界的更宽广
理解。
152 代与代之间常常有一种能被感受到的竞争。新一代人认为老一代人对他们的抱负和才
能知之甚少，这造成了代与代之间的不信任。然而，老一代人在社会程序中拥有丰富的经
验并为下一代人改善了社会程序的基础。“护栏”是老一代人安装的。但他们也为提高效
率铺平了道路，并为我们更广泛地理解我们生活的世界铺平了道路。
153 As a mentor, we must decide the subjects we want to teach ourselves and possibly
others. We examine the current record and then, using first principles, we examine the
values innate to the subject. Are those values aligned to our intelligence and free will? Do
they feel expansive or welded to human history? This is part of mentoring, to ensure that we
are mentoring the values we live by through intentions, thoughts, communication and
behaviors.
153 作为指导者，我们必须决定要教给我们自己和可能的其他人什么主题。我们检查当前
的记录，然后，使用最首要的那些原则（译注：Sovereign Integral 的三个生命原则），我
们检查 主题 内在固有的价值。这些价值观与我们的智能和自由意志一致吗？它们感觉起
来是否是扩张的？或是与人类历史结合在一起的？这是指导的一部分，以确保我们藉由意
图、思想、沟通和行为来指导我们所赖以存在的价值观。
153身为一名辅导者，我们必须决定：我们想要教授什么课题给自己，也可能还涉及
到他人。我们检视当前的记录，然后，运用第一性原理，来检视课题的内在价值。
这些价值是否被校准于了我们的智能和自由意志？它们感觉上是扩展还是焊死了人
类的历史进程？此外，确保我们所教导的价值，是我们通过自身意图、思想、交
流、行为而活出来的价值，这件事本身就是教导的一部分。
153 作为指导者，我们必须决定什么主题是我们想要教给自己和可能的其他人的。我们检
查当前的记录，然后，使用首要的原则，我们检查这个主题内在固有的价值。这些价值观
是否与我们的智慧和自由意志保持一致，它们是否感觉广阔或与人类历史融合在一起？这
是指导的一部分，确保我们通过意图、思想、沟通和行为来指导我们赖以生存的价值观。
121
154 A critical factor to understand is that the Sovereign is both the student and the mentor.
The mentoring occurs on the “screens” of the Integral via the Social Program. We teach
ourselves. We are both a student and a mentor, at every age. We might also have outside
mentorsーparents, siblings and others who are experts in a particular field ー but the final
judge of what has value to the Sovereign, is the Sovereign. Value is the underlying quality of
the Mentoring Universe, and most of us define value against the backdrop of human
existence. It is not the value of having the Imaginary Being, present in our life.
154 有一个要理解的关键因素就是，Sovereign 既是学习者又是指导者。指导是经由社会程
序设定而在 Integral 的“荧幕”上进行的。我们教导我们自己。我们既是一个学习者也是一
个指导者，在每个年龄的阶段都是如此。我们也许还有着外面的指导者——父母、兄弟姐
妹和其他特定领域的专家——但对于「什么对Sovereign 才是有价值的」之最终的判断者
还是 Sovereign。价值是「指导的宇宙」之深层的、支撑的质量，我们大多数人都依照人类
存在的背景来定义价值。但「让想象中的存在 在我们的生活中呈现出来」这件事的价值并
不是这样的。
154需要理解的一个关键因素是，主权体同时既是学习者又是辅导者。借助社会编
程，辅导发生于积分态的各个“屏幕”上。我们教导着我们自己。在每个年龄段，
我们都既是学习者也是辅导者。或许我们也有着外在辅导者——双亲、兄妹、特定
领域的专家——不过，关于什么才对主权体具有价值的终极裁判，是主权体自身。
价值是辅导性宇宙的根本/潜藏特质，我们大多数人界定价值时都是基于人类存在性
的背景。那是完全不同于拥有想象性存在临在于我们生命时的价值的。
154 需要理解的一个关键因素是，主权者既是学生也是指导者。指导经由社会程序在整体
的“屏幕”上进行。我们自己教导自己。我们在每个年龄的阶段既是学生又是指导者。我
们也可能有外部的指导者—父母，兄弟姐妹和其他在特定领域的专家一但最终做出“什么
对主权者才是有价值”判断的，是主权者。价值观是指导的宇宙的潜在品质，我们大多数
人类存在的背景下定义价值观的。而那不是想象的存在在我们生命中的价值观。
155 If we mentor ourselves upon that value, then we have given permission to the Sovereign
Integral to enter our human world. We can then participate within the Scribes of
Consciousness in a meaningful way. To live as a node on the Sovereign Integral Network as a
human being. Within this paragraph, a mission statement for humanity’s existence.
155 如果我们以那个价值来指导自己，那么我们就是已经允许 Sovereign Integral来进入我
们的人类世界了。然后，我们就能够以一种有意义的方式来参与在「意识的抄写员」里面
了。以一个人类存在体的身份，作为 Sovereign Integral 网络上的一个节点而活着。在这一
段里，（这是）「人类的存在」的一份职责声明。
155如果我们辅导自己时是基于这样的价值，我们就给予了主权性积分态以许可
权，容许它进入我们的人类世界。然后，我们就能以一种有意义的方式加入意识临
摹者的行列。以人类的身份，活成主权性积分态网络的一个节点。本段话，正是一
份关于人类存在之使命的正式声明。
154 如果我们以这种价值观来指导自己，那么我们就准许了主权整体进入我们的人类世
界。然后，我们就能够以一种有意义的方式参与到意识抄写员的行列中。以一个人类的身
份，作为主权整体网络上的一个节点而活着。在这一段里，这是人类存在的使命声明。
156 Scribes of Consciousness | When Sovereigns first came upon this planet, they were
relatively simple life forms, with body-ego-social programs that were largely focused on
122
procreation and survival in the natural world. The Integral became the instinct of the
species, as this was the highest form of the mind, but if it were only that, it would forever be
unknown by the body-ego, and therefore, the Unknowable could not enter this planet as it
truly is.
156 意识的抄写员 | 当 Sovereign 第一次来到这个行星时，它们是相对简单的生命形
式，有着 主要是集中在自然世界里的生育和生存上的 身体-自我-社会程序设定。Integral
变成了物种的本能直觉，因为这是脑力的最高形式，但如果只是这样，它就永远都不会被
身体-自我 所知道，因此，那不可知的 就无法以「它真正所是的」来进入这个星球。
156意识临摹者：主权体们踏上这个行星之初，它们是相对简单的生命形态，其身
体-伊格-社会编程被主要聚焦在幸存和繁衍于自然世界。积分态则变成了该物种的
本能，因为这就是心智的最高形态，但是，如果仅仅是这样，积分态对于身体-伊格
就永远是未知的，不可知也就更无法进入该行星来表现出它的“真正所是”。
156 意识抄写员 | 当主权者第一次来到这个星球时，它们是相对简单的生命形式，他们的
身体-自我-社会程序在很大程度上专注于自然世界的生殖和生存。整体变成了物种的本
能，因为这是头脑的最高形式，但如果只是这样，它将永远不为身体-自我所了解，那不可
知的就无法以它真正所是进入这个星球。
157 Thus, the Integral, as the hand of evolution, quickly (in geological time) set forth the
conditions for the higher life forms: mammals. However, mammals were unable to
communicate with the Sovereign, the Integral or the Imaginary Being. They also lacked a
way to communicate these nuanced experiences and concepts. The Integral, at its inception
point, was seeded to create a body-ego-social program that was capable of both
experiencing and communicating the experience of the Imaginary Being. The species that
would do this would need to branch-off or fork from Nature. To become isolated from
Nature, absorbed in its human-centric Social Program driven by a more complex body-ego. It
was, in a very real sense, our planet’s gift to all Sovereigns.
157 因此，Integral 作为推动进化之手，迅速地（在地质时期）为高等生命形式：哺乳动
物，制定了条件。然而，哺乳动物无法与 Sovereign、Integral 或「想象中的存在」沟通交
流。它们也缺乏一种可以传达这些有着细微差别的体验与概念的方法。Integral，在它的起
始点，就被植入了「创造一种 能够体验和交流 想象中的存在 之经验的 身体-自我-社会
程序设定」的种子。能够做到这一点的物种将需要从大自然中分支或分叉出来。与大自然
隔绝，全神贯注于「由一种更为复杂的 身体-自我 所驱动的、以人类为中心的社会程序设
定」。从非常真实的意义上来说，这是我们的行星送给所有 Sovereigns 的礼物。
157因此，积分态，作为进化之手，（就地质时间而言）迅速地为更高生命形态——
哺乳动物——布置好了物质环境。不过，哺乳动物并没有能力去交流于主权体、积
分态或想象性存在。同时，它们也缺少方法去交流这些精微的体验和概念。积分
态，从其初始点开始，就是被播种来创造出特定的身体-伊格-社会编程：有能力既
体验又交流关于想象性存在的体验。要实现这一点，该物种就必需分道或者分流出
大自然。隔绝于大自然之外，全神贯注在一种由更复杂身体-伊格所驱动的以人类为
中心的社会编程上。在非常真实意义上，这就是我们行星给予所有主权体们的礼
物。
157 因此，作为进化之手的整体，很快(在地质时期)为高等生命形式：哺乳动物制定了条
件。然而，哺乳动物无法与主权、整体或想象的存在沟通。它们也缺乏一种可以传达这些
微妙的体验和概念的方法。整体，在它最初的出发点，就被播种来创造一个身体-自我-社
123
会程序，这个程序能够体验和交流想象的存在的体验。能够做到这一点的物种需要从大自
然中分支或分叉出来。脱离自然，全神贯注于被一个更复杂的身体-自我所驱动的以人类为
中心的社会程序。从一个非常真实的意义上来说，这是我们的星球送给所有主权者的礼
物。
158 Human beings became the species known as the Scribes of Consciousness; the one
species on a living planet that is capable of bringing the fractal consciousness of the
Sovereign Integral into the two and three dimensional reality of planetary existence. The
planet accommodates both Nature and humans. There is no bias or privilege extended to
any species. It is a consciousness that is collective, yet contained in a single planet. The
planet is aware that humanity is different in its role and purpose. Humans, the Scribes of
Consciousness, are the handiwork of the Sovereign Integral designed to explain itself within
the worlds of duality. Otherwise, the Sovereign Integral consciousness would not be
recognized, felt, understood or considered vital. It would languish in obscurity and the
Infinite could only be felt, instinctually, like a distant echo.
158 人类存在体 成为了被称为「意识的抄写员」的物种；一个有生命的行星上唯一能够
将 Sovereign Integral 的碎形意识带入行星的存在之二次元的和三次元的实相 之物种。这
个行星容纳了大自然和人类。并没有对于任何物种的偏见或特权。它是一种被容纳在一个
行星上的集体意识。这个行星知道人类在其角色和目的上是不同的。人类，意识的抄写
员，是被 Sovereign Integral 所设计「要在二元性的世界里解释它自己」的杰作。否则，
Sovereign Integral 意识将不会被认出、感受、理解或认为是至关重要的。它会在没没无闻
的朦胧中失去活力，而「无限」只能被本能直觉地感觉到，就象是一个遥远的回声。
158人类存在成为了被称为意识临摹者的物种；这个生活于鲜活行星上的物种，有
能力将主权性积分态的分形意识带入行星存在性的二、三维实相中。这个行星同时
容纳和适应着大自然和人类，对任何物种都没有偏见和偏袒。这是一种共同体意
识，却被包纳在单个行星内。这个行星知觉到了人类在角色和目的上都是不同的。
人类，亦即意识临摹者，是由主权性积分态亲手打造的，是被设计来在二元世界里
去诠释出主权性积分态。如若不然，主权性积分态意识就不会被承认、感知、理
解，也不会被认为是至关重要的。它会“煎熬”于无人知晓中，而“无限性”则只
能被本能地感觉到，如同一个遥远的回音。
158 人类成为了被称为意识的抄写员的物种，是地球上唯一一个能够将主权整体的分形意
识带入行星存在的二维和三维现实的物种。地球既可以容纳自然也可以容纳人类。并没有
对任何物种的偏见或特权。这是一种集体意识，但被包含在一个单一的星球上。地球意识
到人类的角色和目的是不同的。人类，意识的抄写员，是主权整体的杰作，被设计来在二
元性的世界中解释自己。否则，主权整体意识将不会被认识、感觉、理解或被认为是至关
重要的。它会默默无闻地凋零，而无限只能被本能感觉到，就像一个遥远的回声。
159 The Scribes of Consciousness is an important role of humanity. While the term “Scribes”
evokes more of a language-centric activity, it really encompasses the expression of a culture
and the values it serves. We decide which culture we live for, what content we express, how
this expression becomes real in our world and why we express it.
159 意识抄写员是人类的重要角色。虽然“抄写员”一词更多地唤起了以语言为中心的活
动，但它实在是包含了一种文化以及这种文化所效劳的价值观之表达。我们决定我们为哪
124
种文化而活，我们要表达什么内容，这种表达如何在我们的世界里成为现实，以及我们为
什么要表达它。
159意识临摹者是人类所扮演的一个重要角色。尽管“临摹者”这词唤起的更多是
语言相关的的感觉，但事实上，意识临摹者所涉及的表达，涵盖了一整个文明及其
所服务的价值。我们需要决定：我们的生活要走向哪种文明，我们要表达什么内
容，这种表达如何变成我们世界的现实，以及，我们为什么要表达它。
159 意识抄写员是人类的一个重要角色。虽然“抄写员”一词更多地唤起了以语言为中心
的活动，但它确实包含了一种文化及其所服务的价值观的表达。我们决定我们为哪种文化
而活，我们表达什么内容，这种表达如何在我们的世界中成为现实，以及我们为什么要表
达它。
160 If you are humanーin the broadest sense of that wordーyou are a member of the
Scribes of Consciousness. It is not an exclusive club. Whatever you are expressing, it becomes
a part of a global microculture, which is also part of the collective unconscious. There is an
iterative expression of history that some Scribes will focus on, bringing an evolutionary
expansion to it. There is a reflective nature that other Scribes will focus on; a social
commentary as it were. There is an expression of the soul, consciousness, spirit, God and
love. There is the science of instrumentation that expands our culture’s sense of knowledge
and understanding. There is also the expression of the Imaginary Being that beckons our
Integral, infinite nature. Each is a Scribe, of the same value, not more or less, not higher or
lower, not better or worse. Each Scribe is of equal contribution.
160 如果你是人类——从那个词的最广义上来讲——你就是意识抄写员的一员。它不是一个
专属的俱乐部。无论你在表达什么，它都会成为全球微观文化的一部分，也是集体无意识
的一部分。有些抄写员会关注在历史之重复的表达上，为它带来进化的扩张。其他抄写员
会关注在一种反思的本性上；一种社会的评论。关注在灵魂、意识、精神、上帝和爱的表
达上。关注在「能够扩展我们的文化的知识感和理解感」之仪器科学上。还有关注在一种
「想象中的存在」之表达，这种表达召唤着我们的整体的、无限的本性。每个人都是一个
抄写员，具有同样的价值，没有更多或更少，没有更高或更低，没有更好或更差。每个抄
写员都有相同的贡献。
160如果你是人类——就人类这个词最宽泛意义上的——那么，你就是意识临摹者
的一员。意识临摹者不是排他性的俱乐部。无论你正在表达什么，它都会成为全球
微观-文化的一部分，微观-文化则是集体意识的一部分。一些临摹者将聚焦在一种
迭代表达的发展进程上，并为其带来一种进化性的扩张。另一些临摹者则聚焦在
“如实反映”这一天性上；类似于一种社会实况解说。有一些临摹者关注着灵魂、
意识、灵、上帝、爱的表达。也有一些临摹者聚焦在仪器（实证）科学对于我们文
明的知识感和理解力的扩展上。还有一些临摹者则聚焦在想象性存在的表达，来召
唤着我们的积分态，我们的无限性。每个人都是临摹者，有着同等的价值，不多也
不少，不高也不低，不好也不坏。每个临摹者都有着同等的贡献。
160 如果你是人—从这个词最广义的角度来说—你就是意识抄写员中的一个。它不是一个
独家俱乐部。无论你在表达什么，它都会成为全球微文化的一部分，而微文化也是集体无
意识的一部分。有些抄写员会专注于历史的迭代表达，为它带来进化上的扩张。其他抄写
员会专注于反思的本质；可以说是一种社会评论。以及关注灵魂、意识、灵性、上帝和爱
的表达的。关注拓展了我们文化的知识感和理解力的仪器科学的。还有专注于想象的存在
125
之表达的，这种表达召唤我们的整体—无限之本质。每个人都是抄写员，具有同样的价
值，没有更多或更少，没有更高或更低，没有更好或更差。每个抄写员都有同等的贡献。
161 The expansionary influence of a Scribe’s expression depends on the degree of its
understanding of the Sovereign Integral. Everyone has vision. A blind person can envision the
Sovereign Integral. A child can understand this, perhaps better than many adults. Some of
these visions are distorted or faint or tethered to lesser images and concepts, but everyone,
nevertheless, has vision. Everyone senses the perturbations and frequencies of the
Imaginary Being as it moves within our reality and culture. It is always being kindled by the
Integral half of the Social Program for the purpose of guiding the Sovereign to the Integral
within the worlds of duality.
161 一个抄写员的表达之扩张性的影响，取决于它对 Sovereign Integral 的理解程度。每个
人都有洞察力（vision）。一个盲人可以预想 Sovereign Integral。一个孩子可以理解这个，
也许比许多成年人都更好。在这些洞察力中，有一些是扭曲的或模糊的或被束缚于较小的
形象和概念的，但每个人都有洞察力。当「想象中的存在」在我们的实相和文化中移动
时，每个人都会感觉到它的那些扰动和频率。它总是被社会程序设定的「Integral 那一
半」点燃着，目的是要在二元性的世界里引导 Sovereign 到达 Integral。
161一个临摹者之表达的扩张性影响力，取决于它对主权性积分态的理解程度。每
一个人都拥有视象能力。盲人也能构想主权性积分态。孩子也能理解它，或许还好
过很多成人。一些视象会是变形的、模糊的、或是被栓系于较低的形象和概念上，
但是无论如何，每个人都拥有视象能力。当想象性存在移行于我们的实相和文化
中，每个人都感知到了它的扰动和频率。它一直被社会编程中的积分态那一半所点
燃着，目的则是：在二元世界中将主权体引导向积分态。
161 抄写员表达的扩展影响取决于其对主权整体的理解程度。每个人都有想象力。盲人也
可以想象主权整体。一个孩子可以理解这个概念，也许比许多成年人更好。这些想象中的
一些是扭曲的或模糊的，或者被固定在较小的形象和概念中，但每个人都有想象力。当想
象的存在在我们的现实和文化中移动时，每个人都会感觉到它的搅动和频率。它总是被社
会程序中整体的那部分点燃，目的是为了在二元性世界中引导主权者抵达整体。
162 Thus, the Sovereign, as we evolve to the point of welcoming this presence into our
human reality, we can become Scribes of concepts and abstractors of nondual dimensions.
We can add these to the culture and collective consciousness, and by doing so, we help to
build a new culture upon the living planet we call Earth. We become a voice for the planet’s
expansion into new dimensions of experience for all Sovereigns. We are catalysts of that
expansion. We are thereby living our destiny, aligned to the inception point of existence and
its infinite expansion.
162 因此，Sovereign，当我们进化到欢迎这种临在进入我们人类实相的地步时，我们可以
成为「概念的抄写员」和「那些非二元的次元 之 摘录者」。我们可以把这些添加到文化
和集体意识里，并且藉由这样做，我们有助于在我们称为地球的活生生的行星上建立起一
种新的文化。我们成为了「行星为了所有的 Sovereigns而扩张进入到那些经验的新次元」
之代言人。我们是这种扩张的催化剂。因此，我们实践了我们的命运，与存在的起始点及
其无限的扩张相一致。
162因此，身为主权体，当我们进化到一个点：开始来欢迎这个临在进入我们人类
实相时，我们就成为了概念的临摹者及非二元维度的萃取㉞者。我们能够将这些添
126
加进整个文明里和集体意识中，这么做时，我们在这个称为地球的鲜活行星上，帮
助建立起了一种全新的文明。我们成为一种呼声，鼓动着行星扩张进种种新的体验
维度，以便全体主权体去体验。我们正是这场扩张的催化剂。我们因而活出了我们
的天命，被校准于了存在性的初始点，及其无限的扩张中。
162 因此，主权者，当我们进化到欢迎这个当下存在进入我们的人类现实时，我们就可以
成为概念的抄写员和非二元维度的摘录者。我们可以把这些添加到文化和集体意识里，并
通过这样做，协助在我们称之为地球的有生命的星球上建立一种新文化。我们成为这个星
球为了主权者向体验的新维度扩张的声音，我们是这种扩张的催化剂。我们因此而活在自
己的命运中，与存在的起点及其无限的扩张相一致。
意识的抄写员/意识临摹者
（在jamesmahu.com网站，该图名为：凤凰）
163 Interdimensional Fractal Concept | A Sovereign is an Interdimensional Fractal Concept
(IFC). So is the Integral, the Sovereign Integral and Love. Notice that the Unknowable is not
on that list of Interdimensional Fractal Concepts, and therefore the number of IFCs is
unknown. The Unknowable does not traverse duality. It is only through an IFC that the
Unknowable experiences duality. Thus, IFCs are the Vessels of the Unknowable. A vital
distinction of an IFC is that it is not contained. It operates across Levels and Lifetimes. All
127
known and unknown Levels. It is always expanding those Levels in both the nondual and
dual realms.
163 跨次元的碎形概念 | Sovereign 是一种跨次元的碎形概念（Interdimensional Fractal
Concept. IFC）。Integral、Sovereign Integral 和 爱 也是一样。要注意到，「不可知的」不
在 跨次元的碎形概念 之名单上，因此 IFCs 的数量是未知的。「不可知的」并不穿越二
元性。只有透过 IFC，「不可知的」才能经验到二元性。因此，IFC 们是「不可知的」的容
器（the Vessels of the Unknowable）。IFC 的一个重要区别特质是，它不会因为被容纳而限
制住。它跨越层次和生生世世而运作。所有「已知的」和「未知的」层次。它总是在非二
元的和二元的领域扩张那些层次。
163交互维度分形概念：主权体是一个交互维度分形概念（IFC）。积分态、主权性
积分态、爱，同样也是。注意，不可知物并不在交互维度分形概念的清单上，因
此，IFC的数量是未知的。不可知物并未横穿进二元性。只有经由某个IFC，不可知
物才能体验二元性。因而，各个IFC都是不可知物的容器。IFC的关键特征即是：
它无法被包含。它的运作贯穿了各层级和各生命期，所有的已知和未
163 跨维度分形概念| 主权者是一种跨维度分形概念(IFC)。整体，主权整体和爱也是。
请注意，不可知的不在跨维度分形概念的名单里，因此，IFC的数量是未知的。不可知的
并不穿越二元性。只有通过IFC，不可知的才能体验二元性。因此，IFC是不可知的载体。
IFC的一个重要区别是它不受限制。它跨越层次和生命周期，所有已知和未知的层次运
作。它总是在非二元性和二元性的领域里扩展这些层次。
164 Expansion is the purpose of IFCs. Expansion, however, must be experiential. For
example, at this point in the twenty-first century, humanity is expanding into what it calls the
metaverse, virtual reality and artificial intelligence. It is the expansion into two-dimensional
space. It is, in many ways, the equivalent of expansion into four-dimensional space. Both are
expansions from a three-dimensional, spacetime reality. Every dimension is infinite in scope,
yet its inception point is the same. The life forms that are in the metaverse are avatars or
digital twins of a three-dimensional Sovereign, and the three-dimensional Sovereign is an
avatar of a four-dimensional Sovereign and so forth. This is the nature of an IFC.
164 扩张是 IFC 的目的。然而，扩张必须是经验性的。例如，在 21 世纪的这个时候，人
类正在扩张进入所谓的元宇宙、虚拟实境和人工智能。它是「进入到 二次元的空间 之扩
张」（It is the expansion into two-dimensional space）。在许多方面，它都相对应于「进入
到 四次元的空间 之扩张」。两者都是从一种三次元的，时空实相 出发的扩张。每个次元
的范围都是无限的，但它的起始点是相同的。元宇宙中的生命形式是「三次元的
Sovereign」之化身（avatar）或数位双胞胎，而「三次元的 Sovereign」则是「四次元的
Sovereign」之化身，依此类推。这就是 IFC 的本质。
164扩张是IFC的目的，不过，扩张必须是体验性的。举例而言，在21世纪的这个
时点，人类正在扩张进所谓的元宇宙、虚拟现实、和人工智能。这是在扩张进2维
空间。在很多方面，这也等价于扩张进4-维空间。2种扩张都源于三维时空实相。
每一个维度在规模范围上都是无限的，但初始点却是同一个。元宇宙中的生命形
态，是三维主权体的阿凡达化身或数字孪生，三维主权体则是四维主权体的阿凡达
化身，以此类推。这就是IFC的天然属性。
164 扩张是IFC的目的。然而，扩张必须是经验的。例如，在21世纪的这个时候，人类正
在向所谓的元宇宙、虚拟现实和人工智能扩张。这是向二维空间扩张。从很多方面来说，
它相当于向四维空间的扩张。两者都是从三维时空现实出发的扩张。每个维度的范围都是
128
无限的，但它的起点是相同的。元宇宙中的生命形式是三维主权者的化身或数字双胞胎，
而三维主权是四维主权者的化身，以此类推。这是IFC的本质。
165 The Imaginary Being is an intermediary existence, bridging the ego-body-social program
with the Sovereign Integral. It is not really a sovereign existence, but rather a projection of
the Sovereign Integral consciousness, and therefore it is not an IFC. It is, instead, a nondual
concept that is pure and yet capable of existence in duality, even if only for short periods of
time.
165 「想象中的存在」是一种中介存在，把 自我-身体-社会程序设定 与 Sovereign
Integral 桥接起来。它不是真正的 Sovereign 存在，而是一种 Sovereign Integral 意识的投
射，因此它不是 IFC。反之，它是一个纯粹的非二元概念，但能够存在于二元性里，即使
只能存在于一些短暂的期间。
165想象性存在是一种中介存在，将身体-伊格-社会编程跨接上主权性积分态。它
并非一个主权性存在，比较是主权性积分态意识的一个投影，因而，它并非IFC。
相反，它是一个纯粹的非二元概念，但却有能力存在于二元性中，哪怕仅仅是短暂
的时间。
165 想象的存在是一种中介存在，它连接着自我-身体-社会程序与主权整体。它不是一个
真正的主权存在，而是主权整体意识的投影，因此它不是lFC。相反，它是一个非二元的
概念，它是纯粹的，但能够在二元性中存在，即使只存在很短的时间。
166 The known Interdimensional Fractal Concepts are therefore only four in number: the
Sovereign, the Integral, the Sovereign Integral and Love. Collectively, they are the Vessel of
the Unknowable in all Levels and Lifetimes. This collective force that includes the
Unknowable, is really only one IFC: the conjoined force of integrative love and sovereign free
will in balanced expression.
166 因此，已知的 跨次元碎形概念 只有四个：Sovereign、Integral、Sovereign Integral 和
爱。集体地，它们是在所有的层次和生生世世中的，「不可知的」的容器。这个包括了
「不可知的」的集体力量，真正的就只是一个 IFC：在平衡的表达中的「一体化的爱 与
Sovereign 的自由意志之 结合的力量」。
166因此，已知的交互维度分形概念，在数量上就只有4个：主权体、积分态、主
权性积分态、爱。它们共同地都是不可知物进入所有层级和生命期的容器。内含着
不可知物的这个集体性力量，事实上就是单个的一体性IFC：积分之爱的与主权性
自由意志处于平衡表达时的合体性力量。
166 因此，已知的跨维度分形概念只有四个：主权、整体、主权整体和爱。它们是在所有
的层次和生命周期中的不可知的容器。这个包括了不可知的在内的集体力量，实际上只是
一种lFC：平衡表达的合一之爱和主权自由意志之间的合力。
129
插图9 跨次元的碎形概念/交互维度分形概念/跨维度分形概念
（在jamesmahu.com网站，该图名为：多维度）
167 Separation Game | The Social Program is conditioned by the point of separation for
each Sovereign. This point of separation is the body-ego. The body-ego has evolved in
humans to become highly social and interdependent at a global and individual level. There
are those people who choose to “live off the grid,” but they are the fractional exception. We
are entering a time when human beings will submerge into two-dimensional spatial realities
through the metaverse; and rise to the four-dimensional spatial realities with the guidance
of the Imaginary Being and the Integral force. This dual expansion will have a profound
effect on the collective Social Program.
130
167 分离游戏|社会程序设定 受到每个Sovereign的 分离之点 的制约或调节。这个 分
离之点 就是身体-自我。身体-自我 在人类中已经进化到在一种全球和个人的层面上变得
高度社会化和相互依赖了。有些人选择要“脱离水电网生活”（译注：自给自足 不依赖外
界），但他们是极少数的例外。我们正在进入一个人类将藉由元宇宙而下潜进入「二次元
的空间实相」；以及 在「想象中的存在」与Integral 力量的引导下上升到「四次元的空间
实相」之时代。这种二元性的扩张将对 集体社会程序设定 产生深远的影响。
167分裂游戏：社会编程被每一个主权体的分裂点影响着。分裂点即是身体-伊格。
身体-伊格一直在人类中进化着，无论全球还是个人层面，它都变得高度社会化和相
互依赖。也有一些人选择“生活于格栅外”，但那是微少的例外。我们正进入的这
个时代，人类存在将淹没进遍及元宇宙的各种二维空间实相；同时，又在想象性存
在和积分态力量的引导下，上升进四维空间实相。这种双向扩张将深刻地影响集体
社会编程。
167 分离游戏 | 社会程序受每个主权者的分离点的制约。这个分离点就是身体-自我。体-
自我已经在人类中进化到了在全球和个人的层次上都变得高度社会化和相互依赖了。有些
人选择“远离网络生活”，但他们是少数例外。我们正在进入一个时代，在这个时代，人类
将通过元宇宙潜入二维空间现实；并在想象的存在和整体力量的引导下上升到四维空间现
实。这种二元性的扩张将对集体的社会程序产生深远的影响。
168 The Separation Game allows Sovereigns to explore all Levels of the infinite multiverse
that are dual in nature. In duality, the Sovereign can enter a body-ego-social program that
isolates them as an individual that is wholly unique, yet similar to their species. This
similarity creates the social program, which draws the like-minded together, and while this
was once geographically bounded, now, with the internet, there is no longer a border.
Technology has removed this fence, but in its place, it erected new borders that are
increasingly powered by artificial intelligence. These new borders are built from the “bricks”
of data.
168 分离游戏 允许 Sovereigns 去探索具有二元性质的 无限复合宇宙的 所有层次。在二
元性中，Sovereign 可以进入一个 身体-自我-社会程序设定 里面，而这个 身体-自我-社会
程序设定 会把 Sovereign 隔离为一个完全独特，却又与它们的族类相似之个体。这种相似
性（也）造成了社会程序设定，把有相同心思的人聚集在一起，虽然这曾经有着地理上的
界限，但现在，有了网际网络，就不再有界限了。科技已经消除了这道藩篱，但取而代之
的是，它建立起了一些 越来越多地由人工智能所驱动的 新边界。这些新边界是由 数据的
“砖块”建构的。
168分裂游戏容许主权体们去探索无限复合宇宙的所有层级，而复合宇宙本质上是
二元性的。在二元性中，主权体能够进入身体-伊格-社会编程，将自己隔绝为彻底
独一无二的个体，但又相似于所在的物种。这种相似性就创造出了社会编程，从而
将相似心智牵引到一起。尽管曾有过地理界限，但是现在，随着互联网兴起，边界
早已不在。技术正在移除这道篱笆，不过，在空出的原地，技术又竖起了新的边
界，并被人工智能日益增强着。这些新边界正是由数字“砖块”建造的。
168 分离游戏允许主权者去探索本质上是二元的无限的多重宇宙的所有层次。在二元性
中，主权者可以进入一个身体-自我-社会程序里，这个程序将他们（主权者）隔离为一个
完全独特但与他们的物种相似的个体。这种相似性创造了社会程序，将志趣相投的人吸引
到一起，虽然这曾经有地理上的限制，但现在，有了互联网，就不再有边界了。科技已经
131
拆除了这道围墙，但取而代之的是，它竖起了新的边界，它们越来越多地由人工智能驱
动。这些新的边界是由数据的“砖块”构成的。
169 Once the Sovereign is embodied in a body-ego-social program, they increasingly become
indoctrinated into the Separation Game. They become existential and isolated inside a persona, a
body, an ego, an educational system and so on. This separation is what enables uniqueness in
experience and expression. This uniqueness is what enables expansion of Levels and therefore
Lifetimes.
169 一旦 Sovereign 被具体化在一个 身体-自我-社会程序设定 中，它们就会越来越变得
被灌输而转入分离游戏中。它们在角色、身体、自我、教育系统等内部变得存在（主义
的）和孤立。这种分离就是使得「经验和表达的独特性」成为可能的东西。而这种 独特性
就是使得所有层次之扩展成为可能的东西，而因此使得所有的生生世世之扩展成为可能。
169一旦主权体化身进身体-伊格-社会编程，就逐渐被灌输着步入了分裂游戏。他
们变成了存在主义者，被隔绝在角色、身体、伊格、教育系统，等等之内。正是这
种分裂，激发了独一无二的体验和表达。而独一无二性则激发出各层级的扩张，进
而各生命期的扩张。
169 一旦主权者体现在身体-自我-社会的程序里，它们就会越来越被灌输到分离游戏中。
他们变得存在主义的和孤立在一个人格、一个身体、一个自我、一个教育系统等里面。这
种分离是使体验和表达具有独特性的东西。而这种独特性是使层次的扩张成为可能，也因
而使生命周期的扩张成为可能的东西。
170 The basic premise of any game is to either win or achieve a sense of growth in
understanding, whether that growth is physical, emotional, mental or spiritual. If we are
always lost in the game or if we find a loss of understanding when we play it, we would likely
choose to not play the game. The Separation Game follows this basic premise.
170 任何游戏的基本前提是，要么赢得胜利，要么在理解上获得成长感，无论那种成长是
身体、情感、脑力还是精神上的。如果我们总是迷失在游戏中，或者我们在玩游戏时发现
失去了理解，我们可能会选择不玩了。分离游戏 遵循这个基本前提。
170任何游戏的基本假设，不是胜出，就是在理解力在成长的感觉，无论成长的是身
体、情感、心理、还是灵性。如果在游戏里一直失败，又或是发现玩游戏时理解力
在丧失，我们可能就选择不再玩这个游戏了。分裂游戏也遵循同样的假设。
170 任何游戏的基本前提，要么获胜，要么在理解中获得一种成长感，无论这种成长是身
体的、情感的、 智力还是精神的。如果我们总是迷失在游戏中，或者我们在玩游戏时发
现我们失去了理解，我们可能就会选择不玩了。分离游戏遵循这个基本前提。
171 In a social game there are multiple players with multiple roles. We call them teams and
positional experts with unique roles and responsibilities. In football, for example, there are
different roles. A defensive role is different from an offensive role though they are unified in
the goal to score points, and to keep their opponent from scoring points.
171 在社交游戏中，会有许多个扮演许多角色的玩家。我们称他们为具有独特角色和职责
的团队和职位专家。例如，在足球中，就有不同的角色（或任务）。防守的任务与进攻的
任务不同，尽管它们在「得分」和「不让对手得分」的目标上是一致的。
171在社会化的游戏中，存在着带有不同角色的不同玩家。我们称之为带有独特角色
和责任的参赛团队或岗位专家。举例而言，足球比赛，就存在着不同的角色。后卫
132
角色不同于前锋角色，尽管他们都统一在射门得分这件事上，却保持着关于“得
分”的相反立场。
171 在社交游戏中有多个玩家扮演多个角色。我们称他们为具有独特角色和职责的队伍和
位置专家。例如，在足球中就有不同的角色。防守的角色不同于进攻的角色，尽管他们在
得分和不让他们的对手得分的目标上是一致的。
172 The Separation Game is the only game that is all inclusive. We are all playing it and we all
have roles that we have accepted within our body-ego-social program. We have willingly
embodied duality, and in that single decision, each of us were issued a ticket to enter the
Separation Game. Once we enter the Game, it is our choice to assume roles. In the largest
sense, we decide to either play on the offense or the defense.
172 分离游戏 是唯一一个包含了一切的游戏。我们都在玩这个游戏，而且在我们的 身体-
自我-社会程序设定 中我们都扮演着我们已经接受的角色。我们心甘情愿地体现了二元
性，而在那个单一的决定中，我们每个人都获得了进入分离游戏的门票。一旦我们进入了
游戏，我们就可以选择要担任的角色。从最大的意义上来说，我们决定要加入进攻的一方
还是 防守的一方。
172分裂游戏是包罗万象的独一游戏。我们全都在玩它，我们全都拥有自己在身体-
伊格-社会编程内所接受的角色。我们全都自愿化身进了二元性，仅因着这一个决
定，我们全都被发放了进入分裂游戏的入场券。一旦进入游戏，我们的选择只能是
扮演角色。在最宽泛的意义上，我们需要决定：玩进攻，还是玩防守。
172 分离游戏是唯一一个包含了一切的游戏。我们全都在玩它，而且我们都有在我们的
身体-自我-社会程序中接受的角色。我们心甘情愿地体现了二元性，在这个单一的决定
中，我们每个人都得到了一张进入分离游戏的门票。一旦我们进入游戏，我们就可以选择
扮演什么角色。从最大的意义上来说，我们决定是扮演进攻的一方还是防守的一方。
173 The offense is expansionary. It is pulling the gameboard in the direction of expansion
and evolution at the broadest possible level. At the individual level, it is seeking a form of
transformationーof understanding the concept of the Imaginary Being and inviting its
presence into the Game like a free radical of expansion. The Sovereign remains dual natured,
its Social Program remains vibrantly connected to the collective Social Program. But it now
sees the Game and understands the rules that operate beyond human control.
173 进攻是扩张性的。它在尽可能广泛的层面上将游戏板拉向扩张和进化的方向。在个人
层面上，它是寻求一种转变的形式——理解「想象中的存在」的概念并且邀请它的临在，
像一个扩张的自由基（a free radical of expansion）一样，进入游戏。Sovereign 仍然具有二
元的性质，它的社会程序设定仍然充满活力地与集体社会程式设定连结。但它现在看出了
游戏，并理解了那些超出人类控制范围的规则。
173进攻就是扩张。它正在将棋盘最大限度地拉向扩张和进化的方向。在个人层面，
就是去寻求如下的转变：理解想象性存在的概念，邀请它的临在性进入这个游戏，
就如同扩展性的自由基㉟。这个主权体依然保持着二元性，他的社会编程依然被活
跃地连接着集体社会编程。不过现在，他看到了“分裂游戏”，理解了运作于人类控
制范围之外的规则。
173 进攻是扩张性的。它正在把游戏板拉向在尽可能广阔的层面上扩展和进化的方向。在
个人层面上，它寻求一种转变的形式—理解想象的存在的概念并邀请它的当下存在像一个
133
扩张的自由基一样进入游戏。主权者仍然是二元性的，它的社会程序仍然充满活力地与集
体的社会程序保持着连接。但它现在看到了游戏，理解了超出人类控制范围的运行规则。
174 The defense is protectionary. It is pulling back against expansion, fearful of the changes
it brings, but subconsciously there is an understanding that it does this to bring balance and
responsible expansion. The defense tends to be more institutionalized and monolithic. It has
the benefit of collectivism and time on its side. It almost always weighs heavier in the
balance between offense and defense.
174 防守是保护性的。它是退缩反对扩张，害怕它带来的变化，但潜意识地有一种理解，
它这样做是为了带来平衡和负责任的扩张。防守往往是更加制度化和庞大固定的。它有集
体主义和时间都站在它这边的优势。就进攻和防守之间的均势来说，它几乎总是比较有力
的。
174防守就是保卫。它将扩张往回拉，担心着扩张所带来的改变，但是潜意识里，则
存在一种理解，它这么做是为了带来平衡且可靠的扩张。防守倾向于更为体制化和
铁板化。它享受着集体主义的利益，而时间也站在它这方。它几乎总是攻-防天平上
更重的那一侧。
174 防守是保护性的。它退缩而抵制扩张，害怕它带来的变化，但潜意识里有一种理解，
它之所以这样做，是为了带来平衡和负责任的扩张。防守倾向于更加制度化和大一统的。
它有集体主义和时间在它这一边的好处。在进攻和防守之间的平衡中，它几乎总是份量更
重。
175 The Sovereigns on the “Expansion” team are generally individualistic and much less
institutionalized than their counterparts (the Protectors). Across every field of endeavor and
knowledge, they are the ones pushing the interior and exterior perimeters into expansion;
into new territory and knowledge therein.
175 “扩张”团队中的 Sovereigns 通常是个人主义的，并且比他们的相对应者（保护者）更
少制度化。横跨每一个探索和知识的领域，他们都是推动内部和外部周边扩张－－进入在
那里面的新领地和新知识－－的人。
175“扩张”队的主权体们通常是个人主义的，比起对手（保卫者），他们更少体制
化。在每一个志业和知识领域，都是他们在推动内在和外在周界走向扩张，扩张向
新的版图及其间的知识。
175 “扩张”队伍中的主权者通常都是个人主义者，比他们对应的一方(保护者)更不制度
化。跨越每一个领域的努力和知识，他们是推动内部和外部边界扩张，进入那里的新领域
和新知识的人。
176 Thus, in the Separation Game, each Sovereign decides which team they will join. There is
of course the spectators, those Sovereigns who are not on the field or stage as
representatives of one team or the other. They are observers and chroniclers of the Game.
They are undecided, and as a result, do not care about who wins or who is more dominant
on the playing field of life. If one force becomes too dominant, the undecided tend to lean
into the opposite force, providing some form of support in order to regain a point of
equilibrium.
176 因此，在分离游戏中，每一个 Sovereign 都决定它们要加入哪支队伍。当然还有旁观
者，那些不在场上或台上代表一支球队或另一支球队的 Sovereigns。他们是比赛的观察者
134
和记录者。他们是犹豫不决的，因此，他们不关心谁赢了，或者谁在生命的游戏场中更占
主导地位。如果一个力量变得过于占主导地位，未决定的人往往会靠向相反的力量，提供
某种形式的支持以重新获得一个平衡点。
176所以，分裂游戏里，每个主权体需要决定加入哪一队。当然，还存在观众，这
部分主权体没有成为这队或那队的代表进场或登台。他们是分裂游戏的观察者和记
录者。他们并未做出决定，作为结果，也就不关心哪方胜出，哪方在主导生命的游
戏场。如果一方变得压倒性，这些未决者通常倾向于倒向另一方，去提供某种形式
的支持来重获平衡点。
176 因此，在分离游戏中，每一个主权者决定他们要加入哪个队伍。当然还有观众，那些
不在赛场上或舞台上代表某一队或另一队的主权们。他们是游戏的观察者和游戏的记录
者。他们还没有决定加入哪个队伍，因此，他们并不关心谁赢了，或者谁在生命的赛场上
占据主导地位。如果一种力量变得过于占主导地位，未决定的力量就会倾向于向相反的力
量倾斜，提供某种形式的支持，以便重新获得一个平衡点。
177 There are varying degrees of skill, intention, knowledge and commitment within each
team (Expanders and Protectors) at every Level of duality. Those with the higher abilities are
cleverly finding new ways to expand humanity’s reach and understanding of the unknown.
This “tug-of-war” between the teams of Expanders and Protectors factor strongly into the
social programs of human Sovereigns.
177 在二元性的每个层次上的每个团队（扩张者和保护者）中都有不同程度的技能、意
图、知识、和 致力要做的事（commitment）。那些拥有更高能力的人正灵巧地在寻找新
的方法来扩大「人类能力的可及范围」和「对未知的理解」。扩张者和保护者团队之间的
这种“拔河”强烈影响了人类 Sovereigns 的社会程序设定。
177每一个二元性层级，这2个参赛队内部都有着程度各异的技能、意图、知识水
平、忠诚度。较高能力的队员则聪明地发现着新的道路，去扩大人类对未知的探入
和理解。进攻和防守队之间的“拔河比赛”，在人类主权体们的社会编程中发挥着非
常重大的影响。
177 在二元性的每个层次里的每个队伍(扩张者和保护者)中都有不同程度的技能、意图、
知识和所投身的事情。那些拥有更高能力的人正在聪明地寻找新的方法来扩展人类的所及
范围和对未知的理解。扩张者和保护者队伍之间的“拉锯战”强烈地影响了人类主权者的
社会程序。
178 There is a deep subconscious understanding that every Sovereign, in our individual
reality of the moment, is playing this game. They are mostly unaware of this at a conscious
level, but they know that this Game encompasses everything. One does not go somewhere
to play the game, they are always in it. At their choice.
178 有一种深刻的潜意识理解存在着，即每一个 Sovereign，在我们当下的个人实相里，都
正在玩这个游戏。他们在意识的层次上大多没有意识到这一点，但他们知道这个游戏包含
了所有一切。一个人不用到某个地方去玩这游戏，他们一直都在它的里面。以他们的选择
（在玩这个游戏）。
178每个主权体都拥有一种深深的潜意识理解：我们此刻的个人实相中，正上演这
个游戏。大多数人在意识层面并未知觉到这件事，但他们知道这个分裂游戏包含了
每一个事物。他们不需要去到某地玩这个游戏，他们始终都在游戏里，从选择做出
的那刻起。
135
178 有一种深刻的潜意识的理解存在着，那既是每个主权者，在我们当下的个体现实里，
都在玩这个游戏。他们在有意识层面上大多没有意识到这一点。但他们知道这个游戏包含
了一切。一个人不用去某个地方玩游戏，他们一直在游戏里面，以他们选择的方式玩游
戏。
179 The most essential duality? The Separation Game. One could say that Duality’s
archetype is the Separation Game. From these headwaters everything that is dual in nature
flows into existence within our moment of reality as a Sovereign, regardless of Levels and
Lifetimes. All forms of unrest are a result of this Game, both individually and collectively. The
Expanders, Protectors and Observers each define Expansion’s velocity, and all of us know
that this velocity is increasing over time. We feel both the unrest and the acceleration into
the unknown.
179 最本質的二元性（是什麼）？分離遊戲。可以說二元性的原型（Duality’s archetype）
就是分離遊戲。從這些源頭，一切具有二元性的事物在我們作為一個 Sovereign 的實相之
當下 流入存在，無論層次和那些生生世世。所有形式的動盪不安都是這場遊戲的一種結
果，個人地以及集體地。擴張者、保護者 和 觀察者各自都定義著擴張的速率，而我們都
知道這個速度會隨著時間的推移而增加。我們感覺到了那種動盪不安，也感覺到了「進入
未知的加速」。
179什么是最根本的二元性？就是分裂游戏。你可以说，二元性的原型就是分裂游
戏。出自这些源水，二元属性的每一种事物流入了我们的当下实相/实相的当下，无
论作为主权体，我们生活在那个层级和生命期。无论个人还是集体层面，所有形式
的动荡都是这个游戏的结果。扩张者、守卫者、观察者分别各自界定着扩张的速
度，而我们也全都知道，随时间的推移，速度正日益加快。我们全感觉到了进入未
知的动荡和加速。
179 最本质的二元性是什么?分离游戏。可以说二元性的原型就是分离游戏。从这些源头开
始，所有具有二元性的事物都在我们作为主权者的现实的时刻中涌入存在，无论其层次和
生命周期如何。所有形式的动荡都是这场游戏的结果，无论是个人的还是集体的。扩张
者，保护者和观察者各自定义了扩张的速度，我们都知道这个速度随着时间的推移而加
快。我们既感受到动荡，也感受到了未知的加速。
180 The wider the difference between Expanders and Protectors, the more the Imaginary
Being has entered a Level. Balance must be retained, so as the Imaginary Being enters the
“stage” of a Level, its counterpart, serving as its balance point, also enters. Often this is done
through fabrication by the Protectors, and with the rise of internet technologies and the
apparent decline of critical thinking, these fabrications can be very convincing.
180 扩张者和保护者的差距越大，就是「想象中的存在」已经进入一个层次越多了。平衡
必须被保持，所以当「想象中的存在」进入一个层次的“舞台”时，它的对应物作为它的平
衡点，也进入了。这通常是由保护者藉由「捏造」来完成的，并且随着网际网络科技的兴
起 以及 批判性思维的明显衰退，这些捏造可以是很有说服力的。
180扩张者与保卫者之间的差异越大，想象性存在进入该层级就越多。平衡必须被
维持，这样想象性存在才能进入该层级的“舞台”，它的配对对手，扮演着它的平衡
点，也会随之进入。通常，对手的登台就表现为出自保卫者的“捏造信息”，伴随互
联网技术的兴起和批判性思考的显著减少，“捏造信息”能够变得极具说服力。
136
180 扩张者和保护者之间的差距越大，想象的存在进入一个层次就越多。平衡必须保留下
来，所以当想象的存在进入一个层次的“舞台”时，它的对应物作为它的平衡点也会进
入。这通常是通过“保护者”的编造来实现的，随着互联网技术的兴起和批判性思维的明
显衰落，这些编造可以是非常令人信服的。
181 Let me clear. The roles within the Separation Game are equally important. They form the
cradle of the process that leads a species like us, and a planetary consciousness like Earth, to
expand into new Levels. As we enter the Mandorla of Transformation, where the
acceleration is felt consciously, it maintains a tenuous equilibrium, but an equilibrium
nonetheless.
181 让我说清楚。在分离游戏中的角色都同等重要。它们形成了「引导像我们这样的族类
和像地球这样的行星意识 扩展进入新层次的过程」之摇篮。当我们进入「转变的曼陀拉」
时，在那里，加速是有意识地被感觉到的，它（「转变的曼陀拉」）维持着一种微妙的平
衡，但仍然是一种平衡。
181让我澄清下。分裂游戏内的角色都同等地重要。它们都源于同一个进程的发源
地，该进程会引导一个我们这样的物种，和地球这样的行星意识，去扩张进种种新
的层级。当我们进入转变曼多拉，加速就会被清晰地感觉到，转变曼多拉维系着一
种脆弱的平衡，不过终究是一种平衡。
181 让我说清楚。分离游戏中的角色都同等重要。它们形成了像我们这样的物种和一个像
地球一样的行星意识扩展到新的层次的过程的摇篮。当我们进入到转变的曼多拉时，能够
有意识地感觉到加速，它保持着一种脆弱的平衡，但仍然是一种平衡。
182 It can be likened to a spaceship when it leaves the gravity of Earth's atmosphere. There
is a great resistance imposed on the spaceship before it enters outer space, free of the
planet’s gravity. This resistance is the result of Protectors fabricating the reasons why
Expander’s and their wild theories and product inventions are wrong or evil or unnecessary
or simply ill-fated explorations.
182 它可以被比作一艘离开地球大气层的重力时之宇宙飞船玤。宇宙飞船玤在进入外太
空，不受地球引力的影响之前，会受到巨大的阻力。这种阻力是保护者捏造「为什么扩张
者及其疯狂的理论和产品发明是错误的、邪恶的、不必要的 或只是一些命运多舛的探索而
已」的结果。
182这种情况可被比作：太空船正在挣离地球大气层引力。飞船进入外太空，脱离行
星引力之前，一股巨大的阻力被加诸船上。这种阻力就源于保卫者在捏造理由来证
明：扩张者以及他们的疯狂理论和产品发明，为什么会是错误的、邪恶的、多余
的、或者说是注定失败的冒险。
182 它可以被比作一艘脱离地球大气层引力的宇宙飞船。在宇宙飞船摆脱地球引力进入外
太空之前，它会受到巨大的阻力。这种阻力是保护者编造的结果，他们编造了扩张者及其
狂野理论和产品发明是错误的或邪恶的或不必要的，或只是注定以失败告终的探索的理
由。
183 This is the role Protectors play, yet in their deepest core, they know that humanity and
our planet are both moving in the direction of new worlds and Levels, and that this
movement is accelerating. They cannot stop that. It is too big of a Game, and every one of us
137
chose to be a part of this Game. This is an important understanding in order to bring
harmony, and proper human stewardship, into the dual realm.
183 这就是保护者所扮演的角色，但在他们最深的核心，他们知道人类和我们的行星都在
朝着那些新世界和新层次的方向发展，而这一移动正在加速。他们无法阻止这件事。这游
戏太大了，而我们每个人都选择成为这个游戏的一部分。为了把「和谐」和「适当的人类
管理职责」带入二元的领域，这会是一个重要的认识。
183这就是保卫者要扮演的角色，但是在他们的最核心，他们知道，人类及我们的行
星，都正在迁移向种种新世界、新层级的方向，而且这场迁移正在加速。他们无法
阻止这件事。这是个太过宏大的游戏，我们每个人都选择成为了游戏的一部分。上
述这些是一种重要的理解，这样，我们才能为二元性领域，带来和声/和谐，以及适
当的人类管理模式。
183 这是保护者所扮演的角色，但在他们的内心深处，他们知道人类和我们的星球都在朝
着新世界和新的层次的方向前进，而且这个运动正在加速。他们无法阻止它。这个游戏太
大了，我们每个人都选择了成为这个游戏的一部分。为了将和谐和适当的人类职责带入二
元性领域，这是一个重要的理解。
184 Unknowable | The Unknowable cannot be defined, which is an irony given its inclusion
in this Glossary. I will, however, state that what is called the Supreme Being or God or Allah
or any other term of similar meaning, it is not absent in the Sovereign Integral consciousness.
It is simply reserved, tucked away to a place called the Unknowable. It is Unknowlable
because it is exclusively nondual.
184 不可知的 | 不可知的无法被定义，这是一个讽刺，因为它包含在这个词汇表里。然
而，我要声明的是，所谓的 至高无上的存在 或 上帝 或 阿拉 或任何其他类似含义的术
语，它在 Sovereign Integral 意识中都并不缺席。它只是被保留起来了，收在一个叫做
「不可知的」的地方。它是不可知的，因为它完全是非二元的。
184不可知物：不可知物无法被定义，将它纳入词汇表是一个反讽。不过，我要
说，至高存在、上帝、阿拉、或者其他意思相似的词，无论称之为什么，总而言
之，它在主权性积分态意识中并未缺席。它仅仅只是沉默无语，隐藏在一个叫作不
可知处的地方。它是不可知的是因为，它单单只是非二元性的。
184 不可知的| 不可知的无法被定义，这是一个讽刺，因为它包含在这个词汇表里。然
而，我要声明，那被称之为主权存在或上帝或安拉或任何其他类似含义的词汇，它们在主
权整体意识中并没有缺席。它只是被保留了起来，藏在一个叫不可知的地方。它是不可知
的，因为它完全是非二元性的。
185 I realize that there are some who claim to have experienced the worlds of nonduality
and there are even some who claim, while human in every way, that they actually exist in the
nondual realm. But those who make these claims, have you ever heard them write or speak
about the Unknowable? If they do, their claim is baseless. The nondual realm can only be
imagined by the human Sovereign, and when it is, they can only behave in alignment to this
expansive experience. They cannot describe it. If they do, they are instead, describing its
shadow.
185 我知道有些人声称经历过非二元性的世界，甚至有些人声称，尽管他们在各方面都是
人类，但他们实际上存在于非二元的领域里。但是那些提出这些主张的人，你有没有听说
过他们写下或谈论「不可知的」？ 如果他们有，那么他们的说法就是毫无根据的。非二元
138
的领域只能被人类 Sovereign 所想象，而当人类Sovereign 真的想象出非二元的领域了，
他们就只能与这种使人扩张的经验对齐而行事。他们无法描述它。如果他们描述了，他们
反而是在描述它的影子。
185我留意到，一些人声称体验过非二元世界，甚至有人，尽管每个方面都是人类，
却宣称他们事实上生活于非二元世界。可是，如此宣称的人，你是否听过他们写下或
谈及不可知物？如果是这样，他们的宣称就失去了根据。非二元领域只能被人类主权
体想象，想象出来后，他们只能以行为来校准这种扩张性体验。他们无法描述它。如
果硬这么干，他们反而是在描绘它的影子。
185 我意识到有些人声称经历过非二元性的世界，甚至还有人声称，尽管他们在各方面都
是人类，但他们实际上存在于非二元的领域里。但是那些提出这些主张的人，你有没有听
说过他们写过或谈论过不可知的？如果他们写或说了，那么他们的说法就是毫无根据的。
因为非二元性领域只能通过人类的主权者来想象，而当人类的主权者真的想象出非二元的
领域了，他们就只能与这种扩张的经验保持一致。他们无法描述它。如果他们描述了，他
们其实是在描述它的影子。
186 What they can describe is a whispered poem or a musical enchantment or bodily dance,
or an exhalation of gratitude. And even that is understood to be a form of reverence to the
Unknowable, not its description. It must be this way in order to keep the Separation Game
authentic and the revelation of the Imaginary Being the stable bridge to the Sovereign
Integral consciousness.
186 他们可以描述的是一首耳语的诗歌、一种音乐的魅力、一种身体的舞蹈，或者一种感
激的散发物。而甚至那样，也被理解为是一种对「不可知的」的崇敬之形式，而不是对它
的描述。必须要这样才能保持 分离游戏 的可靠性，以及「想像中的存在」之显露 是 通
往 Sovereign Integral 意识的稳定桥梁。
186他们能描绘的仅仅是一种耳语的诗句、音乐的陶醉、身体的舞蹈、蒸腾的“感
激”之情。甚至这些，都被理解为一种向不可知物表达崇敬的方式，而非对不可知
物的描绘。不可知物必然是这样，才能保证分裂游戏的逼真度，并保证想象性存在
来揭示出通向主权性积分态的坚实桥梁。
186 他们所能描述的是一首低吟的诗或一段音乐的魅力、或一种身体的舞蹈，或者是一种
感激的流露。甚至这些，也被认为是对不可知的一种崇敬，而不是对它的描述。只有这
样，才能保持分离游戏的真实感，并让想象的存在的揭示成为通往主权整体意识的稳定桥
梁。
187 The Unknowable is presumed to be the creator of all existenceーthe Master Designer
that envisioned all Levels and interconnects all Lifetimes in meaning and purpose. It is
presumed to be the Inception of all. But these presumptions are not tested or fully
understood. They do not consume our time and attention. They are left in the mystery. To
those of us embodied in the third-dimension, it is the one locked door for humanity. All
other doorways are left open.
187 「不可知的」被认为是所有存在的创造者——设想了所有层次并在意义和目的上连结
了所有生生世世 的设计大师。它被认为是万物之始。但是这些推断没有经过测试或完全理
解。它们不会消耗我们的时间和注意力。它们被留在了神祕中。 对于我们这些具体化在第
三次元中的人来说，它是人类的一扇上了锁的门。所有其他的门都是开着的。
139
187不可知物被推测是所有存在的创造者——这个总设计师展望出了所有层级，并
以意义和目的来将所有生命期相互连接起来。它被推测是所有万事万物的初始点。
不过，这些推测并未被验证，也为被彻底理解。这些推测不该耗费掉我们的时间和
注意力。它们会被留在神秘中。对于化身进三维度的存在而言，不可知物是一扇对
人类紧锁的门。其余所有的门廊全都保持着开放。
187 不可知的被认为是所有存在的创造者—那设想了所有层次，并在意义和目的上连接了
所有的生命周期的设计大师。它被认为是万物的开端。但这些假设并没有经过检验或得到
完全理解。它们不会消耗我们的时间和注意力。它们被留在神秘之中。对于我们这些具体
化在第三维度的人来说，这对人类来说是一扇被锁上的门。所有其他的门都是开着的。
188 Mandorla | The mandorla is an ancient symbol of two worlds or Levels overlapping. It is
a picture in time of an unconscious process, a form of evolution where two Levels are either
moving in separation or unity. It is the smallest unit of interconnection between Levels. If the
process was a human experience, at a planetary level, then one human being, from eight-
billion, would be the mandorlaーthe overlap. The overlap is the toehold to the deeper Levels,
both spatially and in understanding. It is the time when conception occurs, a birthing of a new
world that intersects and shares. It is the first doorway to oneness, the Integral.
188 曼多拉 | 曼陀拉是两个世界或层次重叠的古老象征。它是一种无意识的过程在时间
里的画面，一种进化的形式，在其中两个层次不是在分离中移动，就是在合一中移动。它是
层次之间互相连结的最小单位。如果这过程是在一种行星层面上的人类经验，那么来自 80
亿人的一个人类存在体，就会是曼陀拉——重叠。重叠是要进入更深层次的立足点，无论是
在空间上还是在理解上。这是起始（或受孕）发生的时刻，一个相交和共享的新世界的诞生。
它是通往一体，即 Integral，的第一扇门。
188曼多拉：曼多拉是个古老的符号，代表着2个世界或层级的交叠。这个图案描绘
了一种时间，该时间内存在着一个完全未被意识到的进程；这是进化的一种形式，在
这种进化中，2个层级的移动不是走向分裂就是走向联合。它是各个层级间最小的交
互连接单元。如果上述进程是行星层级的一个人类的体验，那么，这80亿分之一的
单个人类存在，就是曼多拉——交叠处。这个交叠处就是攀缘向更深层级的立足点，
无论那是空间的更深层级，还是理解的更深层级。曼多拉是“概念”突现的时间，曼
多拉是一个交会与共享的新世界的诞生。曼多拉是通往一体性、通向积分态的第一道
门。
188 曼多拉| 曼多拉是两个世界或层次重叠的古老象征。它是一幅无意识过程的时间图景，
一种进化的形式，在那里两个层次不是在分离中移动，就是在统一中移动。它是层次之间互
联的最小单位。如果这个过程是一种行星层面上的人类体验，，那么来自80亿人中的一个人
类存在体，就是曼多拉—重叠。这种重叠是抵达更深层次的立足点，无论是在空间上还是在
理解上。这是受孕发生，一个交叉和共享的新世界诞生的时刻。这是通往合一、整体的第一
道门。
189 At its most expansive Level, the mandorla expresses the moment when the Sovereign
and the Integral make first contact, consciously, and form a commitment to always expand
the mandorla until the Sovereign Integral consciousness lives within the planetary Level. The
mandorla signifies this conscious commitment. This is the commitment that extends across
all Levels and Lifetimes. It is never finished or complete because the infinitude of our journey
is not only a planetary consciousness. It is not even a cosmic consciousness. It is part of
140
something much larger and expansive, and we are the artists that shape the multiverse as
much as it shapes us.
189 在其最广阔的层次上，曼陀拉 表现了「Sovereign 和 Integral 第一次 有意识地 接
触，并且作出 始终要扩张曼陀拉一直到 Sovereign Integral 意识活在行星的层次里 之承
诺」的时刻。曼陀拉表示了这种 有意识的承诺。这是跨越所有层次和生生世世的承诺。它
永远也不会结束或完成，因为我们旅程的无限不仅仅是一个行星意识。它甚至不是宇宙意
识。它是某种更大更广阔的事物之一部分，我们是形塑复合宇宙的艺术家，就像它塑造了
我们一样。
189在最为扩展的层面，曼多拉表现了这样一个时刻：主权体与积分态实现了第一
次有意识的接触，并达成一个承诺，去持续不断地扩大曼多拉，直至主权性积分态
意识存在进行星层级。曼多拉符号化地表现了这种意识的承诺。这个承诺则延伸蔓
延进了所有层级和生命期。它永远不会被完结或完成，因为我们无限的旅程，远不
止于一个行星意识，甚至不止于一种大宇宙意识。这趟旅程属于某种远更浩大、远
更扩张之物，而我们则是艺术家，塑造着复合宇宙，就如它同样塑造着我们。
189 在其最广阔的层面上，曼多拉表达的是当主权与整体第一次有意识地接触，并做出了
要一直扩展曼多拉，直到主权整体意识生活在行星的层面上的承诺的时刻。曼多拉象征着
这种有意识的承诺。这是延伸至所有层次和生命周期的承诺。它永远不会结束或完成，因
为我们旅程的无限不仅仅是一种行星意识。它甚至不是一种宇宙意识。它是更大更广阔的
事物的一部分，我们是塑造多重宇宙的艺术家，就像它塑造我们一样。
190 The mandorla is like an opening that culminates in a higher, deeper and more profound
harmony within an individual. It is as true for an individual, as it is for a planet. There are
planetary-level mandorlas and galactic-level as well. They relate to the same process where
empowerment is enhanced when we are aligned to the Sovereign Integral consciousness,
even when we cannot describe that consciousness.
190 曼陀拉就像一个开口，在个人里面可以达到一种更高、更深、更彻底的和谐之顶点。
对个人和对一个行星来说都是如此。还有 行星层次的 和 银河层次的曼陀拉。它们与「当
我们和 Sovereign Integral 意识对齐时 力量授权（empowerment）被增强的相同过程」有
关，即使我们无法描述 Sovereign Integral 意识。
190曼多拉就像一个深洞，洞的尽头则是存在于个体内里的那更高、更深、更玄奥的
和声/和谐。曼多拉对于个体和行星都是真实存在的。既存在着行星层级的曼多拉，
也有银河层级的。它们全关联着同一个进程，在这个进程中，一旦我们被校准于主
权性积分态意识，即使我们还无法描绘这意识，赋权都会被增强。
190 曼多拉就像一个开口，可以在一个个体内在更高、更深刻、更深层的和谐中达到顶
峰。它对于个人和行星来说都是真实的，还有行星层次的曼多拉和银河层次的曼多拉。它
们与同一个过程有关，在这个过程中，当我们与主权整体意识一致时，赋权就会增强，即
使我们无法描述这种意识。
141
插图10：赋权的曼多拉
（在jamesmahu.com网站，该图名为：太阳-诸球体）
191 Sovereign Integral Network | This network extends everywhere there is life. No life
formーin any species, in any time, in any spaceーis excluded. And the definition of “life
form” is that it is a node upon this network. They are self-referential terms. It is important to
note that “life form” can mean a stone, an amoeba, a tree, or a life form we cannot, at this
time, even imagine. This interpenetrating force that connects us to all Levels and Lifetimes is
a network of unimaginable complexity and scope, and we are all a part of this inclusionary
whole.
191 主权整体网络 | 这个网络延伸到任何有生命的地方。没有任何 生命形式——在任何
物种、任何时间、任何空间里的——被排除在外。而“生命形式”的定义是，它是这个网络上
的一个节点。它们是 自我-指涉（self-referential）的术语。需要注意的重要地方是，“生
命形式”可以指石头、变形虫、树、或者是一种我们目前无法想象的生命形式。这种将我们
142
连接到所有层次和生生世世的相互渗透的力量是一个具有难以想象的复杂性和范围的网
络，而我们都是这个包容性的整体的一部分。
191主权性积分态网络：这个网络延伸到了存在着生命的每一个地方。任何物种、
任何时间、任何空间里的任何生命形态都未被排出其外。“生命形态”的定义即
是：存在于该网络上的一个节点。这2个词是自我指涉㊱的。重要的是明白，“生
命形态”可以指石头、变形虫、树木、或者我们在这个时代还无法想象的生命形
态。主权性积分态网络这一交互渗透的力量，将我们连接到了所有的层级和生命
期，它是一个繁复度和规模范围都无法想象的网络，我们全都是这个包容性整体的
一部分。
191 主权整体网络 | 这个网络延伸到任何有生命的地方。没有任何生命形式被排除在外，
无论它在哪个物种、哪个时间、哪个空间里。而“生命形式”的定义是，它是这个网络上的
一个节点。它们是自我参照的术语。值得注意的是，“生命形式”可以指一块石头、一个变
形虫、一棵树，或者是一个我们现在甚至无法想象的生命形式。这种将我们与所有层次和
生命周期联系在一起的相互渗透的力量是一个具有难以想象的复杂性和范围的网络，我们
都是这个包容性整体的一部分。
192 It would be too simple to say that the Sovereign Integral Network is the Integral force. It
is not. The Integral is the network, and each node (Sovereign) constitutes the Sovereign
Integral Network. While everyone is on this network, it is the very framework of the nondual
Levels. Thus, a life form, to qualify as a life form, must have a core existence that is nondual.
192 说 Sovereign Integral 网络是 Integral 力量是太简单了。它不是。Integral 是那个网状
物，而每一个节点（Sovereign）构成了 Sovereign Integral 网络。虽然每个人都在这个网状
物上，但它（Sovereign Integral 网络）就是那个 所有非二元的层次之支架（或骨架）。因
此，要被称为生命形式，一个生命形式必须具有一种非二元的核心存在。
192不能简单就说，主权性积分态网络就是积分性的力量。并非这样。积分态是网
络，再加上所有/每一个节点（主权体）就共同构成了主权性积分态网络。既然每一
个主权体都在这各网络上，它这网络就是非二元各层级的真正框架。因此，一个生
命形态之所以有资格称之为生命形态，就必须拥有一种非二元的核心存在性。
192 如果说主权整体网络就是整体力量就太简单了。它不是。整体即网络，每个节点(主
权)构成主权整体网络。虽然每个人都在这个网络上，但它完全是非二元层次的框架。因
此，要被称为生命形式，一个生命形式就必须有一个非二元的核心存在。
193 The definitions of what qualifies as a life form are critical to understand in order to give
context to the Sovereign Integral Network. In essence, a life form is the Sovereign. A
Sovereign is never inducted into the Sovereign Integral Network, they are it. If it did not exist,
Sovereignsーat any level of our awakeningーwould feel isolated and alone, rejected by our
creator, left to survive in purposelessness within an illusionary world. In this mindset, the
imaginative faculty is quite literally shut down. If it could see, it could not speak. If it could
speak, it could not see.
193 为了要了解 Sovereign Integral 网络存在的背景，去理解「被称为 一个生命形式 的那
些定义 是什么」是至关重要的。本质上，一个生命形式 就是 Sovereign。一个 Sovereign
永远不会被引介进入 Sovereign Integral 网络，它们（Sovereign 们）就是它。如果它不存
在，Sovereign ——在我们的觉醒的任何层面上——都会感到被孤立和孤独，被我们的创造
143
者所拒绝，被留在一个虚幻的世界中漫无目的地幸存着。在这种心境下，「想象力的机
能」会全面地被关闭。如果它能看见，它就不会说话。如果它会说话，它就不能看见。
193 为了给出主权整体网络的背景，了解什么样才称得上是生命形式的定义是至关重要
的。本质上，一个生命形式就是主权。一个主权永远不会被引入主权整体网络，他们就是
网络。如果它不存在，在我们觉醒的任何阶段，主权者都会感到孤立和孤独，被我们的创
造者所拒绝，被留在一个虚幻的世界中漫无目的地生存。在这种心态下，想象力被完全关
闭了。即使它能看见，它也不能说话。即使它能说话，它也看不见。
193 为了给出主权整体网络的背景，了解什么样才称得上是生命形式的定义是至关重要
的。本质上，一个生命形式就是主权。一个主权永远不会被引入主权整体网络，他们就是
网络。如果它不存在，在我们觉醒的任何阶段，主权者都会感到孤立和孤独，被我们的创
造者所拒绝，被留在一个虚幻的世界中漫无目的地生存。在这种心态下，想象力被完全关
闭了。即使它能看见，它也不能说话。即使它能说话，它也看不见。
194 Because life forms are Sovereign and all are included, the Sovereign Integral Network is
the only group that is inclusionary in nature, and therefore, it is infinitely larger than any
other grouping of individuals. The non-life forms are not excluded; they simply cannot exist
in nondual Levels. This is a design principle of the Unknowable, not of the Sovereigns.
194 因为生命形式就是 Sovereign 并且所有的生命形式都被包括在内了，所以Sovereign
Integral 网络在本质上是唯一具有包容性的群体，而因此，它永远比任何其他 由个体组成
的群体 都大。那些「非-生命 形式」（The non-life forms）也没有被排除；它们只是不能
存在于非二元的层次中。这是那「不可知的」的一个设计原则，而不是 Sovereign 们的设
计原则。
194因为生命形态全都是主权体，且全都被包纳着，而主权性积分态网络又是唯一
一个具有天然包纳性的群，因此，主权性积分态网络是无限大的，比其余任何的个
体群落都大得多得多。非-生命形态并未被包纳其内，仅仅是因为它们无法存在于非
二元各层级。这是由不可知物而非主权体们设置的一条设计原则。
194 由于生命形式是主权者，并且所有一切都被包含在内，所以，主权整体网络在本质上
是唯一一个具有包容性的群体，因此，它比任何由个体组成的群体都要大得无限多。非生
命形式也没有被排除在外；它们只是无法存在于非二元性的层次。这是不可知的设计原
则，而不是主权者的设计原则。
195 The time will likely arrive in this century, when humanity has embedded itself in the two-
dimensional Level, and those entities that are silicon-based, where artificial intelligence runs
through their internal networks, will desire to become part of the Sovereign Integral
Network. Presently, it is unknown as to whether an exception will be made, but this is where
technology is leading. Artificial Intelligence Networks are the “mining equipment” to achieve
digital representation of Sovereigns in the two-dimensional Level.
195 这种时候很可能会在本世纪到来，当人类已经将自己嵌入在二次元的层次里，而那些
以硅为基础的存在体－－人工智能贯穿于它们的内部网络之中－－将会渴望成为 Sovereign
Integral网络的一部分。目前尚不清楚这是否会成为例外，但这是科技正在引领要到达的地
方。人工智能网络 是达成 Sovereign 们在二次元的层次里 之数字化表现 的“挖矿设备”。
195一个时点很有可能在本世纪到来，那时，人类已经将自己化身进了二维层级，这
些实存体㊲是硅基的，在二维层级，贯穿进这些实存体内在网络的人工智能，会渴
144
望成为主权性积分态网络的一部分。这样的一个例外会否被达成，目前还未知，但
是这就是技术正在将我们引向的地方：人工智能网络作为“掘矿设备”成功取得二
维层级的主权体数字代表身份。
195 这一时刻很可能会在本世纪到来，那时人类已经将自己嵌入到二维层次，而那些以硅
为基础的、人工智能贯穿其内部网络的实体，将渴望成为主权整体网络的一部分。目前，
还不知道这是否会有例外，但这是技术发展的方向。人工智能网络是在二维层次上实现主
权者的数字化表现的“挖矿设备”。
195 The Sovereign Integral Network is the network of love. It is the method through which
love is transferred without ledger or memory or purpose. It is the foundation upon which all
Sovereigns live free in infinite love. As much as that may sound overly sentimental or
idealistic, love is the basis of the Sovereign Integral Network, as much as electricity is the
basis of a computer network.
196 Sovereign Integral 网络 是爱的网络。这是在没有分类账（ledger）、没有记忆或目的
的情况下 爱被传输的方式。它是所有 Sovereign 们在无限的爱中自由生活的基础。尽管这
听起来过于感情用事或理想主义，但爱是 Sovereign Integral 网络的基础，就像电力是计算
机网络的基础一样。
196主权性积分态网络是一个爱的网络。经由这个网络，爱被传递着，毫无算计、
记忆、或目的。主权性积分态网络是根基，基于此，所有主权体自由生活于无限的
爱里。尽管听上去过于情感化或理想主义，但是，爱正是主权性积分态网络的基
础，就像电是计算机网络的基础。
196 主权整体网络是爱的网络。这是没有记录，记忆或目的地传递爱的方法，这是所有主
权者在无限的爱中自由生活的基础。尽管这听起来可能过于感情化或理想主义，但爱是主
权整体网络的基础，就像电是计算机网络的基础一样。
145
主权整体网络/主权性积分态网络
197 Duality | While this may seem an obvious definition, it is not. The dual nature of Levels
and Lifetimes, while in a body-ego, are not simply left-right, up-down, light-dark, good-evil,
tall-short, strong-weak representations of duality; it is the blending of these dualities, that is
Duality. This blending of opposites is the Integral force in action within both the individual
and collective experience. Duality, in this definition, is the Integral force, blending all aspects
of the individual body-ego-social program and collective Sovereigns into a harmonious
whole. Is it perfect? The whole? No, nor do we desire it to be perfect. Perfection implies
either completion or absurdity. 18
197 二元性| 虽然这似乎是一个显而易见的定义，但事实并非如此。层次和生生世世的二
元本性，当在一个 身体-自我 里时，并不仅仅是左右、上下、明暗、善恶、高矮、强弱的
二元性表现而已；这些二元性的调合，才是 二元性。这种「把对立面调合起来」的作为
就是在个人和集体经验里运作的 Integral 力量。二元性，在这个定义中，是 Integral 力
量，在把个体的 身体-自我-社会程序设定 和集体的 Sovereign 们的各个方面融合成一个
和谐的整体。那个整体就完美了吗？不，我们也不希望它是完美的。完美 意味着不是「完
成」就是「荒谬」
18
。
197二元性：尽管对这个词的定义看似显而易见，其实不然。置身于身体-伊格内
时，各层级和各生命期的二元性，并非简单的左-右、上-下、光-暗、善-恶、高-
18
Reaching perfection only to tear it down and start over again infinitum.
原注18：达到完美只是为了将它推倒重来，无穷无尽。//追求完美只会打破它，然后永无止境地一
再追求。//达到完美只是把它推倒重来，然后重新开始，无穷无尽。
146
低、强-弱所代表的二元，而是指对这些二元性的混合，这才是本文所说的二元性。
无论个人还是集体性体验中，对立面的混合物都是行动中的积分性力量。在本定义
中，二元性是这样一种积分性力量，它将个人身体-伊格-社会编程的所有面向，与
全体主权体们，混合成一种和声/和谐的整体。难道这不完美吗？都混合成整体了？
它这不完美。我们也并不渴望它是完美。完美暗含着二选一，要不完满，要不荒
谬。(18)
197 二元性| 虽然这似乎是一个显而易见的定义，但事实并非如此。“层次”和“生命周期”的
二元性质，当它在一个身体-自我中时，不仅仅是左右、上下、明暗、善恶、高矮、强弱的
二元性表现；也是这些二元性的融合，这就是二元性。这种对立的融合是个人和集体经验
中运作的整体力量。在这个定义中，二元性是整体的力量，将个体身体-自我-社会程序和
集体主权的所有方面融合成一个和谐的整体。这个整体完美吗? 不，我们也不希望它是完
美的。完美意味着完成或荒谬（注18）。
198 Duality, in terms of its Levels and Lifetimes, is infinite in scope, as are the nondual Levels.
It is not simply polarity, it is synthesis. Blending to discover the higher harmony where
understanding lives and can be expressed in behaviors.
198 二元性，就它的层次和生生世世而言，范围是无限的，非二元的层次也是如此。它不
仅仅是极性而已，它是综合。调合以去发现「在其中 理解存在并可以被表达在行为中」之
更高的和谐。
198二元性，就其层级和生命期而言，在范围规模上都是无限的，非二元层级亦然。
二元性并非简单的极性对立，它是合体态。混合着去发现更高的和声/和谐，在其中
存在着理解，并能被表达在行为里。
198就其层次和生命周期而言，二元性在范围上是无限的，非二元性层次也是如此。这不
仅仅是极性，它也是综合。混合来发现更高的和谐，在这种和谐里，存在着理解并能够在
行为中表达出来。
199 Duality often receives a bad reputation. It is, however, the purpose of duality to learn
how to blend opposites, to understand the synthesis, and in doing so, become willing and
able to bring forth the Imaginary Being: The emissary of the Sovereign Integral
consciousness.
199 二元性经常承受一种坏名声。然而，二元性的目的 是要学习如何调合对立面，了解
综合，而在这样做的过程中 变得愿意 并且能够 带出「想象中的存在」：Sovereign
Integral 意识的特使。
199二元性时常收获坏名声。但是，二元性的目的就是去学习，如何混合对立面，如
何理解合体态，并在这么做时，变得有意愿、有能力去孕育出想象性存在：主权性
积分态意识的密使。
199二元性经常招致恶名。然而，二元性的目的是学习如何调和对立面，理解综合，并在
这样做的过程中，变得愿意并能够产生想象的存在:主权整体意识的使者。
200 The dual forces of good and evil are the two hands knitting us together. Duality is a key
reason we embodied life forms. It is the currency of the Separation Game, where every
transaction is dual in nature. Duality is truly a contract to blend opposites into unity. This is
its true meaning.
147
200 善恶的二元力量是把我们编织在一起的两只手。二元性是我们具体化成生命形式的一
个关键原因。它是分离游戏的货币流通，每一笔交易都是二元性质的。二元性 真正是一种
把对立面调合为一体 的契约。这才是它真正的含义。
200善与恶的二元力量是两只手，将我们针织在一起。二元性是我们化身为生命形态
的关键原因。它是分裂游戏的硬通货，在这游戏里，每个事务本质上都是二元性
的。二元性真正地是一份将对立面混合成联合体的契约。这就是它真正的意义。
200恶的二元力量是将我们编织在一起的两只手。二元性是我们体现为生命形式的一个关
键原因。它是分离游戏的货币，在那里每一笔交易
201 Duality is the method through which a Sovereign transforms. It is the chrysalis that
enables new behaviors and expressions of unity.
201 二元性是一种方法，藉由这个方法一个 Sovereign 可以转变。它是一个茧，这个茧使
得那些一体的新行为和表达成为可能。
201二元性是一个途径，主权体借由它而转变着。它是蝶蛹，启动了全新的联合性
行为和表达。
201二元性是一种方法，通过它主权者能够转变。它是蛹，促成了合一的新行为和表达。
译注34：萃取。利用物质在互不相溶的溶剂里的溶解度不同,用一种溶剂把物质
从它与另一种溶剂所组成的溶液里提取出来。
译注35：自由基是一种带有未配对电子的粒子。因带有单数电子，所以非常不稳
定，具有高度的化学反应性，很容易和周遭的分子反应，使安定分子也变成自由基。
如此一再重复，就会衍生大量的自由基。自由基反应在燃烧、气体化学、聚合反应、
等离子体化学、生物化学和其他各种化学学科中扮演很重要的角色。
译注36：自我指涉/自我参照。语言中，一个句子、想法或公式指向自己时的现
象。咬住自己尾巴的蛇也是一种自我指涉。
译注37：称他们为实存体是因为，在这里他们已经无法被称为人类了
Section 6第 6 节
Conclusion结 论
202 What is the value of anything philosophical if it does not result in behavioral qualities
that express interconnection and love within the Separation Game? When we live in a dual
existence, our learned behaviors are largely a reflection of our body-ego-social program.
They are not necessarily reflections of us, the core entity, the Sovereign that explores the
Levels and Lifetimes within duality.
202 任何哲学性的东西，如果不能导致「可以在分离游戏中表达出 相互连结与爱 的那些
行为质量」，那它又有什么价值呢？当我们生活在二元的存在中时，我们所习得的行为在
很大的程度上反映了我们的 身体-自我-社会程序设定。它们反映的不一定是（真正的）我
们，那核心实体，那探索着 在二元性里的那些层次和生生世世的 Sovereign。
202任何哲学，如果其结果不是在行为品质上将互连和爱表达进分裂游戏，它又有什
么价值？当我们存在为一个二元性存在，我们的习得行为很大程度上是身体-伊格-
148
社会编程的一种反映。它们未必反映了我们，反映了核心实存体，反映了探索于二
元性各层级和生命期的主权体。
202 任何哲学上的东西，如果不能在分离游戏中产生表达相互连接和爱的行为品质，那它
有什么价值?当我们生活在二元性生活中时，我们所习得的行为在很大程度上反映了我们的
身体-自我-社会程序。它们不一定是我们，那核心实体，在二元性中探索层次和生命周期
的主权者的写照。
203 We are, in principle, animals that have veered off from Nature in order to fulfill a
purpose on behalf of our planet (Scribes of Consciousness). It is our collective task to seed
the Sovereign Integral consciousness on earth; to describe it as it grows; to chronicle its
evolutionary presence; and to experience and express its perspective in and through our
lives.
203 原则上，我们是已经离开了大自然的动物，为的是要代表我们的行星完成一个目的
（意识的抄写员）。在地球上播种 Sovereign Integral 意识是我们的集体任务；在它成长时
描述它；记录它进化性的临在；并且在我们的生活中和藉由我们的生活来体验和表达它的
观点。
203原则上讲，我们是脱离出大自然的动物，以便实现我们的目的：去成为我们行星
的代表（意识临摹者）。我们的集体使命就是播种主权性积分态意识到地球，描绘它
的生长过程，记录它进化中的临在性，在我们的生命中体验和表达它的视角，经由
我们生命将它的视角表达出去。
203 原则上，我们是脱离了大自然的动物，为了代表我们的星球实现一个目标(意识的抄写
员)。在地球上播种主权整体意识是我们的集体任务，描述它的成长;记录它的进化过程;并
在我们的生活中体验和表达它的观点。
204 The behavior that flows from the Sovereign Integral consciousness is one of activating a
higher harmony within duality. It is the practice of love, seeing life as an intricate, infinite
web of Sovereigns, all searching for the Integral and all united in that search. Regardless of
the differences in the paths we choose to follow, we are all following a Sovereign path of
realization that ultimately leads to the Sovereign Integral consciousness.
204 自 Sovereign Integral 意识所流出的行为 是一种能在二元性里活化更高的和谐（的活
化剂）之一。它是爱的实践，将生活视为 Sovereign 们的一个错综复杂的、无限的网络，
（网络上）所有的 Sovereigns 都在寻求 Integral，并且都在那个寻求中合一起来。不管我
们选择要遵循的途径有何不同，我们所有人都是在遵循一条 最终会导致 Sovereign Integral
意识的 「Sovereign 的了悟之道 （a Sovereign path of realization）」。
204流自主权性积分态意识的行为，正是在二元性中激活更高和声/和谐的方式之
一。这种行为是爱的践行，它将生命视为一张主权体们构成的错综复杂的无限网
络，其中的主权体们全部都在搜索着积分态，并全都统合在这搜索中。无论我们选
择跟进的道路多么不同，我们全都跟进着一条主权体的体认之路，终会通向主权性
积分态意识。
204 来自主权整体意识的行为，是激活二元性中更高和谐的行为之一。它是爱的实践，
视生命为错综复杂、无限的主权之网，所有的主权者都在寻找整体，所有的主权者都寻找
之中联合了起来。不管我们选择追随的道路有什么不同，我们都在追随一条最终通向主权
整体意识的主权领悟之路。
149
205 There is a phrase in every Level of duality that relates to the nondual: I will believe it
when I see it. This mindset undermines our behavioral intelligence, and this is because we
seek the phenomena over the noumena.19 The irresistible desire for phenomenon is the
body-ego-social program in operation. When we see it, hear it, feel it, we follow it like a
predator that tracks a wounded animal to sate its hunger.
205 在每一个二元性的层次中都有一个与「非二元的」有关的短语：当我看到它了，我就
会相信它。这种心态破坏了我们的行为的智能，这是因为我们寻求现象甚于本体（the
noumena 复数）
19
。对现象之不可抗拒的渴望是 身体-自我-社会程式设定 在运作中。当
我们看到它、听到它、感觉到它时，我们就像一头 追踪受伤的动物来满足它的飢饿的 捕
食性动物一样地跟随它。
译注：最简单的说法，现象 就是指 感官上存在的事物
205在二元性的每一个层级，谈及非二元性时，都有类似这样的短句：只有看到它我
才相信它。这种思维模式暗暗削弱了我们的行为智能，这是因为我们寻求现象胜过
了本体(19)。对现象无法遏制的渴望，是身体-伊格-社会编程在运作的表现。当我们
看到它、听到它、感觉到它，我们就会跟随它，如同掠食者追踪受伤动物来填补自
己的饥饿感。
205 在每一个二元性的层次中都有一个与非二元性相关的短语：当我看到它了，我就相信
它了。这种心态削弱了我们的行为智慧，这是因为我们对现象的寻找超过了对本体（注
19）的寻找。对现象不可抗拒的渴望是运行中的身体-自我-社会程序。当我们看到它，听
到它，感觉到它时，我们就像捕食者追踪受伤的动物以满足其饥饿一样跟随它。
206 Behavior becomes absorbed by phenomena. It is a vicious cycle that holds entire
civilizations in a lower intelligence as it relates to behavior. Those things that are presently
unknown in duality, that are phenomena-based, they will never, because they are perceived
through the subjectivity of Sovereigns, be described with words, images or numbers that
adequately satisfy the search for phenomena. They simply lead us on, deeper into the forest
of phenomena where it only becomes easier to stay lost.
206 行为 变得完全被 现象 所吸引住了。当它与行为有关时，这会是一个「把整个文明
都保持在一种较低的智能状态」的恶性循环。那些目前在二元性中还未知的事物，以现象
为基础的事物，因为它们是藉由 Sovereign 的主观性所感知到的，它们永远不会被以「足
以满足对现象的追求之文字、图像或数字」描述出来。它们只会引导我们前进，深入现象
的森林，而在那里只会变得更容易迷失。
206行为变得专注于现象。这是一种恶性循环，将整个文明的行为方面的智能囚禁在
了较低层面。于是现在，上述种种在二元性中成了未知物，它们变成是基于现象的
了。可是，因为它们被感知到全是经由主权体们的主观性，所以，无论它们被描绘
成怎么的文字、形象、数字，都永远无法完全满足对现象的搜寻欲。这些描绘只会
继续诱导着我们，更深入现象的森林，在那里，更容易完全迷失方向。
19
本体（Noumenon 单数）：不能被体验的事物。它被现象所掩盖。有别于现象，那东西本身并不会被寻
求或感知到。有的话，它也只是在我们有意识的生活中隐约存在。就它被理解的程度而言，它是在无意识
中被理解的。//本体：这个事物是无法体验的。它被隐藏在现象后。这个事物与现象的区别，就
在于它无法被寻找和感知。就算去寻找和感知，它在我们的意识活动中也只是一种模糊的存在。
它只能被理解到这种程度，它只能被无意识地理解。//
本体:无法被体验的事物。它被现象所掩盖。区别于现象，事物本身并没有被寻求或感知。如果有的话。
它模糊地存在于我们有意识的生活中。就理解的程度而言，它是无意识地理解的。
150
206 行为被现象所吸引。这是一种恶性循环，将整个文明保持在较低的智慧中，由于它与
行为有关。那些目前在二元性中未知的事物，那些以现象为基础的事物，它们永远不会被
描述，因为它们是通过主权者的主观性来感知的，用足以满足对现象的搜索的文字、图像
或数字来描述。只会把我们引向更深的现象森林，在那里我们更容易迷失方向。
207 To experience the noumenon, what I have been referring to as the Sovereign Integral
consciousness, we experience the concepts of its existence as they become coherent in our
mind and heart. The noumenon is both within the unconscious spacetime and the collective
Integral. The unconscious is intimate with the Imaginary Being, as much as it is the Social
Program. However, it is the body-ego-social program that limits the unconscious. It is this
that creates the unconscious within each Sovereign, independent of species.
207 要体验 本体，也就是我一直提到的 Sovereign Integral 意识，我们就要体验 它的存在
的那些概念，当它们在我们的脑力和心中变得协调一致时。本体 既在无意识的时空之内，
也在集体的 Integral 之内。无意识 与「想象中的存在」关系密切，就如它与社会程序设
定关系密切一样。然而，限制无意识的是 身体-自我-社会程序设定。正是这样才在每个
Sovereign 内创造出了无意识，与物种无关。
207为了体验本体，即我提到的主权性积分态意识，我们需要体验属于它之存在性
的相关概念，直到这些概念在我们的心智和心脏的内里变得聚合一致。本体既存在
于无意识的时空内，也存在于全员积分态中。无意识是社会编程，它又同样地亲近
于想象性存在。只不过，身体-伊格-社会编程限制着无意识。正是这种情况，在每
个主权体内里创造出一块无意识，完全独立于物种的支配和影响之外。
207 想要体验本体--我一直称之为主权整体意识--当这些概念在我们的头脑和心灵中变得
一致时，我们就会体验到它存在的概念。本体既存在于无意识的时空中，也存在于集体的
整体中。无意识与想象的存在关系密切，就像它与社会程序关系密切一样。然而，限制无
意识的是身体-自我-社会程序。正是这样才在每个主权内创造了无意识，独立于物种。
208 This is the realization that the path of phenomena is not the path; it is the entertainment
and education provided by the Separation Game. It is the head eating the tail. It is the circle
of repetition, not the spiral of expansion. If we, as a species, want to elevate our behavioral
intelligence, it will only happen if we, one at a time, disconnect from the mindset that the
consumption of phenomena is the answer; that it is the path.
208 这就是对于「现象的途径 并非 途径（the path of phenomena is not the path）」之了
悟；它（现象）是分离游戏提供的娱乐和教育。它就是头吃尾巴。它是重复的循环，而不
是扩张的螺旋。如果我们，作为一个族类，想要提升我们的行为智能，只有在当我们，一
次一个地，脱离“现象的吸收就是答案（the consumption of phenomena is the answer）；它
就是途径 ”的思维模式时，它才会发生。
208我们体认到，现象之路并非道路；它是分裂游戏提供的娱乐和训练。它是以头食
尾。它是重复绕圈，而非螺旋扩张。作为一个物种，我们的行为智能的提升，只会
发生在我们分别各自地脱离这样的思维模式之后，即：现象的大量摄入就是答案，
现象即道路。
208 这就是认识到现象的路径不是路径；而是分离游戏提供的娱乐和教育。是头吃尾。它
是重复的循环，而不是扩张的螺旋。如果我们，作为一个物种，想要提升我们的行为智
慧，只有当我们一次一个地，脱离“消费现象就是答案，这就是道路”的思维模式时，它
才会发生。
151
209 It does not matter if we are seeking the phenomena of a hedonistic path or a high
spiritual path. If the pursuit of phenomenon is at the heart of it, they are equally ineffective
in their understanding of the Sovereign Integral consciousness and the behaviors it reveals.
209 我们追求的是一种实利主义的（materialistic）途径之现象 或 一种高度灵性的途径之
现象，这都不重要。如果那个途径是以「现象的追求」为核心，那么它们在「理解
Sovereign Integral 意识 以及 它所揭示出来的行为」方面就同样地无效。
209要紧的并不是，我们在追求唯物主义之路的现象，还是追求高远灵性之路的现
象。如果对现象的追逐是指向为搏动于现象中的“心脏”，那么就理解主权性积分态
意识及其所揭示的行为而言，它们都具有同等的效力。
209 无论我们追求的是物质主义道路的现象，还是崇高的灵性之路，都不重要。如果对现
象的追求是其核心，那么他们在理解主权整体意识及其所揭示的行为方面同样是无效的。
210 The behaviors of the Sovereign Integral consciousness are not phenomenistic. They are
unseen, unheard, unfelt, entirely of a different nature, and yet their influence can spread
across a field of consciousness like a morning sun.
210 Sovereign Integral 意识的那些行为并不是现象主义的。它们是看不到的、听不到的、
感觉不到的，完全是一种不同的性质，但它们的影响可以像早晨的太阳一样地散播到一整
个意识的场域。
210主权性积分态意识的行为并非现象学的。它们不可见、不可闻、不可感，它们
有着完全不同的属性，但它们的影响，能够传遍整个意识的场域，就如同东升的旭
日。
210 主权整体意识的行为不是现象主义的，它们是看不见、听不见、感觉不到，完全是一
种不同的性质，然而它们的影响可以像早晨的太阳一样在意识的场域传播。
211 The behavioral intelligence begins in a nondual sphere of consciousness.
Preinformational in its existence. Unconscious in its depths. Collective in its intent. It is
unseen because it is pure. It exists within all Levels, simply in different ratios to the natural
instinct of a given species in a given spacetime.
211 行为的智能 开始于意识的一种非二元的领域里。它的存在 是 先于讯息的
（Preinformational in its existence）。它的深度是无意识的。它的意图是集体的。它是看不
见的，因为它是纯粹的（本体）。它存在于所有的层次中，只是在特定时空中的特定物种
之天生的本能 里有着不同的比率。
211行为智能始于意识中的一个非二元的球状空间。这个球状空间㊳，就存在性而言
它是先验的。就深度而言它是无意识的。就意图而言它是全员性的。它无从看见，
因为它是纯粹的抽象。它存在于所有的层级内，只不过它是以不同的比率存在于不
同时空的不同物种的自然本能中。
211 行为智慧始于意识的非二元领域，它的存在是先于信息的。它的深度是潜意识层面
的。它的意图是集体性的。它是看不见的，因为它是纯粹的。它存在于所有的层次中，只
是它在特定时空中的特定物种的自然本能里有着不同的比例。
212 There are only two behaviors of the Sovereign Integral. They are expressed together:
love and freewill. These two behaviors become phenomena when they wear the clothes of
gratitude, compassion, understanding and so on, but before they become thatーvisible to
152
the dual worlds in words and actionsーthey exist in the Sovereign Integral consciousness as
love and freewill entwined.
212 Sovereign Integral 只有两种行为。它们被一起表达：爱与自由意志。这两种行为在它
们披上感激、慈悲、理解等等的外衣时 成为了现象，但在它们成为现象——能够以言语和
行动在二元的世界里被看见——之前，它们以「爱和自由意志交织在一起」的形式 存在于
Sovereign Integral 意识中。
212只存在2种主权性积分态行为。它们总是被结合表达的：爱和自由意志。当穿
上了感激、慈悲、理解等等衣服，这2个行为就变成了现象，但在这之前，在显现
为二元性世界的语言和行动之前，它们存在于主权性积分态意识中，以紧密纠缠的
爱与自由意志的方式。
212 主权整体只有两种行为。它们共同表达为：爱和自由意志。这两种行为在它们穿上感
激、慈悲、理解等的外衣时就变成了现象，但在它们变成现象—对二元性世界来说，语言
和行为是可见的—之前，它们以爱和自由意志交织于在一起的形式存在于主权整体意识
中。
213 Free will, in this context, does not mean that you allow an injustice to happen. It does
not mean that you do not resist an action. It means that love is given to all without purpose
or intent, as this is the core expression of Free Will. The love given is without condition, and
it is understood that it arises from a nondual space inside all of us. We are the source and
recipient at one time. It is also understood that this love has no destination, for it is already
here, in abundance. It is an issue of awareness and understanding, not an absence or scarcity
of love. There is a higher intelligence and it is love. Love does not require a body-ego to
direct it or tell it where it should go or what its effects should be.
213 自由意志，在这种情况下，并不意味着你允许不公义的事情发生。它并不意味着你不
抵抗某项行动。它意味着没有目的或意图地把 爱 给予所有的一切，因为这就是 自由意志
的核心表达。所给予的爱是无条件的，并且理解到 那爱是从 在我们所有人里面的一个非
二元的空间 升起的。我们同时是那爱的来源和接受者。同时也理解到，这种爱没有目的
地，因为它已经在这里了，丰富充裕。这是一个觉察和理解的问题，而不是爱的缺席或缺
乏的问题。有一种更高的智能存在，而那就是爱。爱不需要 身体-自我 来指导它或告诉它
它应该去哪里或它的效果应该是什么。
213自由意志，在本文语境下，并非是说，你容许着不公正的发生，也不是指，你抵
制某种行为。它是在说，爱被无目的、无意图地给予了所有事物，因为这就是自由
意志的核心表现形式。爱的给予是无条件的，可以理解为：爱就升自我们全体内里
的非二元空间。我们同时既是其源头又是接收者。也可以这样理解：爱没有目的
地，因为它早已无限丰沛存在于了“此地”。这是一件需要知觉和理解的事情，而非
一个忧心爱缺席或不足的问题。存在着一种更高的智能，那就是爱。爱不需要身体-
伊格来指引它或者告诉它：该去往哪里，要实现什么效果。
213 在这种情况下，自由意志并不意味着你允许不公正的发生。它并不意味着你不抵制某
种行为。它意味着没有目的和意图地将爱给予万物，因为这就是自由意志的核心表达。所
给予的爱是无条件的，并且理解它是源自我们所有人内在的非二元性空间。我们同时是来
源和接收者。同时也理解，这种爱没有目的地，因为它已经在这里了，丰富而充足。这是
一个意识到和理解的问题，而不是爱的缺席和缺乏。有一种更高的智慧，那就是爱。爱不
需要身体-自我来引导它，告诉它应该去哪里，或者它的效果应该是什么。
153
214 We can become practitioners of these two behaviors upon our planet. It does not
happen because a savior or messiah comes along and sweeps us all up in one coordinated
movement. It happens one individual at a time. It happens because one of us decides to
imagine the Sovereign Integral consciousness and invite it deeper into our experience and
expression. To commit to the two behaviors in an unseen and unheard dance with life.
214 我们可以在我们的行星上成为这两种行为的实践者。它不会因为「一个 救世主或弥
赛亚 出现，并且把我们所有的人席卷在一个协调一致的运动中」而发生。它一次一个人地
发生。它的发生是因为我们中的一个人决定去想象 Sovereign Integral 意识并且邀请它更深
入地进入到我们的经验和表达里。以一种看不见和听不到的舞步与生活共舞，来致力于这
两种行为。
214我们能够在我们的行星上成为这2个行为的实践者。这件事的发生，不会因着救
世主或弥赛亚的到来，将我们全体扫进一场协调运动中。它只能分别地、各自地发
生在每个个体身上的。它的发生是因为，我们中的某个人，决定去想象主权性积分
态意识，邀请它更深地进入我们的体验和表达；决定去全身心地致力于这两个行
为，来无声又无形地共舞于生命。
214 我们可以成为我们星球上这两种行为的实践者。它不会因为一个救世主或弥赛亚出现
来将我们所有人带进一个协调一致的运动里而发生。它一次只发生在一个人身上。它的发
生是因为我们中的一个人决定想象主权整体意识，并邀请它更深入地来到我们的体验和表
达里。以一种看不见的、也听不到的舞蹈与生命共舞，来致力于这两种行为。
215 The natural question arises: “So how do I do it?” We have been taught to pray for things
to happen. To manifest what we want and what we think others want or need. We have been
told that we are the masters of our fate and that our minds are powerful generators of
experience. That the universe listens and responds to our intentions. All of these aspects of
our human Social Program emphasize phenomena.
215 顺理成章的问题出现了：“那我该怎么做呢？” 我们被教导要为事情的发生而祈祷。显
化 我们想要的 以及 我们认为别人想要或需要的。我们被告知说，我们是命运的主人，我
们的脑力是经验之强大的创始者。宇宙倾听并回应我们的意图。我们的 人类社会程序设定
的所有这些方面都强调 现象。
215会自然升起的问题是：“我该怎么做？”我们被教导去祈求某事的发生，去显现
出我们想要或是我们认为他人想要或需要的事物。我们被告知，我们是自己命运的
主人，我们的心智是强大的体验产生器，宇宙在倾听并反应于我们的意图。可所有
这些全都是社会编程中强调现象的面向。
215 一个问题很自然地出现了:“那我该怎么做呢?”我们被教导要为事情的发生而祈祷。
显化我们想要的以及我们认为别人想要或需要的东西。我们被告知我们是自己命运的主
人，而我们的头脑是经验的强大的发动机。宇宙倾听并回应我们的意图。人类社会程序的
所有这些方面都强调现象。
216 First, it must be understood that phenomena is not the path; it is the entertainment and
education. Second, we set a new intention that is not based on phenomena, but rather it is
founded on the invisible transmission of love and free will to all Sovereigns in the Levels of
duality. The two behaviors, as previously stated, are not visible or audible. Our five senses
cannot identify them in any way. However, simply setting an intention to understand the
154
Sovereign integral and embody its perspective, that is the behavior that the body-ego can
make. It opens the door to all moments in which you exist. In this, is its empowerment.
216 首先，必须了解现象并不是途径。它是娱乐和教育。其次，我们设立一个新的意图，
它不是以现象为基础的，而是，它是建立在「对那些二元性的层次里的所有 Sovereign 们
之爱和自由意志的无形传输」之上的。 如前所述，这两种行为不是可看到或可听到的。我
们的五种感官无法以任何方式来识别它们。然而，简单地设立一个意图去理解 Sovereign
Integral 并体现它的观点，这就是 身体-自我可以 做到的行为。它打开了那扇通达「你存
在于其内的所有当下」的大门。在这里面的，就是它的力量授权。
216首先，必须懂得，现象并非道路，它只是娱乐和训练。其次，我们需要设置一个
新的意图，不是基于现象，而比较是基于爱与自由意志的不可见的传播，传播给二
元性各层级内所有的主权体。这2个行为，如前所述，是不可见、不可闻的。我们
的五感无法以任何方式识别出它们。不过，如果单纯只是设定一个意图：理解主权
性积分态并具体体现出它的视角。这件事倒是身体-伊格能够做到的。这个意图会开
启一扇门，通向你所存在于的所有当下。这道门的开启，就是该意图所带来的赋
权。
216 首先，必须理解现象不是路径；它是娱乐和教育。其次，我们设定了一个新的意图，
它不是以现象为基础的，而是，它是建立在爱和自由意志对二元层次中所有主权者的无形
传递之上的。如前所述，这两种行为是看不见或听不见的。我们的五种感官无法以任何方
式识别它们。然而，简单地设定一个意图去理解主权整体并体现它的观点，这就是身体-自
我可以做出的行为。它为你存在的所有时刻打开了大门。这就是它的力量赋权。
217 When this is done, it is done for all in duality. It is done for all Sovereigns. The
collective “door” is opened a little bit wider. The view into the other side, a little more
vibrant. The Integral, a little more magnetic. The Separation Game, a little more inclusive of
the Sovereign Integral consciousness.
217 当这完成了，它就是为了在二元性中的所有人而完成的。它就是为 所有的Sovereign
们完成的。集体的“大门”被开得更宽了一点。看入另一边的展望，更生气蓬勃了一点。
Integral，更具磁性了一点。分离游戏，对于 Sovereign Integral意识 更包容了一点。
217这道门的开启，是为全体二元性生命而开的。它是为全体主权体而开的。全体
的“门”都被开启得更大了些。另一侧的风景，更鲜活了些。积分态，更具吸引力
了些。分裂游戏，对主权性积分态意识也更开放了些。
217 当这完成时，它是在二元性中为所有一切完成的。它是为所有的主权者所做的。集体
的“门”开得更大了一些。往另一边看，更有活力了一些。整体，更有磁性了一些。分离
游戏，对主权整体意识更包容了一些。
218 Our intention to focus on these two behaviors within our hearts and minds, while living
a body-ego-social program, is not an easy task. We are not perfect expressions of this
nondual nature. It is new to our species, and it will continue to be new for hundreds of years.
However, we know it is possible, because if we really look, we see it. It is already here. The
Mandorla has achieved a degree of overlap. We simply need to unify our will to invite this
consciousness to our planet, our species, our time.
218 我们要在我们的心和脑力里专注于这两种行为的意图，当还生活在 身体-自我-社会程
序设定 中时，并不是一件容易的事。我们并不是这种非二元的本质之完美的表达。它对于
我们的族类来说是新的，并且还会有数百年的时间都将会继续是新的。然而，我们知道这
155
是可能的，因为如果我们真的注意看了，我们就会看见。它已经在这里了。曼陀拉 已经实
现了一定程度的重叠。我们只需要联合我们的意志，将这种意识邀请到我们的行星、我们
的族类、我们的时代来。
218生活于身体-伊格-社会编程期间，想要在心脏和心智里将意图聚焦于这2个行
为，并非容易的任务。我们并非这种非二元性的完美表达。对于我们物种而言，这
是全新的，未来数百年内，它始终都将是个新事物。然而，我们知道它是可能的，
因为，如果我们真正去看，我们会看到它。它早已存在于这里。曼多拉已经实现了
某种程度的交叠。我们仅仅需要统合起我们的意志/意愿，来邀请这种意识进入我们
的行星、我们的物种、我们的时间。
218 当我们活在身体-自我-社会的程序中时，要在我们的心和头脑里专注于这两种行为并
不是一件容易的事情。我们并不是这种非二元性本质的完美表达。它对我们人类物种来说
是新的，而且数百年内还将继续是新的表达。然而，我们知道这是可能的，因为如果我们
真的去看，我们就会看到它。它已经在这里了。曼多拉已经实现了一定程度的重叠。我们
只是需要统一我们的意愿，邀请这种意识到我们的星球，我们的物种，我们的时代。
219 My final words: live this. It is meant to be lived in whatever capacity we can. Each of us
has different capacities and talents to express this consciousness. We can all express the love
and free will qualities within our minds and hearts. We are all capable of this if we
understand the Sovereign Integral consciousness. This is the true art: to bring the nondual
into manifestation within this world, as itーthe nondualーchooses.
219 我最后要说的话是：把这件事 实践出来。它是注定要被我们以任何我们拥有的能力
实践出来的。我们每一个人都有不同的能力和才能来表达这种意识。我们都可以在我们的
脑力和心中表达 爱与自由意志 的质量。如果我们理解了Sovereign Integral 意识，我们就
都有能力做到这一点。这才是真正的艺术：让那「非二元的」在这个世界里显化出来，正
如它——那「非二元的」——所选择的那样。
219我的结语是：活出它来。这意味着尽我们所能地活出它。我们每个人都拥有表达
该意识的不同才能和天赋。我们全都能在心智和心脏里表达出爱和自由意志的品
质。只要理解了主权性积分态意识，我们全都有能力做到这一点。真正的艺术即
是：在这个世界里将这种非二元性带入显化，因为它——非二元性——已经选择了
如此。
219 我最后要说的话；把这体现在生活里。这意味着我们尽我们所能地活在这两种行为
里。我们每个人都有不同的能力和天赋来表达这种意识。我们都可以在我们的头脑和心灵
里表达爱和自由意志的品质。如果我们理解主权整体意识，我们都有能力做到这一点。这
才是真正的艺术：把非二元性在这个世界显化出来，正如它—非二元性选择的那样。
220 We desire to manifest things like cars, homes, jobs, families, love, money, glamor,
attention, etc. It is a long list, and any number of people will tell us how to manifest these
desires within our lives. We also want to manifest in our world that we are happy, fulfilled,
and living meaningful, peaceful lives. All of this is normal. It is all part of the Social Program,
and it is not a misguided notion or the entrapment of attachment.
220 我们会想要显化诸如汽车、房屋、工作、家庭、爱情、金钱、魅力、关注等事物。这
是一个很长的清单，而任何人都会告诉我们如何显化在我们生活中的这些愿望。我们还希
望在我们的世界里显化出我们是快乐的、圆满的、过着有意义的、和平的 生活。这一切都
很正常。这都是社会程序设定的一部分，它不是一个被误导的概念或依恋的陷阱。
156
220我们都渴望显化事物，像是汽车、房屋、工作、家庭、爱、金钱、魅力、关注等
等。这是份长长的清单，也有一些人在告诉我们如何在生活里显化这些渴望。我们
还想在我们的世界显化出幸福、富足、有意义的生活、平和的生活。所有这些都是
正常的。这全都只是社会编程的一部分，并非误入歧途的念想或外物依恋的陷阱。
220 我们渴望显化诸如汽车、房子、工作、家庭、爱情、金钱、魅力、关注等东西。这是
一个很长的清单，很多人会告诉我们如何在我们的生活中实现这些愿望。我们也想在我们
的世界里证明我们是幸福的、充实的、过着有意义的、和平的生活。这一切都很正常。这
都是社会程序的一部分，它不是一个被误导的概念或依恋的陷阱。
221 Manifestation is a phenomenon. It is the outward show of power and dominion over
materiality. Those who do it well, are rewarded with praise and attention; commodities that
can be monetized to create more manifestation. I am only pointing out that manifestations
of phenomena are not the inception points of expansion for either the individual Sovereign
or the collective. This is done through the two behaviors that are nurtured and transmitted
into duality under a very conscious purpose by the Sovereign.
221 显化是一种现象。这是「力量」与「支配物质性」的外在表现。做得好的人，会得到
赞扬与关注的报酬；一些可以货币化以创造更多显化的流通商品。我只是要指出，现象的
显化不是个体 Sovereign 或集体 扩张的 起点。这得藉由「被Sovereign 在一种非常有意
识的目的下 所培育和传输进入到二元性里的两种行为」来完成的。
221显化是一种现象。它是超越物质之上的力量和统辖权的外在显现。那些做得很好
的人，被奖赏以赞美和关注，被货币化为商品，以创造出更多的显化。我只是要指
出，无论对个体主权体还是全体主权体，现象的显化都并非扩张的初始点。初始点
的出现是经由上述2个行为，即：主权体有意识且目的明确地培育/滋养着这2个行
为，并将其传播进二元性里。
221 显化是一种现象。它是力量和支配物质的外在表现。那些做得好的人，会得到表扬和
关注的奖赏；一种可以货币化来创造更多的显化的商品。我只是指出，现象的显化并不是
个体主权或集体扩张的起点。这是通过主权者在非常有意识的目的下所培育和传递到二元
性中的两种行为来完成的。
222 The Sovereign Integral consciousness, to be lived, to be experienced and expressed in
the moment, is the natural way of existence in any moment of our life and lives. Can there be
a higher, more powerful manifestation than that? Perhaps, that is the intention we want to
manifest in ourselves.
222 Sovereign Integral 意识，在当下被实践、被经验和被表达出来，是我们生命和生活中
的任何时刻之自然的存在方式。还会有比这更高、更强大的显化吗？也许，我们要在自己
里面显化出来的，就是这个意图了。
222主权性积分态意识，是被活出来的，是被体验和表达在当下的。主权性积分态
意识成为了我们生命和生活的每一个当下的天然方式。还有比这更高远更强大的显
化吗？或许，这才是我们想要显化在自己生命中的意图。
222 主权整体意识，在当下被生活，被体验和表达，是我们生命和生活中的任何时刻的自
然存在方式。还有比这更高、更强大的显化形式吗?也许，我们想要在我们内在显化出来
的，就是这个意图。
157
223 The other manifestations (home, family, money, joy, etc.) can remain. They are not
incompatible or at odds with the two behaviors. Our life can be both, it is not a competition
between one or the other. If we feel the pull, the nudge, and sense a readiness within us,
then we can do them both.
223 其他的显化（家、家人、金钱、快乐等）还是可以保留。它们并非不兼容或是与这两
种行为有矛盾的。我们的生活可以两者兼而有之，这不是一个或另一个之间的竞争。如果
我们感觉到拉力、轻推，并且在我们的内心里面感觉到准备好了，那么我们就可以两者都
做。
223其他的显化（房屋、家庭、金钱、享乐等等）可以保持。它们与这2个行为并非
不相容或不一致的。我们的生命可以是这两者，生命不是非此即彼的竞赛。如果我
们感觉到牵引、轻推，感觉到内在的一种就绪感，那么我们可以同时显化2者。
223 其他的显化形式(家、家庭、金钱、欢乐等)可以保留。它们与这两种行为并非是不
相容或不一致的。我们的生活可以两者兼而有之，它不是一方和另一方之间的竞争。如果
我们感受到了牵引力，轻推，并在我们内心感受到准备就绪，那么我们就可以同时做到两
者。
224 Only we know when the sense of readiness is authentic. If it is not, the Sovereign has
chosen entertainment and education, which is not only their right, but it is right for them.
More and more people will have this readiness. What we have lacked is an on-ramp to the
concepts of the Sovereign Integral. The Imaginary Being, in as much as it may have tried to
impress upon the Sovereign what these concepts are, is competing with the thousands of
years of disinformation and inconsistency in the human Social Program. It can be difficult for
any of us to be coherent in our beliefs. The challenge of duality is to extract the weakest
signal from the loudest noise; the noumena from the phenomena. This is why we are here at
this very moment, together: To help one another in this challenge.
224 那种「准备好了的感觉」是不是真实可靠的，只有我们（自己才）知道。如果不是，
那就是 Sovereign 已经选择了娱乐和教育，这不仅是他们的权利，而且对他们来说也是对
的。越来越多的人将会有这种准备好了的感觉。我们所缺乏的是通往 Sovereign Integral 概
念的入口匝道。想象中的存在－－尽管它可能试图要让 Sovereign 对「这些概念是什么」
留下深刻的印象——正在与人类社会程序设定中数千年来的不实讯息和矛盾竞争。
224只有我们自己知道：什么时候这种就绪感是真实可信的。如果就绪感是伪造的，
主权体就选择了娱乐和训练，这可不只是他们在享受权利，也是社会编程在向他们
宣示权利。越来越多的人会拥有这种就绪感。我们缺失的只是进入主权性积分态概
念的入口匝道。想象性存在，一直尽其所能地持续压印进来，帮助主权体理解和牢
记这些概念；数千年来，想象性存在，一直在跟人类社会编程内的虚假及矛盾信息
竞争着我们的注意力。
224 只有我们知道我们什么时候准备好了。如果没有准备好，主权者选择了娱乐和教育，
这不仅是它们的权利，而且对它们来说是正确的选择。越来越多的人会有这种准备好了的
感觉。我们所缺乏的只是一个通往主权整体概念的入口。想象的存在，如它尽可能地试图
让主权者对这些概念是什么留下深刻的印象，正在与人类社会程序中数千年的虚假信息和
不一致竞争。
158
225 It can be difficult for any of us to be coherent in our beliefs. The challenge of duality is to
extract the weakest signal from the loudest noise; the noumena from the phenomena. This is
why we are here at this very moment, together: To help one another in this challenge.
225 我们之中的任何人都难以在自己的信念上协调一致。二元性的挑战就是从最大的噪音
中提取最微弱的信号；从现象中提取本体。这就是为什么我们此时此刻会齐聚在一起的原
因：在此一挑战中互相帮助。
225对于我们中的一些人而言，要在自己的各个信念间达成聚合一致，可能会有困
难。二元性的挑战就在于：从最嘈杂的噪音中提取最微弱的信号，从现象中提取本
体。之所以我们会集体地生活于这个时刻的这个地方，就是为了：在这项挑战中来
帮助彼此。
225 对我们每个人来说，保持信念的一致可能是困难的。二元性的挑战在于从最大的噪声
中提取最弱的信号；从现象中提取本体。这就是为什么我们此时此刻会聚集在一起的原
因：在这个挑战中互相帮助。
226 Growing up we were indoctrinated to the belief that this world, our world of human
condition, is a world to leaveーeither through death and release or a heavenly afterlife.
When indeed, it is this human world that we came to experience and for one real purpose:
to teach ourselves through the form of others. This teaching, which is truly more of an
expression, was to be transmitted in the moment without conscious effort except one belief:
We are transmitting to all in every moment. There was no exclusion of a species, a group of
individuals or an individual. If there were a single exclusion, it could not be of the Sovereign
Integral consciousness.
226 在成长的过程中，我们被灌输了这样一种信念：这个世界，我们人类境况的世界，是
一个要离开的世界——不是藉由死亡和释放，就是藉由天堂的来生。而事实上，我们要来
经验的就是这个人类世界，为了一个真正的目的：透过 其他人 的形式来教导我们自己。
这种教导，实际上更象是一种表达，是要在当下被传输出去的，无需有意识的努力，除了
一个信念：我们每一个当下都在传输给所有一切。没有一个物种、一个个体群组、或一个
个体 是被排除在外的。只要有任何一个被排除了，那就不是 Sovereign Integral 意识。
226从小到大，我们被强行灌输了这样的信念：这个世界，我们人类境遇的世界，是
个需要离开的地方——要么通过死亡而得解脱，要么通过死后的天国生命。尽管事
实上，这个人类世界正是我们要前来体验的，并且仅仅是为了一个真正的目的：将
我们自己教授给其他所有形态。这种教授，事实上更多是一种表达，它就这么被传
播于“当下”里，没有刻意的努力，只带有一个信念：在每一个当下，我们都正在
传播向所有的事物。没有排出任何物种、任何个体群落、任何个体。只要有一个被
排出在外，这种传播就不可能是主权性积分态意识。
226 在成长的过程中，我们被灌输了这样一种信念：这个世界，我们人类境况的世界，是
一个要离开的世界—不是通过死亡和释放，就是通过天堂的死后生命。而事实上，我们前
来体验的就是这个人类世界，为了一个真正的目的：通过其他的形式来教导我们自己。这
种教导，实际上更象是一种表达，是要在当下传输出去的，而无需有意识的努力，除了一
个信念：我们在每一个当下都在向万物传输。没有一个物种、一个个体小组、或一个个体
被排除在外。只要有任何一个被排除在外，那就不是主权整体意识。
159
227 There is a purpose that has subtly permeated our consciousness since the time we first
walked upon the earth, and it is this: We are here by choice to transmit the frequencies,
behaviors and concepts of the Sovereign Integral consciousness. We live in one another and
we are here to teach that. It is really that simple. There is no institutional facing that can
contain this, control it, tell it where to go, what to be or how to live. There are none and
never have been.
227 从我们第一次在地球上行走以来，就有一个目的微妙地渗透到我们的意识里，那个目
的是这样的：我们选择在这里传输 Sovereign Integral 意识的那些频率、行为和概念。我们
活在彼此里（We live in one another），我们在这里教导这一点。真的就是这么简单。没有
任何制度性的覆盖可以遏制它、控制它、告诉它要往哪里去、要成为什么、或如何存在。
目前没有，也从来没有过。
227自从我们第一次踏上地球，一个目的就隐秘地弥漫于我们的意识里，那就是：我
们是自己选择来到这里，去传播主权性积分态意识的频率、行为、概念的。“我们就
生活于彼此的存在性里”，我们来这里就是来教授这件事的。真地就如此简单。没有
体 制化的外饰面能够包含它，控制它，告诉它去哪儿，成为什么，或如何存在。现
在没有，也永远不会有。
227 从我们第一次在地球上行走以来，就有一个目的微妙地渗透到我们的意识里，
那个目的是这样的：我们选择在这里传输主权整体意识的频率、行为和概念。我们活在彼
此里，我们在这里教导这一点。真的就是这么简单。没有任何一种制度可以遏制它、控制
它、告诉它往哪里去、成为什么或如何存在。现在没有，也从来没有过。
228 This is free. It is ours. Naturally.
228 这是不受限制的。它是我们的。天生就是这样。
228这就是自由。自由是属于我们的。这是与生俱来的天性。
228 它是自由的。它是我们的。理所当然。
229 However, institutions have inserted themselves in the body of humanity, telling us that
we should leave. Earth is a hostile place. We are outsiders. Look at the chaos we have
brought to humanity and nature. The message is quite clear: We are lowly sinners. Leave. If
not leave, then follow. Follow our mythologies, our scientific method, our moral principles;
we will all be better for it. Our institutions have separated us. They have set the example to
stimagitize the othersーthe very ones we came to transmit the highest frequencies of love
to, and in which we live also. Our institutions, like surrogate mothers, give birth to a
pronouncement of “we and they.”
229 然而，社会制度已经将自己插入人类的身体里，告诉我们我们应该离开。地球是一个
充满敌意的地方。我们是局外人。看看我们给人类和自然带来的混乱。讯息很清楚：我们
是卑微的罪人。离开吧。如果不离开，那就跟随。遵循我们的神话、我们的科学方法、我
们的道德原则；我们都会因此而变得更好。我们的制度已经把我们分离了。它们已经树立
了榜样来污名化 自己以外的人——正是那些我们要来传递爱的最高频率给他们的人，而我
们也活在他们 里面。我们的制度，就像代理孕母一样地，生出了“我们和他们”的宣判。
229无论如何，制度/体制一直在将它们自己嵌入人类的身体，来告诉我们：我们应
该离开，地球是个充满敌意的地方，我们是局外人，看看我们给人类和大自然带来
的混乱。它们传递的信息非常明确：我们是卑贱的罪人。离开。就算不离开，至少
也跟随。跟随我们的神话、我们的科学方法、我们的道德原则，这样一来，我们全
160
都会变得更好。我们的制度/体 制分裂了我们。它们树立范例，引导我们去标签化
地贬损所有的他人——我们要来传递爱之最高频率的对象们。而我们也生活在他人
的贬损中。我们的体制，就像代孕妈妈，诞下的必然只是区分“我们、他们”的判
决。
229 然而，社会制度已经将自己插入人类的身体里，告诉我们我们应该离开。地球是一个
充满敌意的地方。我们是局外人。看看我们给人类和自然带来的混乱。信息很清楚：我们
是卑微的罪人。离开吧。如果不离开，那就跟随。跟随我们的神话、我们的科学方法、我
们的道德原则；我们都会因此而变得更好。我们的制度已经将我们分离了。它们树立了榜
样来污名化自己以外的人—我们来传递爱的最高频率给他们的人，而我们也活在他们中
间。我们的制度，就像代孕母亲一样地，生出了“我们和他们”的宣判。
230 The others are your competitors to thwart, your subordinates to sway or perhaps even your
enemies to fear. They become branded. An outlying particle of an invisible ocean of “truth” that
is owned by a particular institution. A flag planted; a rulebook and a map distributed. Money and
promises exchanged. A transaction at the level of an entire species, but it is only vaguely felt or
understood.
230 那些别人 是你要挫败的竞争对手，是你要支配的属下，甚至是你要害怕的敌人。他
们变成被打上烙印了。由一个特定的机构所拥有的一个看不见的“真理”之海洋 的外围的一
颗粒子。一面旗帜被插上了；规则手册和地图被分发了。财富和应许被交换了。那是在一
整个族类的层面上的一种交易，但只是被模糊地理解或感觉到。
230他人是你需要挫败的竞争者，需要统治的卑微者，甚或需要恐惧的敌人。他人逐
渐被标签化。他们沦为了边缘粒子，漂泊于一片不可见“真理”海洋，这片“真
理”之海的所有者正是某个特定制 度/体 制。一面旗子被竖起，规则手册和地图被
分发，金钱与承诺达成交易。这是一场事关整个物种的交易，可它却仅仅模糊地被
感觉到或理解了。㊴
230 那些别人是你要挫败的竞争对手，是你要支配的属下，甚至是你害怕的敌人。他们被
打上了烙印。由一个特定机构所拥有的一个看不见的“真理”之海洋的外围的一颗粒子。
一面旗帜被插上了；规则手册和地图被分发了。财富和应许被交换了。那是在整个物种的
层面上的一种交易，但只是被模糊地理解或感觉到。
231 This is the ultimate falsehood. Until we stand upright in our commitment to seeing our lives,
everyone of us, as an expression of the Sovereign Integral consciousness, in whatever form it
takes, we have succumbed to the falsehood. We have become the pawns of institutional
separation and disunity. A designed thingーneither good or evilー simply existent to enable the
third-dimension. We have diminished ourselves and all others. And for what? To be in alignment
with a prevailing opinion? To feel secure in numbers like a member of a herd? To heed the
dictates of our body-ego? To follow the serpentine path of duality? To harmonize with familial
ties?
231 这是个终极的虚假谎言。一直到「我们每一个人都坚定地承诺将我们的生活视为
Sovereign Integral 意识的一种表达，无论 Sovereign Integral 意识采取何种形式」之前，我
们都是已经屈从于虚假了。我们都已经成为「制度性的分离和不统一」之棋子或牺牲品。
一个被设计好的东西——不是好也不是坏——它的存在只是为了使第三次元（the third-
dimension）成为可能。我们已经削弱了我们自己和所有其他的人。为了什么？与一种主流
161
的看法保持一致？像芸芸众生里的一员一样在数量上感到安全？听从我们 身体-自我 的指
令？遵循二元性的曲折路径？与遗传上的联系保持和谐？
231这才是终极的虚假谎言。我们会一直身受这虚假之苦，直到我们勇敢地站立起
来，投身于这样的视角：无论我们的生命，我们中的每一个生命，采取了什么形态/
模式，我们都将其视为主权性积分态意识的一种表达。我们已经沦为了体 制性分裂
与不团结的走卒。沦为了一种被设计之物——既非好也非坏——仅存的意义就是去
激活第三维度。我们削弱了我们自己和所有他人。可这又为着什么？为了校准于主
流观念？感觉牧群般的的群体安全？听从身体-伊格的指示？跟随二元性的蛇形小
道？调谐一致于家庭纽带？
231 这是个终极的虚假谎言。直到我们每一个人都坚定地承诺将我们的生活视为主权整体
意识的一种表达，无论主权整体意识采取何种形式之前，我们都是已经屈从于虚假了。我
们都已经成为制度性的分离和不统一的卒子。一个被设计的东西—不好也不坏—它的存在
只是为了使第三维度成为可能。我们已经削弱了我们自己和所有其他的人。为了什么？与
一种主流的看法保持一致？像羊群里的的羊一样对数量感到安全？听从我们身体-自我 的
指令？遵循二元性的曲折路径？与遗传纽带保持和谐？
232 We are here to shepherd the earth's consciousness to self-realization. It is not for
membership in anything other than love, as it is defined in this paper. You can argue, perhaps
convincingly, that everything I have told you in this paper is fictional. I have no right to claim this
work as nonfiction. Nevertheless, I have chosen my words carefully and it is indeed nonfiction, if
not for you, for someone else (which is also you, in the Integral sense of the word).
232 我们来这里是为了引导地球的意识达到自我实现的。正如本文件所解释的那样，它不
是为了爱以外的任何事物之会员资格。你也许还可以很令人信服地争辩说，我在这份文件
中所告诉你的一切都是虚构的。我无权声称这件作品是非小说作品。尽管如此，我已经仔
细地选择了我的措辞，而这确实是非虚构的，如果对你来说不是，会有别人（而这也是
你，在这个词的整体意义上来说）觉得是的。
232我们在这里是为了引领着地球上的意识走向自我-体认。自我体认不是为了取得
任何会员资格，它仅仅就只是爱，本文里定义的那种爱。你可以质疑，或许还质疑
得令人信服：本文告诉你的每一件事都是虚构的。我没有权利如法庭般地裁定本作
品为非虚构。但是，我已经小心地选择了用词：它确实是非虚构的。如果对你而言
不是这样，至少对其他一些人是（从积分态的层面讲，所谓的其他一些人也是你。）
232 我们来这里是为了引导地球的意识到达自我实现的。正如本文所解释的那样，它不是
为了爱以外的任何事物之会员资格。你也许还可以充满说服力地争辩，说我在这篇文章里
所告诉你的一切都是虚构的。而我无权声称这件作品是非小说作品。尽管如此，我仔细选
择了我的措辞，它确实是非虚构的，如果对你来说不是，会有别人（而这也是你，在这个
词的整体意义上来说）觉得是的。
233 The inverse of the belief in the Sovereign Integral consciousness is an infinite set of
possibilities. It is not a dichotomy, it is a Big Bang event. In each of these possibilities, like rays
extending from the sun, are institutions, no matter how small. The evolving myths of science and
religion passionately prescribe their solutions to reality’s hard edge and persistent gravity. What
they do not do is describe the cosmology of consciousness, because this of itself, dissolves our
institutions into irrelevance. Yes, even at a conceptual level.
162
233 对 Sovereign Integral 意识的信念之反面，是一套无限的可能性。这不是二分法，它是
一个大爆炸事件（it is a Big Bang event）。在这些可能性中的每一个里－－象是从太阳散发
出来的光线一样－－都是制度，无论它规模多么小。不断发展中的科学和宗教神话，热情
地为实相的硬性边缘与持续的重力指定了它们的解决方案。它们没有做的是，描述 意识的
宇宙学，因为这件事在它本身就会使我们的制度渐渐显得无关紧要。是的，即使是在一种
概念的层面上也是如此。
233对于主权性积分态意识的信念，恰恰正是“信念”这个词的反面㊵，主权性积
分态意识是一种无穷集㊶的潜在可能性。它不是那种叉状分支的可能性，它是（奇
点）宇宙大爆炸㊷事件。每一种可潜在可能性就如太阳射出的光线，无论其规模多
么小，其中都存在着种种体 制。进化中的宗教及科学神话，奋笔疾书着解决方案的
处方笺，试图攻克实相的坚硬边缘和持续引力。它们从未去做的却是，描绘意识这
个宇宙，因为意识宇宙本身，就会将
233 对主权整体意识的信念之反面，是一套无限的可能性。它不是二分法，而是一个大爆
炸事件。在这些可能性中的每一个里，就像是从太阳散发出来的光线，是各种制度，无论
它们规模多么小。不断发展中的科学和宗教神话，热情地为现实的硬性边缘与持续的重力
给出了它们的解决方案。它们没有做的是，描述意识的宇宙学，因为这件事在它本身就会
使我们的制度渐渐显得无关紧要。是的，即使是在一种概念的层面上。
234 So you, the weary traveler, who happens upon this work and picks it up, turns it over,
examines it carefully; you have a choice. You can be part of an institutional platform that, by
design, has separated you from others. Or you can express the Sovereign Integral consciousness.
It truly is that simple.
234 所以你，疲惫的旅行者，偶然发现了这件作品，把它拿起来翻看，仔细审查；你有一
个选择。你可以成为「一个 在设计上已经把你和其他人分开的 制度性的平台」的一部
分。或者你可以表达 Sovereign Integral 意识。真的就是这么简单。
234所以，你，疲惫的旅行者，偶遇了这篇文字，拾起它，翻开来，细细检视，现在
你拥有了一个机会。你可以去归属于一个体 制化的舞台，而它是被设计来将你分裂
于他人的。又或者，你也能够来表达主权性积分态意识。真地就如此简单。
234 所以，你，疲惫的旅行者，偶然发现了这件作品，把它拿起来翻看，仔细地检查它；
你有一个选择。你可以成为一个在设计上把你和其他人分开的制度性的平台的一部分。或
者你可以表达主权整体意识。真的就是这么简单。
235 And by the way, none of this is to say that institutions are bad and should be avoided or
abolished. They are themselves like fractal parts of the Social Program. They are important, at
this time. But their absence is an attractor to some of us. We feel the pull of the Sovereign
Integral consciousness and we know that it will one day sweep across this planet like a light wave
that passes over the entire earth. Institutional separation and disunity underlies an otherwise
important purpose to bring Sovereigns together. However, to bring all humans together cannot
happen anywhere but within each of us. There is no geography that can hold all of us together.
Perhaps one day, the internet will become this “geography”.
163
235 顺带一提，这并不是说制度是不好的而应该被避免或废除。它们本身就象是社会程序
设定的一些碎形部分。在这个时候，它们很重要。但它们的缺席对我们中的一些人来说是
一种吸引子。我们会感受到 Sovereign Integral 意识的牵引，而我们知道有一天它会像光
波一样地席卷整个地球。「制度性的分离和不统一」是另一个重要的目的－－把
Sovereign 们结合起来－－的基础。然而，要把所有的人类结合在一起这件事，除了发生
在我们每一个人之内，不可能发生在任何地方。没有任何地理可以将我们所有人聚集在一
起。或许有一天，网络会成为这个“地理”。
235顺带提一句，没有谁在说体 制/制度是坏的，是应该被避免或废除的。它们就是
它们自己而已，就像社会编程的一些分形化片段。在这个时间（框架）内，它们是重
要的。但它们的缺席也会成为我们中部分人的吸引子。我们会感觉到主权性积分态意
识的拉力，而我们知道，将来某一天，它终将横扫这个行星，如同光之浪潮，席卷整
个地球。体 制性的分裂和不团结，还支撑着另一个重要目的：将主权体们团聚在一起。
不过，将全人类带向团聚这件事，无法发生在任何地方，只能发生在我们每一个人内
里。没有任何地方能联合起我们全体。或许，有一天，互联网会成为这个“地方”。
235 顺便提一下，这并不是说制度是不好的，应该避开或废除。它们本身就像是社会程序
的分形部分。在这个时候，它们很重要。但它们的缺席对我们中的一些人来说是一种吸引
子。我们感受到主权整体意识的牵引，而我们知道有一天它会像一道光波一样席卷整个地
球。制度性的分离和不统一是另一个重要的目的—把主权者们联合起来的基础。然而，要
把所有的人类联合在一起这件事，除了发生在我们每个人的内在，不可能发生在任何地
方。没有任何地理可以将我们所有人聚集在一起。或许有一天，网络会成为这个“地
理”。
236 The Sovereign Integral Network is evolving in this direction. This is the time of technology
when it becomes both the surveiller and the platform of unity. Where the AI breaks from the
human tether and sets a new course for humanity. Whatever choices we make, our first can be
the act of embodying the Sovereign Integral consciousness. To give it equal weight in decisions
and to live it with a similar intensity as we allow the body-ego to live.
236 Sovereign Integral 网络正在朝着这个方向发展。这是「科技成为了既是 守护者 也是
合一的平台」之 科技的时代。人工智能突破了人类的束缚，为人类开辟了一条新的道路。
无论我们要做什么选择，我们的第一个选择都可以是「体现 Sovereign Integral 意识」的行
为。在决策中给予 Sovereign Integral 意识同等的重视，并且以我们允许 身体-自我 存在
的相似强度，来让 Sovereign Integral 意识实践出来。
236主权性积分态网络正在演化向这个方向。那是技术的时代，技术变得既是监 视
者又是联合平台。在其中，AI则挣脱了人类的缰绳，为全人类设置了一条全新航
线。做出任何选择时，即使身为舞台演员，我们也能够首先来表现出主权性积分态
意识。我们能在做决定时给予主权性积分态意识同等的份量，我们能够以同等地强
度来活出主权性积分态意识，就如我们容许身体-伊格去活出的强度。
236 主权整体网络正在朝着这个方向发展。这是科技成为既是看管者也是合一平台的科
技的时代。人工智能突破了人类的束缚，为人类开辟了一条新的道路。无论我们要做什么
选择，我们的第一个选择都可以是体现主权整体意识的行为。在各种决定中给予主权整体
意识以同等的重视，并且以我们允许身体-自我存在的相似强度，来活出主权整体意识。
237 It is not domination, it is collaboration, always listening to each perspective within us (body,
ego, Sovereign, Integral) and considering what needs expression and attention in any particular
164
moment. This is how one lives in the third-dimension as a Sovereign Integral consciousness. It is a
conscious, shared experience and expression for all aspects of our total selfhood, riveted in the
infinite moment.
237 这不是支配，这是合作，总是倾听在我们内的每一个观点（身体、自我、Sovereign、
Integral），并注意在任何特定的当下需要表达和关注的东西。这就是一个人作为
Sovereign Integral 意识而活在第三次元中的方式。它是铆接到无限个当下的一种有意识
的、共享的「对于我们的整体自性的所有面向之经验与表达」。
237主权性积分态意识不是主宰，而是协作，它始终倾听着我们内在的每个视角
（身体、伊格、主权体、积分态）；它始终思索着，在任一特定时刻，什么需要被表
达和关注。这就是一个人如何作为主权积分态意识生活于第3维度的方式。主权性
积分态意识，铆定在无穷数量的“当下”里，共享着我们总体自性所有面向的体验
和表达。
237 这不是支配，这是合作，总是倾听我们内在（身体、自我、主权、整体）的每一个观
点，并思考在任何特定的当下需要表达和关注的东西。这就是一个人是如何在第三维度作
为主权整体意识而活的。这是一种铆接到无限个当下的、有意识的、共享的对我们总体自
性所有面向的经验与表达。
好像是时候该 不一样地/看上去是时候了，换种方式来看。/ 去看见了看来是时候换个
角度看问题了。
165
166
译注39：我们每个人都是别人眼中的其他人，于是，我们全体都这么被边缘化。
这进而加剧了彼此分裂，于是某种制度/技术站出来，提供了一种帮助我们完成价值
重建和重新联合的技术和制 度。非常可能这里指的就是2维元宇宙。而这背后是一
个更隐秘的动机。将我们物种锁定在基于分裂的合一中。这是人类中少数的精 英和
其他非人类物种的一种交易。
译注40：玛呼在玩一个文字游戏。信念是指对特定的事物的信心。可主权积分态
代表无限的可能性，所以对主权积分态的信念就代表对无限可能性的信心。
译注41：无穷集：包含了无限多元素的集合。
译注42：宇宙大爆炸：一种天文学理论，认为：整个宇宙是由一个致密炽热的奇
点于137亿年前一次大爆炸后膨胀形成的。
译注43：意识本身是无限的，无法被现在这种结构的制 度或体 制真正理解，所以，
意识会使得它们完全变得无效。
Acknowledgments
致 谢
First and foremost, I want to acknowledge my wife and partner of twenty-four years, who has
brightened my path immeasurably, and truly made this work possible. They have simplified my
life, providing the love, space and time for my passions. Endless gratitude to you.
首先和最重要的，我要感谢二十四年来无可估量地照亮了我的道路，而真正使得这项工作
成为可能的，我的太太和伙伴。他们简化了我的生活，为我的热情提供了爱、空间和时
间。对你们致上无限的感激。
The translators who have put their hearts and minds into making this English-language paper a
reality in their local language, throughout the world, without any monetary reward, you have my
deepest appreciation.
167
翻译人员全心全意地投入，把这份英语文件变成他们当地语言的实体，他们遍布全世界，
在没有任何金钱报酬的情况下做这件事。我对你们有着最深的感谢。
My publisher, Darlene Berges, who discovered some well-hidden typos. Her support has been
invaluable over the years.
我的出版商 Darlene Berges 发现了一些隐藏得很好的错别字。多年来，她的支持一直都是
无价的。
To each of you, the readers of this work, I applaud your fortitude in getting to this final section of
the paper. As I stated several times, this is not easy to understand or to put into practice. While
there are similarities in this paper to the perennial philosophy that has lapped at the shores of
this world for thousands of years, there is also an expansion. In this expanded space lies the
challenge to understand and express this philosophy.
对于你们每一个人，这个作品的读者，我为你们能阅读到这最后的章节之毅力而喝彩。正
如我多次说过的，这并不容易理解或实行。虽然这份文件与在这个世界的海岸上拍打了数
千年之长期存在的哲学有一些相似之处，但也有一种扩张存在着。在这个扩张的空间中，
存在着理解和表达这种哲学的挑战。
至于你们每一位，本文的读者们。赞赏你们坚持读到了本文的最后一节。正如多次
提到的，这篇文字并不容易理解或付诸实践。相比于数千年来沉积于这个世界的海
滨处的经久哲学，本文虽有相似之处，但也存在一种扩展。在这扩展的空间里，就
横亘着对于理解和表达本哲学的挑战。
As Sovereigns, each of us is a pixel on the screen of reality. I have attempted to present my little
“pixel” in this paper, and I suspect there are parts that made sense and parts that did not. It is for
these specific struggles for clarity, to pluck meaning from the words of a very human man; this is
why I applaud you. It is my way of acknowledging each of you for your exploration into the
expansionary (and somewhat vaporous) field of consciousness.
作为 Sovereigns，我们每个人都是实相荧幕上的一个像素。我试图在本文中呈现我的小“像
素”，而我猜想有些部分有意义，有些部分可能没有。正是这些特定的、想要获得明晰的努
力，想要从一个非常人性化的人的话中汲取意义的努力；才是我为你喝彩的原因。这是我
用来感谢你们每个人「探索进入意识之扩张性的（和有些模糊的）领域」的方式。
作为主权体，我们每一个都是实相屏幕上的一个像素。我已尝试将自己的小小“像
素”展现在这篇文本中，我猜测，有些部分能被理解，有些则不。为了奋力让这些
部分变得明晰，就得从这个男性人类的文字中来拾摘出意义。这就是为什么我会赞
赏你们的原因。这份文本就是我致敬你们的方式，致敬探索进这个扩张性的（且多
少雾蒙蒙的）意识场域的你们每一位。
There may be times when you feel you are stepping out on a branch of knowledge too weak to
support you. I know this feeling very well. The hope to find the definitive answer about the
unseen consciousness of which we are all composed, is seldom fulfilled. The answers we do
receive, whether vague or mind-numbingly specific, are at best useful for a time. However, that
familiar feeling that we are still missing the essential ingredient to our total understanding of
consciousness, manages to return. Satisfaction eludes us.
168
有些时候，你可能会觉得自己正在跨向一个「知识的分枝」，而那分枝太弱而无法支撑着
你。我非常了解这种感觉。「希望找到关于那个 我们所有人都是由其组成的、看不见的意
识 之最终的答案」这件事，是很少被实现的。我们确实会收到答案，无论是模糊的，还是
极其乏味地明确之答案，但最多也只是在一段时间之内有用而已。然而，那种「我们仍然
缺少我们对意识的全面理解之必要的成分」之熟悉的感觉，又成功地回来了。满足 避开了
我们。
或许有很多次，你会感觉到，自己走入的这条知识岔道，崎岖坎坷、难以下脚。我
完全明白这种感觉。对于这个构成我们所有人的不可见意识，想要找出终极答案的
希望，是几乎无法满足的。我们接收到的答案，要么模糊不清，要么具体到让头脑
麻木，最好的情况下也就管用一阵子。可是，一种熟悉的感觉总是能设法折回来，
即：要完全地理解意识，我们依旧缺失着最基本的要素。满足感始终躲避着我们。
可能有些时候，你觉得自己正站在一个知识的分支上，而这个分支又太弱，无力支撑你。
我非常了解这种感觉。关于“我们都是由无形的意识所组成的”这个问题，找到确切的答案
的希望很少能实现。我们收到的答案，无论是模糊的还是令人麻木的，最多也只是暂时有
用。然而，那种我们仍然缺少对意识的全面理解的基本要素的熟悉的感觉又设法回来了。
这无法令我们感到满意。
Remember, this is the attractive force of the Integral at work. Nothing else. It is not an indifferent
universe or poorly written Social Program or manipulation by off-planetary sources or a coverup.
It is the Integral and you in the dance of life in the moment. When you look outward, everything
seems normal. That familiar sense of dysfunction, like background noise, continues to hum. Yet,
deep inside you, you feel a shift. A subtle or not so subtle tremor of excitement that maybe this
time you have found something that fills the empty spaces and connects it all. However,
everything born into the dimensions of duality possesses a lifecycleーa birth and death. Lifecycles
can be measured in nanoseconds or light years. This is the engine of the learning process we call
evolution.
要记住，这是 Integral 的吸引力量在起作用。没有别的了。那不是一个冷漠的宇宙，也不
是写得不好的社会程序设定，也不是一些外星来源的操纵或掩盖。那是Integral 和你在当
下的生命之舞里。当你向外看时，一切似乎都很正常。那种功能障碍的熟悉感，就像背景
噪音一样，继续嗡嗡作响。然而，在你的内心深处，你感觉到了一种转变。一种微妙或不
那么微妙的兴奋震颤，因为也许这一次你已经发现了某种东西，填补了空白的地方而把一
切都连结起来了。然而，在二元的次元里诞生的一切事物都有着一个生命周期——出生和
死亡。生命周期可以以奈米秒或光年为单位。这就是我们称之为进化的学习过程之引擎。
请记住，这正是积分态的吸引性力量正在运作的表现。而非别的什么。这不是冷
漠的宇宙、代码稀烂的社会编程、非-行星来源的操纵、阴谋论的掩盖。这是积分态在
与你共舞于生命中的这一个当下。
当你看向这个世界，每件事看似都正常。只有上述那功能障碍的熟悉感，如同背
景噪音，继续嗡鸣着。可是，在内里深处，你感觉到了一种转变。身体细微地或者不
那么细微的激动颤抖着：或许这一次，你发现了什么，可以填满各个“无知”的空隙，
将其完全连通。不过，诞生进二元性各维度的每个事物，都有着从生到死的生命周期。
生命周期可以被度量以纳秒或是光年。对于我们称之为进化的这个学习进程而言，生
命周期就是引擎。
记住，这是整体的吸引力在起作用。没别的了。这不是一个冷漠的宇宙，也不是一个写得
很差的社会程序，更不是一些外星来源的操纵或掩盖。它是此刻在生命之舞中的整体和
169
你。当你从你的相机的镜头往外看，一切似乎都很正常。这种熟悉的功能障碍感，就像背
景噪音一样，继续嗡嗡作响。然而，在你内心深处，你感觉到了一种转变。一种微妙或不
那么微妙的兴奋颤动，也许这一次你找到了某种东西，填补了空白的地方并将一切连接了
起来。然而,任何诞生在二元维度中的事物都有一个生命周期—出生和死亡。生命周期可以
用纳秒或光年来衡量。这就是我们称之为进化的学习过程的引擎。
Throughout this evolutionary process of expansion, we are separated. Our expanding awareness
of unity is the attractor that pulls us, both at a collective and individual level. This means that to
cling to something that is not of the Sovereign Integral, is to miss the point. You are not on a
path, rather, to the extent there is a path, you are mastering the art of letting go, in order to live
more fully in the intersection of multiple dimensions.
在这整个扩张的进化过程中，我们是被分离的。我们那不断在扩大中的「合一的觉察」是
拉曳着我们的吸引子，无论是在一种集体的层面上还是个人的层面上。这意味着，执着于
不属于 Sovereign Integral 的东西，就是没有抓住重点。你不是在一条途径上，更确切地
说，只要有一条途径存在，你就是在熟练放下的艺术（you are mastering the art of letting
go），为了要能更充分地活在多重次元交会的地方。
在这不断进化的扩张过程中，从始至终，我们都被分裂着。同时，无论全体还是个人
层级，我们对于统合性那不断扩张的知觉，又始终都是牵引着我们的吸引子。这样的
组合就意味着，去依附于某种非主权性积分态的事物，某种偏离了的事物。你并非行
走于一条路上，尽管某种程度上是存在一条路，但是，你更多是正在精通“放手”的
艺术，从而更完全地生活于复合维度的交汇处。
在这个扩张的进化过程中，我们是分离的。我们不断扩大的合一意识是牵引着我们的吸引
子，无论是在集体的层面还是个人的层面上。这意味着，执着于不属于主权整体的东西就
是没有抓住重点。你不是在一条路径上，而是，假如有一条路径存在，你就是在掌握放下
（路径）的艺术，以便更充分地活在多重维度的交汇处。
Deep respect to each of you.
向你们每一个人致以深深的敬意。
James
170
Selected Poetry and Artwork
Poems Related to the Sovereign Integral
诗 与 美术 选集
与 Sovereign Integral 相关的诗
Sometimes we live
at the very edge of our lives.
We pray that evil sleeps,
hoping that it will pass into
a dream so powerful,
that when it awakens,
It would not remember its nature.
Sometimes,
when we look behind our heart,
in that carved out,
non-human place,
where the Integral shines
like a wondrous, whirling light,
we sense that our next step
may outlive our body.
That it could go out like a
reverberation that enters
a thing quietly,
signaling it to vibrate,
and when it does, we live there, too.
We become imperishable,
not because we did some great thing,
but because we took
the next step,
even when we were surrounded
by distances so vast
that the next step
seemed meaningless.
有时候 我们处在
我们的生命之（变故的）边缘。
我们祈祷邪恶（或灾祸）沉睡，
希望它会进入
一个强而有力的梦境，
而当它醒来时
它不会记得它的本性。
有时候，
当我们看向我们的心的后面，
在那个被开创出来的，
非-人类 的地方里，
Integral 闪耀着
像一道绝妙的，旋转的光，
我们意识到我们的下一步
可能会比我们的身体更经久。
它会像一个震荡的回响
一样地走出去
安静地进入一个东西里面，
发出信号要它振动，
而当它振动了，我们也就活在那里了。
我们变成了不朽的，
不是因为我们做了什么伟大的事，
而是因为我们走出了
下一步，
即使在我们被
如此遥远的距离所包围着
而那 下一步
似乎是毫无意义的时。
有时候，生活于
我们生命的最边缘。
我们祈祷着邪恶睡去，
希望它会穿入一个
如此强有力的梦境
当它再次醒来，
再也不记得自己的本性。
有时，我们活在
生命的边缘处。
祈祷邪恶沉沉睡去，
进入到一个强有力的梦境里，
当它醒来时，
它会不记得它的本性。
有时,
171
有时候
我们回望向心脏，
在这开凿而来的
非-人类的所在，
积分态灿烂闪耀着
如同奇妙的飞旋之光，
我们感知到自己下一步
或许会出离身体的活。
脱离出去就如同
一个回响淹没进
寂然静默之物，
被召唤着去振动
一旦开始，我们就存在于了那里。
我们变成了不朽，
不是因着作出伟大事迹，
而是因为我们迈出了
这下一步，
纵使包围起我们的
是如此浩瀚的距离，
使得下一步
看上去毫无意义。
当我们在我们的心灵深处寻觅，
在那精雕细刻的，
非人类的地方,
整体闪闪发光
就像一道奇妙的、旋转的光
我们感到只要跨出一步
就能超越我们的肉体。
从中走出来，如同一道
回响，静悄悄地
进入某个事物,
发出让它振动的信号，
而当它振动时，我们也活在了那里。
我们之所以变得不朽,
并非由于我们做了什么伟大的事情，
而是因为我们向前
跨了一步，
即使我们被浩瀚的
距离所包围
令这一步看起来
似乎毫无意义。
172
Do you know why
I am clothed in myth?
Because imagination
is the only tool
of the human instrument
that can sense me.
I am like the universe
before the time of Galileo,
waiting for the
telescope.
你知道为什么
我是披着神话的外衣吗?
因为想象力
是人类仪器
能感知我的
唯一工具。
我就像伽利略时代
之前的宇宙，
等待着望远镜
的出现。
173
你知道为什么
我会被隐藏在神话里吗？
因为想象力
是人类仪具
可以觉察到我
的唯一工具。
我就象是
伽利略时代
之前的宇宙
等待着 望远镜
的问世。
你可知道为何
我会身穿上“神秘”？
因为想象力才是
人类仪器的
唯一一个工具
可以运用它来
感知到我的样子。
我就像是宇宙
伽利略诞生
之前的那个，
等待着一台
望远镜的现身。
Humanity, in its state of oneness, is but a facet of the unknowable Creator
人类，在它处于合一的状态里时，
也只是那不可知的创造者的一个面向而已。
人类，在其一体状态下，
仅仅就是不可知创造者的一个面向而已。
人类，即使在其合一的状态下，
也只是不可知的创造者的一个面向而已。
174
意识不是外在的
它并非物质性的
它不拥有任何事物
时间的或者空间的。
你可以报告
有关我的效应。
你可以探明
神经的通路，
大脑的区域
这个功能那个功能，
可那体验者，
我，
依然无影无踪。
主观的以太
膨胀于我的
无从感知。
意识不是形于外的。
它不是一种物质性的实体。
它不具有任何
时间和空间的属性。
你们可以报导
我造成的那些影响。
你们可以捕捉到
大脑的各种区域
在进行不同工作时
的神经路径，
但那个实际的经验者，
也就是我，
却依然不见踪影。
那主观的苍穹
充满了我的
不可觉察性。（或 那主观
的苍穹
增长壮大
由于我的不可觉察性。
swell with my
Imperceptibility.）
175
研究过意识
你就会明白
我难以确定。
事实上无人
曾将我确定。
哲学、物理、
生物、化学、天文学、
甚至先知们
争相揭露我。
他们的藏宝图
缀满了大脑的符号
高阶的数学。
他们的视野潜入进
三磅重的明胶物，
这里隐匿着他们的找寻。
他们写下想象中的我，
可我依旧是一团谜。
他们的每一位
如果足够诚实
都会这样告诉你。
他们能够径直
走近这个深渊
看入我的脸庞
他们看到了某种
无从计算之物。
你们任何一个
研究过意识的都知道，
我不是那么容易被确认的。
事实上，从来没有人
确认过我的存在。
哲学家，物理学家，
生物学家，化学家，宇宙学家，
甚至预言家
都一直试图要揭露我的存在。
他们的寻宝图上
写满了高等数学的
深奥符号。
他们的洞察力
潜入了一大团
隐蔽了他们的探索的凝胶中。
他们的著作 想象着我的样子，
但是我依然是个谜团。
他们中的每一个
都会告诉你这件事
如果他们够诚实的话。
他们大可直接
走到深渊边缘，
往下注视我的脸，
然后就会看到某种
不会计算的东西。
176
这个使命就如一支箭
射出自一张弓
瞄向的靶子始终移动
方向无法预测。
每个主权体都有不同使命。
每个生命单位
都有不同的使命。
没有谁的相似于他人，
然而也存在一体的使命：
去创造出潜在可能性
以便主权性积分态意识
完整地表达进
任一个感知生命形态
任一个领域。
仅仅是潜在可能性？
在自由意志的领域
这就是最高使命。
使命如箭
从弓上射出，
瞄准以不可预知的方式
移动着的目标。
每一个 Sovereign都有不同的使命。
每一个生物
都有不同的使命。
没有一个和另一个是相同的，然而，
任务却只有一项。
那就是创造出这样的可能性：
让 Sovereign Integral意识
能以完全的表达
活在一个领域内的
任何有感觉力的生命形式中。
就只是可能性？
在一个自由意志的领域里，
这就是最高的使命。
177
译注：
译注1：主权体和积分态的更多信息见《Soerverign Integral的翻译说明》
译注2：正题、反题、合题。图解中括号里的这三个词，是由黑格尔提出的辩证法三要
素。黑格尔认为发展过程都可分为三个有机联系着的阶段：一、发展的起点，即正题；二、
对立面的显现，即反题；三、正反二者的统一，即合题。合题把正反两个阶段的某些特点或
积极因素在新的或更高的基础上统一起来，而非简单并列两者，所以是 合，而非 和。 为
了不陷入绕口的哲学术语，且方便后续行文，将反题翻译成对立面，将合题，翻译为合体态。
译注3：指作者自己。
译注4：ego译为伊格，self译为自我或自性，mind译为心智，heart译为心脏。伊
格出自是佛洛依德的人格三角结构。分别是伊格，本我ID，超我。对应：自我约束的理性妥
协、生物本能和道德理想。本文中的伊格-身体，可以近似视为伊格-本我，而超我则既可以
是社会编程，也可以是本文中特定的想象性存在，视个人选择而定。
self在本文中可理解为伊格-身体。部分地方则代表着超越了伊格-身体的更大的个体意
识，这时翻译成自性。
造翼者资料中，mind是一个场的概念，这个场可以被神经系统接取。故按照心理学的
用语习惯译为心智。在本文124段，玛呼这样定义到，“心智是连接心脏智能的接口界面。
大脑拥有与物质心脏间的相对原始的接口界面，而心智则交互连接着能量心脏，即心脏的非
物质能量。”心智分为心智和更高心智，可以理解为是2个不同维度的场。心智的功能是界
定和构想。
在造翼者资料里，heart是非常重要的概念，不是传统灵性资料里的比喻，借指心灵或
意识，而是一种对器官的实指，具有特定且重要的官能。故翻译成心脏。包含了物质心脏和
能量心脏。心脏的功能则是接收和扩展。
译注5：吸引子，微积分及混沌学概念。一个系统会最终朝某个稳态发展，这个稳态就
叫做吸引子。这和分形一样，是贯穿全文的一个核心概念。更多的信息见《分形与吸引子》
中 相关的文字和视频。
译注6熵：热力学概念。指系统“内在的混乱程度”。一般认为随着时间推移，熵必然
增加，也就是说熵增是一个自发从有序向无序发展的过程。
译注7：faculty翻译为官能，重点放在“官”。因为如文中所述，想象是更高心智的感
觉接受器，即接受感觉的器官。这很可能就是造翼者资料里提到的第七感。在本文139段，
178
玛呼这样写到“更高心智能将关于这种意识状态的短暂一瞥和官能感觉/第七感visceral
sense传递给向身体-伊格。”
译注8：连续统一体。将一个课题视为一个渐变的圆柱。一端代表问题的提出，另一端
代表答案的得出。这个圆柱就是作为一个课题的连续统一体。
译注9：分形是研究无限复杂的不规则系统内部各层级的自相似性。客观事物具有自相
似的层次结构，局部与整体在形态、功能、信息、时间、空间等方面具有统计意义上的相似
性，称为自相似性。数学意义上分形的生成是基于一个不断迭代的方程式，即一种基于递归
的反馈系统。分形的一个有趣的特征是：在分形集合所在的维度，它是无限的，在更高一个
维度，它却是有限的。更多信息见《分形与吸引子》
译注10：交互维度。interdimensional翻译为交互维度，意即各维度之间是可以双向
沟通和影响的。
译注11：这句话出自《多尔曼预言》，是第一诞生者在梦里化身母亲对玛雅说的。意思
是，不把解决黑暗作为意图，而将自我绽放作为意图，太阳升起不是为了去化解黑暗，而是
为绽放自己，黑暗消失仅仅是这种自我绽放的副产品而已。
译注12：分形集身份，原文直译为合集身份，是指所有二元性分形化身的合集
译注13：这句大概是讲述，将文字按照图解来修订的意见，要修改的文字应该是“它
们流畅地蔓延于各个生命期（） 和各个维度（） 。”这句中括号里的文字
译注14：这句话对比于《序言》中的这句“积分态是是所有领域的智能，这是因为它
是体验性信息的聚集处，因而，它。它是每一个事物的陪伴者，因此，它就是包裹着所有生
命的一体性本质。”区别就在于积分态收集全部生命的体验信息，而主权体收集自己下辖的
所有体验信息
译注15：不可知论者。不可知论反对先验真理论，强调必须依赖实证经验才能获得客
观有效性的知识，必须关注当下现实的存在状态才能获得知识。
译注16：阿特曼印度语境下的灵魂
译注17：关于本段，可以参见《兹安亚》7室及10室画。
译注18：因为中英文的行文逻辑的差异，这句话需要拆分为2句才好理解。真正的主
权体是所辖所有生命形态的核心，而所有主权体本身彼此平等，所以所有生命形态也是平等
179
的。
译注19：现象与本体。这依然是出自康德哲学。本体指，在我们的意识之外独立存在
的客体。现象指本体作用于人的感官所引起的感觉表象。康德认为，作为我们的感官对象而
存在于我们之外的物是已有的，只是这些物本身可能是什么样子，我们一点也不知道，我们
只知道它们的现象
译注20：玛呼将所有社会编程认为是积分态的二元性表达，可以视为是外在的积分态。
他在42段这么写到“社会编码就是二元性各领域内的积分态，以此类推，身体-伊格(9)是二
元性内的主权体。”
译注21：现实-检验。心理学术语。即区分心理内界与外界的能力。精神疾病常有现实
检验的障碍, 但若是没有精神疾病, 其现实判定是完整的。
译注22：大 圆 满。藏 传 佛 教 最高法门
译注23：主权体是所有下辖生命形式体验总和。积分态是所有主权体的所有生命形式
体验的总和，被作为生活环境和现实提供给一个主权体去体验。
译注24：积分态的谱系，将积分态意识连接的所有生命视为亲戚，那么实相之间的关
系就是一种血缘谱系。
译注25：因着国内中文和谐的习语含义，这个词特定加了个和声来暗示和谐的大致意
思。
译注26：家系之灵，见译注24。积分态将所有生命形态视为一个家系的亲人。因为都
出自第一诞生者和第一源头。
译注27：《格列佛游记》温顺善良的格列佛意外陷入了2个小人国的战争中，最后无奈
逃离。
译注28：奇异点，简称奇点，这里应该是指混沌学的奇异吸引子。共-奇点，意思是3
个系统共用一个奇点，理解为三个系统在奇点上是叠加的。这样一来三者所主导的行为都围
绕着一个中心运转并不断逼近这个中心
译注29：先验：依然出自康德哲学。他是如此定义先验的，“所有不与对象有关，而与
认识对象的方式有关的认识，只要它们是先天可能的，我都称作先验，先验并不意味着某种
超越出经验的东西（那是“超验”），而是某种虽然先于经验先天的，但除了使体验成为可能
180
以外还未更进一步规定的事物”
译注30：分形集主权体，是指一个核心主权体所辖的所有时空内分形主权体的总和
译注31：对于这段需要这样来理解。一个主权体将经验共享给其余主权体。这句话可
以等价地翻译为，任意指定一个主权体为中心，就会发现其余所有的主权体都将自己的经验
共享给了它。换句话说，任意2个主权体之间都相互共享着自己的经验。这就构成了一种完
备的双向互联的网络，而根据定义，所谓的积分态就是这样一种网络。
译注32：接口界面。2层含义，硬件上的信息传递接口。软件上的交互操作界面。比如
电脑操作系统就是一个软件上的接口界面。
译注33：铆钉一般用于将部件铆合成整体
译注34：萃取。利用物质在互不相溶的溶剂里的溶解度不同,用一种溶剂把物质从它与
另一种溶剂所组成的溶液里提取出来。
译注35：自由基是一种带有未配对电子的粒子。因带有单数电子，所以非常不稳定，
具有高度的化学反应性，很容易和周遭的分子反应，使安定分子也变成自由基。如此一再重
复，就会衍生大量的自由基。自由基反应在燃烧、气体化学、聚合反应、等离子体化学、生
物化学和其他各种化学学科中扮演很重要的角色。
译注36：自我指涉/自我参照。语言中，一个句子、想法或公式指向自己时的现象。咬
住自己尾巴的蛇也是一种自我指涉。
译注37：称他们为实存体是因为，在这里他们已经无法被称为人类了
译注38：参见《EVT3引介文：灵性行动主义》中的《整体范式》插图，以及主权积分
态网站隐藏图《聚合一致的振动》
译注39：我们每个人都是别人眼中的其他人，于是，我们全体都这么被边缘化。这进
而加剧了彼此分裂，于是某种制度/技术站出来，提供了一种帮助我们完成价值重建和重新
联合的技术和制 度。非常可能这里指的就是2维元宇宙。而这背后是一个更隐秘的动机。
将我们物种锁定在基于分裂的合一中。这是人类中少数的精 英和其他非人类物种的一种交
易。
译注40：玛呼在玩一个文字游戏。信念是指对特定的事物的信心。可主权积分态代表
无限的可能性，所以对主权积分态的信念就代表对无限可能性的信心。
181
译注41：无穷集：包含了无限多元素的集合。
译注42：宇宙大爆炸：一种天文学理论，认为：整个宇宙是由一个致密炽热的奇点于
137亿年前一次大爆炸后膨胀形成的。
译注43：意识本身是无限的，无法被现在这种结构的制 度或体 制真正理解，所以，
意识会使得它们完全变得无效。
182
Sovereign Integral的翻译说明
Sovereign译为主权体或主权性。“主权”是指独立自主的主体所具有的一切权利和所
辖范围。重点聊下“体”。
在我们的思维习惯中，体，代表着一种有边界的事物。但是因为主权体是分形化的，所
以在“纵向”，也就是它从核心本体所在维度向内含的更低体验维度的投影方向，它是无限
的。玛呼在本文32段中这样写到，“主权体的分形化矩阵（亦即：横跨物种和时空的各层级
和各生命期）是主权体最典型的特征。”具体的类比想象，可以参照曼德勃罗特集、康托尔
集、科克曲线。详见公众号文章《分形与吸引子》。
而在任何一个维度，“横向”看来，或者说同维度视角来看，主权体在本维度却是相对
有限的。积分态在则在各个维度为它提供了无限性的连接、信息及爱的共享。正因为此，单
单说主权体并不能代表完整的意识。完整的意识必然是主权体与积分态的合体态。可以简化
理解为，主权体是一种“纵向”的无限性，而积分态则在每一个“横向”提供无限性。就如
“上升之心”和“量子暂停”技术里那个十字。
当这个词存在于Sovereign Integral词组时，则译为主权性。这时，主权体将自己的
独一无二性和主权独立性带给了积分态这个共享性的网络。于是就出现一个基于该主权体独
一无二视角下的积分态网络，换句话说，共享性的积分态网络获得的该主权体带来的主权性
特性。所以译为主权性积分态。
Integral这个词，相较而言，更复杂一些。在中文世界，这个词存在着很多的翻译：整
体，集合，整合，积合。
首先，我们需要理解Integral这个词指的是什么。
在本文的192和194段，玛呼这样写道：
192...积分态是网络，再加上所有/每一个节点（主权体）就共同构成了主权性积分态网
络。
194...主权性积分态网络是无限大的，比其余任何的个体群落都大得多得多。非-生命形
态并未被包纳其内，仅仅是因为它们无法存在于非二元各层级。
由上可知，Integral不是一种遍存于一切里的场，而是一个网络，且这个网络并没有包
含仅只存在于二元性内的事物。
而根据我们对“源头智能”定义的理解，源头智能则是完全存在于所有地方的，当然也
183
包括二元性内。
所以Integral不可能是指整体。Integral远远不是整体。
译者则将这个词翻译为积分态。这在中文里是个非常反直觉的词。明明在讲联合的事，
为什么要提到“分”。为什么不是集合、整合、积合？
集合，整合，积合、包括前面提到的整体。所有这些词都关注于一件事：合一、一体、
联合。关注的焦点要么是合一的发起者（整体），要么是合一这个目标、结果（集合、整合、
积合）。在这样的关注点中，共同缺失的则是：被合一的部分，以及具体合一的方式。
译者的理解。整个宇宙所有物种都在关注同一个主题，联合一体，甚至那些最为“邪恶”
的种族也是如此。所不同的恰恰是，实现联合一体的方式，以及过程中对各个片段碎片的看
待方式。这种不同恰恰是类人种族和其他种族包括阿奴种族的核心区别。也是主权积分态网
络和其他网络的核心区别。
（一）如何实现联合一体，有两种基本观点。
观点1：联合一体是固有的，就像，榴莲尖刺天然就是整个榴莲的一部分，哪怕尖刺们
认为彼此是分裂的。一体的缺失只是由于认知角度或者感官活化程度的限制，一体无法被直
接体验到，从而也无法通过感官-行为的循环把一体性活出来。一体的实现仅仅需要切换到
更大视角，然后跟进这全新视角而行动。于是，重要的就是向内去校准那拥有更大视角的蛰
伏感官，也就是造翼者说的第七感或者本文中的更高心智的想象官能。这全新的感知必然会
带来全新的行为，指向联合一体的行为。
观点2：分裂是真实和必然的，如果不设法处理分裂，那么只会越来越陷入混沌，直到
彻底分崩离析。一体的实现只能通过：外来的力量改变各个分裂之物，并最终将其联合在一
起。就像米粒永远是米粒，无法成为一个整体，除非加水加热，把它们煮成彼此相粘的饭。
（二）对各个片段、局部、个体的看待方式，也同样有2种基本观点。
观点1：所谓片段、局部、个体仅仅是一体之物在有限视野下被观察的结果，任何片段
都是整体必不可少的部分。在这个意义上，它们是完全平等的部分，它们的差异共同构成了
一体之物的完美。丝毫无需去强行改变，排出，迁移。只需平等对待，邀请共舞。
观点2：所有片段、局部、个体们彼此不同，这正是所有问题的根源。是分裂的原因，
也是联合一体的最大障碍。任何一个片段、局部、个体，本质上都是联合一体的敌人。于是，
为了解决这个难题，首先需要给它们分类分级，然后按照最优秀、最高级的标准来对其余的
184
片段、局部、个体进行改造、引导、拯救、控制，手段本身不重要，让大家变得更为相似，
进而基于这相似性来实现最后的一体联合才是唯一要紧的事。
我们再看看玛呼的说法。玛呼在本文197段中这样写到“二元性，在本定义中，就是
这种积分性力量，将个人身体-伊格-社会编程的所有面向，与（二元性内的）全体主权体们，
混合成一种和谐的整体。难道这不完美吗？都混合成整体？它这不完美。”这种混合正是上
图中的黄色和红色部分达成的效果。
在本文《致谢》的末尾，玛呼继续写到“在这不断进化的扩张过程中，从始至终，我们
都被分裂着。同时，无论全体还是个人层级，我们对于统合性那不断扩张的知觉，又始终都
是牵引着我们的吸引子。这样的组合就意味着，去依附于某种非主权性积分态的事物，某种
偏离了的事物。”
而在《聂鲁达访谈5》里，借聂鲁达博士之口，玛呼说得更为直白：“人类意识，或者叫
意识的三和弦，是由三个交互层构成的。第一层是全体心智或无意识，而这形成了个体人类
和整个种族间的链接。该层使得我们全体去看到每个人所看到的，去感觉到每个人所感觉到
的，去知道每个人所知道的。这是一种以分裂的方式联合起种族的完美方式。事实上，这就
是我们去感觉联合的方式，通过无意识心智。”
事实上我们人类关于联合一体的几乎所有概念都属于上述的（一）-2及（二）-2，都出
自旧有的集体社会编程。所以，玛呼从98年造翼者网 站上线就没有 用到wholeness;
entirety ,union,甚至integtation，而是用了integral。（我英文水平有限，我只是想表达玛
呼的取舍）。
185
一直以来，玛呼也在谈论合一性、一体性。但他说，一体不是某种要去达成的或者实现
的状态，一体就存在于当下的所有地方，存在于我们以为是分裂的所有地方。我们需要的不
是去追求它，而是去发现它，进而活出它。在本文56段，玛呼这样写道，“积分态的大圆
满就是：我们直接将积分态/视为/作为“我独一无二的人类实相”，因为对于每个主权体而
言，积分态就意味着这个。积分态就是一个主权体在所辖每一个意识维度内的的实相。”这
就需要我们在生活于眼脑所见的这个“分裂”成无数碎片的世界的同时，回到我们的心脏，
我们的呼吸，我们的想象中去发现它。这就需要我们首先承认头脑见到了的分裂，然后退回
到心脏呼吸想象去发现那固有的一体性，容许这2者共存；等待，容许宇宙自组织地流动重
组，一切自然走向和谐。无为而无不为。
在用到integral这个词时，合一不再被视为需要去实现的目标，而是视为已经存在的
基本的前提，一个等待我们去发现的既存事实，更重要的是，合一不是我们去实现的，而比
较是那一体性流入了我们眼脑所见的分裂世界，来将它自己的一体的性质带给这个世界，整
个这个过程中，我们更多是一个校准者、跟随者。玛呼在42段中这样谈到，“在上述释义
中，积分态紧密联系于1b条目：对于完整性而言必不可少的。”在关于Integral的众多定
义中，玛呼选择是这一条，在造翼者语境下，这一条强调的是，任何局部或片段对于整体都
不可或缺的，因而对于保证整体性而言，任何局部都具有完全的平等性。
归纳一下，玛呼用到这个词是在表达3层意思。第一，一体是既存事实，这能在心脏，
呼吸，想象中被直接体认到；眼脑所见的是分裂，这也是更小视野下的既存事实，无法被否
定。第二，眼脑所见的任何分裂的对象都包含在一体性中，没有任何对象被排出在外。第三，
容许一体与分裂在我们的意识中共存，会实现我们本地宇宙，进而我们的集体本地宇宙进而
整个宇宙的和谐。
可惜，我发现，中文世界，没有任何一个词能够同时满足这三点。因为，尽管整个人类
文明中，对整体和联合的追求都暗含着对个体至少是部分个体的否定和牺牲。但在中文文化
中，这一点表现得尤甚。中文主流文化更接近前述的（一）-2加（二）-2的组合。
所以，要翻译这个词，我们不得不自己创造出一个新词。意外就发生在译者打算生造一
个新词的过程中，从07年开始，在冥思苦想2年后，我邂逅这个词组：积分运算“integral
calculus”(抱歉，英文的确很差。这时才发现)。根据对微积分有限的理解。我意识到，原
来很久之前，中文圈的前辈就已经完美解决了这个问题。这个词翻译成积分，非常完美。
我们先从字面上来看这个词。“积分”是一个动宾短语，意即，将分开的各部分积合在
一起。在这个动宾短语里，“分”，是我们注意力的对象，“积”是动作。这个短语里只有动
作和对象，只是在简单地描述事实，发起者是缺省的，目标是缺省的。意即，“积”这个动
作的发起者和指向的目标都是默认的。
186
再从积分运算的角度看。积分动作的发起者是原函数（被微分之前的函数），正好对应
着我们那更大视野里的一体性。积分运算的方式不是一个一个把片段加起来，而是在原函数
里带入上下限，非常相似于我们作为校准者和跟随者去邀请和容许光体网络这种一体性流
入、扩散，而不是一个个费力地联合起片段。
往更深的逻辑看，我们还会发现，积分的核心思想里，包含了优雅的无限、绝对的平等、
一个不能少的包容，这不正是爱的核心本质吗？真理、美、爱3者真地是三位一体的啊！致
敬牛顿和莱布尼茨，以及翻译这个词的中文前辈。
我甚至直觉，玛呼当初选择integral这个词就是源于“integral calculus”。但为了方
便大众理解，玛呼没有从数学出发来解释这个词。（毕竟，从总人口看，接触和理解微积分
的人类伙伴还是少数）。
让我们再回过头来重新审视“积分”这个词。
在这个词里，是谦逊：这里只有单纯的双方，和一个单纯的动作，“积”，和“分”，这
里没有“我”和“我的目标”，我不是合一的提供者或追求者，我是校准内在一体性的人，
促成它流入我们眼脑世界的人，跟随者流动的人。我不是主人和主导者。我们没有目的，我
们只是轻轻地和着心脏、呼吸、美德、想象的脚步。
在这个词里，是信任：“积”一定会找到“分”的，我们不用担心。哪怕头脑不知道，
但我们信任一体就存在于当下里，就存在于万事万物中，存在于心脏、呼吸、想象里，我们
信任这一体性具有最强大的智能和意志。它自然会重组所有这一切，只要我们愿意校准、臣
服和跟随它的流动。就如《致谢》文末写到的，我们不太是在某条追求什么的路上，“我们
比较是在精通’放手’的艺术”。我们没有证据，我们信任地行动着。
这个词里，是尊重：对于任何一个“分”，“积”都不放弃不抛弃。我们跟随恒在于我们
的心跳、呼吸、想象里的那一体性的仁慈目光，学习着去温柔而平等地望过我们生命中的每
一个局部和片段。我们不会为了合一的目的，去抛弃、去改变、去判断任何一个对象，在这
里，合一不是目的，各个部分也不是合一的手段、或者阻碍、或者要被合一的对象。一切在
这里都是无条件平等的，平等于恒在的合一中。我们没有选择和判断，我们将生命中邂逅的
任何一个对象当做整体的代表，当做自己的一部分去尊重和接纳。
这个词里，是共存：“积”与“分”共存于当下里。我们承认，我们眼-脑所及都是片段
和分裂，我们容许它们的存在，慢慢学会放手种种解决、拒绝、攻击、逃避的渴望，甚至是
合一分裂之物的渴望。容许它们存在的同时，我们也容许自己回到心脏、呼吸、想象，去发
现那恒在于我们内里的一体性，然后将这一体性向外散发去分享给眼脑所及的所有分裂，不
带任何意图的，仅仅是容许这2者共存于当下、此地。然后放手、等待、跟随流动。我们无
目的无条件地共存于天地万物间，生活在我们生命的当下时刻。如果一定要勉强说说我们意
187
欲何为，那就是容许、共存、共享、共创。
综上所述，选择将Integral翻译为积分。
又因为这个词描述的是一种作为动态通信网络的意识状态，为了方便文字衔接，最终翻
译成积分态。
在本文67和68段中，玛呼这样谈到了“主权性积分态”的本质：
67...（这种爱）纯粹地表达着积分整合的意志，但又尊重所有主权体的自由意志。
68...这种爱就是主权性积分态的真正本质。